
Uh, Wolf Haley, Golf Wang

I'm a fuckin' walkin' paradox —
No I'm not
Threesomes with a fuckin' triceratops
Reptar
Rappin' as I'm mockin' deaf rock stars
Wearin' synthetic wigs made of Anwar's dreadlocks
Bedrock
Harder than a motherfuckin' Flintstone
Making crack rocks outta pussy nigga fishbones
This nigga Jasper tryin' to get grown
About 5, 7 of his bitches in my bedroom
Swallow the cinnamon
I'ma scribble this sin and shit
You tell him all your problems, he's fuckin' awesome with listenin'

Wolf Haley, Golf Wang
Wolf Haley, Golf fuckin' Wang

Jesus called, he said he's sick of the disses
I told him to quit bitchin', this isn't a fuckin' hotline
For a fuckin' shrink, sheesh, I already got mine
And he's not fuckin' workin', I think I'm wastin' my damn time
I'm clockin' three past six and goin' postal
This the revenge of the dicks; that's nine cocks that cock 9's
This ain't no V. Tech shit, or Columbine
But after bowling, I went home for some damn Adventure Time
And danced around the house in all-over print panties
My mom's gone, that fuckin' broad will never understand me
I'm not gay, I just wanna boogie to some Marvin
Fuck her, Wolf Haley robbin' them
I'll crash that fuckin' airplane that that faggot nigga B.o.B is in
And stab Bruno Mars in his goddamn esophagus
And won't stop until the cops come in
I'm an overachiever, so how about I start a team of leaders
Green paper, gold teeth, and pregnant golden retrievers
All I want – Fuck money, diamonds, and bitches; don't need 'em
But where the fat ones at? I got somethin' to feed 'em
It's some cooking books, the black kids never wanted to read 'em
Snap back, green ch-ch-chia fuckin' leaves
It's been a couple months
And Tina still ain't perm her fuckin' weave
Damn

Wolf Haley, Golf Wang, yeah
Goddamn goblin

They say success is the best revenge
So I beat DeShay up with the stack of magazines I'm in
Oh, not again! Another critic writing report
I'm stabbin' any bloggin' faggot hipster with a Pitchfork
Still suicidal I am
I'm Wolf, Tyler put this fuckin' knife in my hand
I'm Wolf, Ace gon' put that fuckin' hole in my head
And I'm Wolf, that was me who shoved a cock in your bitch
I just wanna know if my father would ever like me
But I don't give a fuck, so he's probably just like me
A motherfuckin' Goblin
Then it bunny-hopped off my shoulder, now my conscience dead
Now the only guidance that I had is splattered on cement
Actions speak louder than words, let me try this shit
Dead

I never would've thought that
Feelings could get thrown in the air
Cause I accidentally caught that
I need some new boxing gloves, shit got hectic whenever I fought back
For example, ten minutes can't go past without you brushing my thoughts
That's fourteen forty a day so I'll say a hundred and forty four times
I think about you or something like that
Lost match, the fucking thought of you with somebody else
I don't like that; cellular convos getting left in the wrong
Cause I get so fucking mad when you don't write back
This isn't a song, I just happen to rhyme when I get emo
I love you

Can we add some more color, um, like, some more, yellow
Yeah, that's good

I fucking hate you
But I love you
I'm bad at keeping my emotions bubbled
You're good at being perfect
We're good at being troubled, yeah

Girl, you fucking with my emotions
The fuck is all this noise about?
I even considered picking up smoking
You turned to a bitch, who let the dogs out?
But in my dog house
My bitch is the raddest
Crazy who makes me the happiest
Can make me the saddest
Look Alice
Let's get lost in your wonder-er-land fuck an atlas
You're perfectly perfect for me
What the fuck is this, practice?
Actually, if you even consider leaving
I'll lose a couple screws in due time, I'll stop breathing
And you'll see the meaning of stalking
When I pop out the dark to find you
And that new dude that you're seeing with an attitude
Then proceed to fuck up your evening
Make sure you never meet again like goddamn vegans
Cause when I hear your name I can not stop cheesing
I love you so much that my heart stops beating when you're leaving
And I'm grieving and my heart starts bleeding
Life without you has no goddamn meaning
Sorry -- I'm passive-aggressive for no goddamn reason
It's that my mood change like these goddamn seasons
I'll fall for you, but I love you

We're good at being troubled
Yeah

The sky's falling girl, let's try to catch it
The sky's falling girl, let's try to catch it tonight
The sky's falling bitch, let's try to catch it tonight

C'mon baby
Even though I hate you
I still love you
I like when we hold hands
Love, love, love

"Yo, why is Samuel such a fucking dick?"
"He isn't such a badass actually. He's only here because he ran away, because some shit happened back home. He's actually a dweeb"
"Yo, what happened?"

Golden rubbers in these denim pockets
On my waist, there's a black Glock
New girl moved on the block
She been plottin' on my brown cock
Last night I slept over hers
During sex, I overheard
A sword sliced the air, I pulled out the na-na
Rolled off the bed, then shot back, pow-pow
Blood on the sheets, probably spillin' from my gash
Looked out the glass, seen you sprintin' on the grass
A real ninja with the blade and the mask
Got them gold ninja stars and red Supreme nunchuks
Now she tryna patch me up, but
Girl, I was just tryna get a nut bust
If that's your ex, you should probably own a pistol
But I'm guessin' it's wiser to exit with dude

The blinds wide open so he can
See you in the dark when you're sleepin'
Naked body, fresh out the shower
You touch yourself after hours
Ain't no man allowed in your bedroom
You're sleeping alone in bed
He's at your window

Night light hits off, turnin' kisses to bites
I'm a down to Earth nigga, with intentions, that's right
You'll be down in Earth quicker if you diss me tonight
But I'll be the happiest if you decide to kick it tonight
We can chill and I can act like I don't wanna fuck
You can tell me all your problems like I really give one
But I give two for us cause you're the one that I want
Don't wanna seem like a punk pussy that simps over punk pussy
See when I'm with my friends I just put on a front
But in the back of my top I'm writing songs about we
We as including I, and yourself, making three
Little ones, the drums are hitting pretty hard if you ask me
You're a pretty broad in the top three
Of things that I've been waiting to come, so
Meet me by the lake around 10 and skinny dippin' and then
We can begin the pretend game, I wanna be Finn
From Adventurin' Time

One, two; you're the girl that I want
Three, four, five, six, seven; shit
Eight is the bullets if you say no after all this
And I just couldn't take it, you're so motherfuckin' gorgeous
Gorgeous, baby you're gorgeous
I just wanna drag your lifeless body to the forest
And fornicate with it
But that's because I'm in love with you, cunt

I just wanna talk, and conversate
'Cause I usually just stalk you and masturbate
And I finally got the courage to ask you on a date
So just say yes, let the future fall into place, cunt

But check your window

Swag, 2011
Young Nigga

Sick to my motherfucking tummy
Bitch must think I'm a motherfucking dummy
Because I dress bummy, bitch think I'm broke
Bitch, I ate one roach and I made a lot of money
Thanks to them crackers, my pockets are fatter than excess shit that's weighing on Jasper
I've never popped a bottle, but I've fucked a couple models in Europe
Yup, and a couple of them swallowed
Meet me half way, bitch I'm going all in
And I never pull back, shout-out to my nigga Taco

Fuck that, Golf Wang

So, a couple fags threw a little hissfit
Came to Pitchfork with a couple Jada Pinkett signs
And said I was a racist homophobic
So I grabbed Lucas and filmed us kissing
Feelings getting caught, it's off, I'm pissing
You think I give a fuck? I ain't even stick my dick in yet
And while y'all are rolling doobies
I be in my bedroom scoring movies
Still excited like a fucking newbie
Suck my dick, motherfucker, sue me
Mom got a new whip so she could scoop me
A year ago, I ain't have no hoopty
Four story home, gotta climb eight set of stairs
Just to see where my fucking roof be

Wait a God damn second
I'm tripping balls, David Beckham
Would fall cause shit's going down
Just like Rodney King swimming lessons
Now me and Justin smoke sherm and been talking 'bout freeing perms
And purchasing weapons, naming them and aim 'em in One Direction
It sounds like midgets in a God damn speaker
Anytime you play this shit loud
But that's just me trying to get milk now
And the grunts of the god damn cow
Pan camera, repeat procedure
And when the beat drop, have a goddamn seizure

Cut it out! I said I didn’t want no goddamn lettuce. I don’t want that shit! I don’t want your goddamn lettuce. He-he

Watch me get this money, nigga; tired of being hungry, nigga
Nothing funny, sass me while I'm thrashing, I'mma punch you, nigga
Never made of plastic, I'm a savage -- you look lunch, my nigga
Passing all you hating fucking fags we don't discuss, my nigga
We ain't on no jolly shit and we don't pop no Mollies, bitch
I'm hocking, spitting got some niggas out here popping Ollie switch
Buncha novices, Odd Future the squad is thick
Them young niggas is back and brash, attacking with no common sense
We the last of a dying breed
And we don't give a fuck, so we cannot supply your needs
You stupid niggas who had said our hype is dying, please
My pockets solid, making profit off the highest tees
Bitch, merch twerk as I get on the verse, cursing
Nigga Dom so cool, I refer him in third person
Watch me get this money, I'm up when the birds chirping
Make actions, fuck rehearsing

Nigga, summer, fall, wintertime, twenty-four, three-sixty-five
You niggas gon' give me mine, I don't have plenty time
Flying out at any time, getting money, any grind
You niggas gon' give me mine, you niggas gon' give me mine

In a world where kids my age are popping Mollies with leather
Sitting on Tumblr, never outside or enjoying the weather
Can name a sweater, but not a talent or don't know if whether
Or not they got one, tried to change their life for the better
I was the drama club kid, I run where the fun did, my nuts itched
I was defiant, always said, "Fuck shit"
Hated the popular ones, now I'm the popular one
Also hated homes too, til I start coppin' me some
See I don't beez in the trap, nigga, I beez in the b's
And I be gassing up my buzz like some bees at a Shell
Fucking sick and getting bigger like I sneezed on Adele
And bitches getting touchy-feely like they reading some Braille
I bust quick like gun-holders with short tempers, and well
I tried to tell the kids, like fuck it, start being yourself
These fucking rappers got stylists cause they can't think for themselves
See, they don't have an identity, so they needed some help, but
Really, boy? Poseurs looking silly, boy
I'm in that past season 'Preme shit, older than Tity Boi
Not a diss, but same with ice cream, my shit is Diddy Riese
Na'kel Smith, Transworld page 64
Poppin' like oil ollie in fire flames
I'm harder than DJ Khaled playing the fucking quiet game
The fuck am I saying? Tyler's not even a violent name
About as threatening as stained windbreakers in hurricanes
But he rapes women, and spit wrong, like he hates dentists
God damn menace, 666 and he's not finished
And my shit's missing, he hates women, but love kittens?
See y'all niggas tripping, man
Look at that article that says my subject matter is wrong
Saying I hate gays even though Frank is on 10 of my songs
Look at that Mom who thinks I'm evil, hold that grudge against me
Though I'm the reason that her motherfucking son got to eat
Look at the kid who had the 9 and tried to blow out his mind
But talk is money, I said, "Hi," I guess I bought him some time
Look at the ones in the crowd -- that shit is barnacles, huh?
They thought I wasn't fair until I threw a carnival, huh?
But then again, I'm an atheist that just worships Satan
And it's probably why I'm not getting no fucking album placements
And MTV could suck my dick, and I ain't fuckin' playing
Bruh, they never played it, I just won shit for they fucking ratings
"Analog" fans are getting sick of the rape
All the "Tron Cat" fans are getting sick of the lakes
But what about me, bitch? I'm getting sick of complaints
But I don't hate it when I'm taking daily trips to the bank
Oh but no but, shit, who really gives a fuck what I think?
My fans don't, they turning on me, shit, they're almost extinct
Fuck buying studio time, I'mma go purchase a shrink
Record the session and send all you motherfuckers a link, bitch

This shit just like the nights I look forward to not remembering
So much for being sober, I hope that you can forgive me
All I’m seeing is the drop in my ocular, jumping like they told me
That the 40's half off, like you know that cliff
Or get compared to fucking pair with all the program kids
Malt liquor filling me up, and all us not giving no fucks and
Dirty one spitting that sumpy raw till his wrists in the cuffs
Brother the Pigeons is us
Bid you goodnight and good luck

Samuel's here! Where's Wolf? Fucking faggot. Salem was mine, bitch! Was that good enough, you fucking pussy?

Yo, fuck 2DopeBoyz and fuck Nah Right
And any other fuck-nigga-ass blog that can't put an 18 year old nigga
Making his own fucking beats, covers, videos and all that shit
Fuck you post-Drake-ass cliche-jerking, LA-slauson rapping
Fuck-nigga-ass Hypebeast niggas, now back to the album

Well, Tyler, hi, I'm Dr. TC and um, I'm guessing that your teacher sent you here to talk cause you were misbehaving
So, just tell me something about yourself...
Well, look, if you don't talk, I mean, these sessions are going to go slower

This is what the devil plays before he goes to sleep
Some food for thought? This food for death, go ahead and fucking eat
My father's dead, well I don't know, we'll never fucking meet
I cut my wrist and play piano cause I'm so depressed
Somebody call the pastor, this bastard is so possessed
This meeting just begun, nigga I'm Satan's son

My mother raised me a single parent so it's apparent
That I got love for my mother, none of you other fuckers
Are much important I'm getting angrier while recording
I'm feeling like the bulls, I've got a gang of wolves
Odd Future is children that's fucked up in they mental
Simple but probably not, fuck them

I'm tall, dark, skinny, my ears are big as fuck
Drunk white girls the only way I'll get my dick sucked
Suspended from school coolest nigga without effort
Easy to spot like black bitches with fake leopard
Soak me up in a tampon, but keep the lamp on
Cause this album pack enough evil
That you can't fit inside a Jansport, go to school with this

I go from AP to JC inside a fucking week
Waking up with random girls like "Yo, bitch, how the fuck we meet?"
I stay with grandma, she always bitching about her carpet
Every time I walk inside the house, she always tend to start shit
No to drugs I never spark it, I used to be bullied for honor classes
By those that were slow as molasses, take this shit to school

Raquel treat me like my father like a fucking stranger
She still don't know I made Sarah to strangle her
Not put her in danger and chop her up in the back of a Wrangler
All because she said no to homecoming, demons running
Inside my heads telling me evil thoughts
I'm the dream catcher but nothing but nightmares I caught, go to sleep

I wear green hats because I'm fortunately lucky
Fuck me the monster said, somehow the monster's dead
Inside of me, but the thoughts it tells me are still evil
With this state of mind, big moves, Max Keeble
I'm on my grind feeble, my music is either
A fucking sin or too illegal play this shit in church

I graduated without honors or fucking father
I wanted a brother my mother I told her
But instead I got a sister, just like me with her mister nada
So both of our imaginations are creations of the fucking situation
That's having our brains racing like Dayton, wearing some fucking Heelys

I know you fucking feel me, I want to fucking kill me
But times I'm so serious you think I'm silly
I'm doing Big Style Willy couldn't touch 11
Seven, what's religion nigga? I am legend
I roll with skaters and musicians with an intuition
I created O.F. cause I feel we're more talented
Than 40 year old rappers talking about Gucci
When they have kids they haven't seen in years, impressing their peers
With the same problem, the only way to solve them
Is to go to Father's Day convention with a gold revolver
Life's a salad, I'm a toss it, eat that shit up, Rick Ross it
Shit it out, bag it up, sell it, I'm so damn rebellious
Cause my mother let me do what I want
She wasn't careless, protective she is the bear
The shit is so bare, my diary isn't hid
My father didn't give a fuck, so it's something I inherit
My mom is all I have so it's never meet the parents
When Danielle or Milan decide to fucking share
This confused boy, I wanna hug hoy, I’m bad for you kids to listen to
Soy is not the choice, I'm bad milk, drink it

Whoa, umm, it seems you had a lot to say
Uh, who knows I might feel as I'm evaluating

My wrist is all red from the cutter
Dripping cold blood like the winter, the summer
Is never that's equivalent to me and Sarah
Well that's not her fucking name, but I think this shit is clever
My niggas wanna know if I'm fucking, if I'm kissing
But I'm sitting here downing beers simply just wishing
With a tear they try to tell me but I never listen
Cause I don't give a shit like sitting down pissing
Eighteen, still talking to imaginaries
Hopefully they see the talent I carry just like Jimmy
Losers can never win me, you can never offend me
My goal in life is a Grammy, hopefully momma will attend the
Ceremony with all my homies, I'm suicidal
This my Zombie Circus, I hope the majors heard this
Fuck a deal, I just want my father's email
So I can tell him how much I fucking hate him in detail

Wow, umm, so Tyler if you had the chance to tell him something
What would you tell him?

Tamale! Tamale! Tamale! Tamale! Tamale! Tamale! Tamale!

They say I've calmed down since the last album
Smell my gooch, you could kiss my buns
And I don't give a shit, bend my rectum
Somebody said bands make her dance
You think you're getting cash, no bitch, you're dumb
The only thing that you're gonna get is this dick
Here, take a goddamn picture
And tell Spike Lee he's a goddamn nigga
And while you're at it, pass the lotion
And fapping and Xbox Live, that fun
Before I cum, I'm calling your sister
When she comes over, I take picture
Instantly put it on Instagram
And suplex her off a building if I get banned

Tamale! Tamale! Tamale! Tamale!
Why y'all so salty? Hot tamale is on
A can of beans, bitch, I'm on
Your boy is bad to the bone

Bring back the horns that was played in the beginning
And tell Tony Parker that I found his vision
And if he's tripping off my sneak dissing
Then he has to deal with me and my minions
Tryna get a bimmer, E46
Have you heard "48", motherfucka I'm great
Golf Wang prints always cover the sleeves
From cuts for the Biebs, 'cause he's puffin' the trees, please
Fuck I look like? Got a new bike tire
Never pop like the puss on a butch dyke
Think I give a fuck, I do go raw
My urethra, hole that I pee from
Bigger than the obese neck on Aretha
Now turn that snare down
I'm back like I'm Rosa Parks fare on the same damn bus
Like, "You're going to jail now!"

How much wood could a woodchuck chuck?
If a woodchuck could ever give a fuck?
Bitch Suck Dick, motherfuck you and your opinions
Sicker than the last bar bold-er, I’m a CO
Colorado, fuck Michael, bitch, I’m badder than my BO
Find me and Lance tryna dance during chemo
Before they repossess our strong arm bands and tuxedos

Yeah, buddy, this is my jam, na na na na na na na!
Golf Wang, Golf Wang, no, fuck you, na na na na na na!
Can't agree? Bitch, I'm on

How many fags can a lightbulb screw?
Well if it has a dick, maybe two or six
And tell the NRA I'm about to lose my shit
Shoot through Wayne LaPierre's hair with a crucifix
How many ladies in the house?
How many ladies in the house without a rich nigga, huh?
A little Jergens in my palm for the jerkin'
Hope my mom don't catch me, tryna set mood
Little Redtube, fuck lotion, I don't need lube, dry fist suits me
Up and down, the friction makes a squeaky sound, the shit's kind of disgusting
Fap time and before I flatline, Clancy chimes in my room and catch me
This shit's so damn embarrassing like...

Oh, shit, aw fuck
What the fuck!
Aw, I'm sorry
Is that my shirt?
Yeah, sorry, I needed something
Clean that shit up, we're going to the office!

La, la, la, la, la, la, la
AAAAHHH!

Satan's getting jealous of the wolves, the demons say they preferring us
Wolves, I know you heard of us, we're murderers
And young enough to get the fucking priest to come and flirt with us
You niggas rap about fucking bitches and getting head
Instead I rap about fucking bitches and getting heads
While you niggas stacking bread, I can stack a couple dead
Bodies, making red look less of a color, more of a hobby
I'm not a rapper nor a rapist nor a racist
I fuck bitches with no permission and tend to hate shit
Brag about the actions in a rhyming pattern matter
Then proceed to sat her down when I go splatter in her chatterbox
Atta boy, Odd Future, you're not in our categore
Torture with the super soaker at the asian liquor store
This the type of shit that make a Chris Brown want to kick a whore
That make songs about the wet blockers when it rains and pours
Got a nigga shaking like the calmest fucking Haitian
After chronic masturbation, asking where Mary-Kate went
I want to be the reasons why all lesbians hate dick
I make this damn Bullwinkle the red moose
Game of duck-duck-duct tape with a dead goose
She running 'round this motherfucking dungeon, her legs loose
Until I accidentally get the saw to her head, oops

Victim, victim, honey, you're my fifth one
Honey on that topping when I stuff you in my system
Rape a pregnant bitch and tell my friends I had a threesome
You got a fucking death wish? I'm a genie, it'll get done
Nice to meet you, but it's more pleasant to eat you
With a leaf of salad and some dressing pouring out a teacup
Bitch, I'm Tyler the Creature, suck your feet up like a beach of leeches
Rubber more than the fucking bottom of a sneaker
Jeeper the fucking creeper, get your daughter and keep her
In the jeeps where the Wolf Gang rides around deeper
Take her to Ladera, now she's scared and you're embarrassed
Filled with terror, chop her legs off and tell her to run some errands
Put her eyes in a canteen, take her to the Berrics
Stare at Steve, say it costs ten to fuck Eric
Put her in the lake, her body sinks great, now it's time to fish her like Derek
Satan says we're dangerous, we're trading kids for angel dust
And snuff and sniff, and now that Michael Jackson's trying to suck our dick
Hippopot the fucking llamas, dead bodies, cheerleading squaders
Gave the team a bunch of fucking bees and the Keke Palmer
They will never catch him or catch up
They asked me what it was, I told them fuckers it was ketchup
Nutty like my Chex mix, she bleeding from her rectum
Odd Future wolves stirring ruckus, throwing sets up, yep

This the type of shit that make children break in apartments
When you tell a fucking orphan you don't love them 'til they heart thin
Where I cut her like a barber with a Parkinson's disorder
Store her in a portable freezer with me to Portland
I'll be the only wetback who ain't really touched the water
Cause I'll be too fucking busy tryna flirt with Jesus' daughter
Sicker than the starving Nigerian kids barfing
Odd Future Wolf Gang Nazi bar mitzvah
With your sister at the bar playing leg and arm twister
Evident that I'm the shit, I'm the Pooh like Tigger dick
I got these cracker doctors saying, "yeah Bob, this nigga's sick"
Animal safari, if I offend you I'm sorry
Because I'm the blackest skinhead since India Arie
I don't smoke weed, so no need for the matches
I said fuck coke and now I'm snorting Hitler's ashes
I plan on either dying for suicide or my asthma
Being the only bastard in a box logo casket
Rashes on my dick from licks of shishkabob Sagets
In some Kanye West glasses screaming out "fuck faggots"
Catch me in my attic taking photos of my dad's dick
Drop the beat here to make it extra climactic

What the fuck?
I'm speechless, that was, fuck
Shit, Tyler, you're gonna need some help
I'm not a.. fuck it, different subject
How's that girl you were telling me about?

Sawed-off, I eat those
These clothes, they free though
Straight from the back of the Supreme store
Don't give a fuck about these hoes--
Hold on, hold on, hold on, run that shit back!
I want the black kids to like me for this one, man
Trashwang! Woah!
Illegal CIV!
Trashwang! Yo!
Golfwang!
Trashwang!

Bitch, I'm with the fucking extras
Big dog, cup full of egg nog
Don't give a fuck 'bout shit but clips and Camp Flog Gnaw
Don't give a fuck about these hoes
They just slob knob in New York shows
Thirsty for the clips till I'm not flow
Pusha Georgia trip, bitch I got it poppin'
Me and Jasper going coffin shopping
Hoes see the board be a lotta boxes
Bitches see the boy and they mouth be frothing
Chain is glossing
Bitch

Trash Wang niggas
Thriller, we the killer
You can tell I'm Golf Wangin'
By the fucking stickers
OF or Wolf Gang
My niggas is my niggas
Don't let them skateboards fool you
Know niggas that pull triggers

Trash Wang, nigga, that's what's up
Trash Wang, nigga, roll a blunt

Wolf Gang, Golf Wang, yeah, them niggas is swell
Tighter than a straight nigga going to jail
Locked in a box, nigga, off them socks
I can finally afford the bail
My bitch isn't bad
She's pretty normal looking with a real nice ass
Now hop off my dick, what it be
Bitch, Mob, Task, Force, Lil, B, nigga
Speaking of the devil
Y'all niggas cornier than kettle
Y'all couldn't smoke crack or heroin
In a Black Ops plane and reach my level
Ate some bugs and I made some carats
Fuck y'all niggas' bullshit, y'all cherish
I'm 21, I threw a party but…
Difference is, y'all didn't have a Ferris
Wheel

55 grams in that blunt, nigga
I face that
Just copped that motherfucker bimmer nigga
I race that
Keep talking that shit
I'll pull your card
Get chipped like that nigga from Stomp The Yard
Don't fuck with Jasper
He a retard
Kill your motherfucking grandma and have your family scarred

Might fuck around and be a goat named Felicia
Sorry, got a little excited
It's probably all the meth Walt Jr. provided
Wolf Gang, up in this bitch
Red Riding Hood is pissed
Somebody tell Megan and Sara to come and suck a-

Beamers for days
White bitches is slaves
Niggas ain't with that warfare
My goons got aim
100 racks before 18
200 before I hit 6 feet
Nigga we bout it bout it
Yo bitch try to suck my dick

Holding up my chain
Versace Flocka Flame
Pull up in the tank
Spitting my verse wearing gold fangs
I'm loading up the nine shouting Golf Wang
Your bitch tattoo
It say my name
Sachee Santana
Nigga bird gang
Supreme team
Seventh veil
Paying all these ratchet's
Phone bills

Y'all niggas thought it was a game
We shutting the motherfucking shit down now nigga
It's over for you bitch niggas
I'm here with my nigga nasty Nak', Mr. Versace
Wolf Haley in this motherfucker
Jasper The Motherfucking Dolphin
And my nigga, Mike G
We taking this shit over
Its shut down for you bitch niggas
I got the Tec
Im bustin' at y'all bitches heads nigga
Fuck all you niggas
It's getting hot in here

Odd Future Wolf Gang bruh we Kill 'Em All
Golf Wang sticker on that Trash Wang
Nigga knows that OF popping -- Loiter Squad, Flog Gnaw
OFWGKTA yeah you niggas know them seven letters long
Yeah, Wolf Gang up in this bitch
Golf Wang up in this bitch
Litter Life up in this bitch
OFM, banging on your motherfuckin' FM
Nigga, fuck you thought this was, nigga?
Haha
What the fuck was that

Yo, who dat boy? Who him is?
Him that ni-guh, I swear
Stand out guy, him don't need no chair
Well, where the fuck him at? 'Cause nigga, I'm right here
I don't shop at the mall, all y'all just
Dumb mothafucka, I'm a goddamn artist
You can give me some markers and I'll draw you a closet
And you know that it's GOLF, bitch, gonna make the deposit
Nigga fresh to death like he got dressed in a coffin
Cons, overalls, and a striped shirt
The boy drips swag like a broken faucet
It's runnin', nigga, I'm runnin' shit
That cherry be the bomb like he ran in Boston
Won't stop 'til the cops surround him
One nigga jiggy and the other awesome
With his fuckin' face blown off, that's how they found him
It's Young T

Who dat boy? Who him is?
Nigga, who dat boy? Who him is?
Who dem boys? Nigga, who dem is, nigga?
Why you niggas feel like that?
Mad 'cause a nigga neck chill like that
You mad 'cause a nigga push wheel like that?
Why you puttin' bad vibes in the air like that?
Nigga, who dem boys?

Who dem is? Nigga, who dem is?
Who else step in this bitch this jig?
Who else your bitch say got a bick this big?
Who else came through with a wrist this flick?
Nigga, Guess my pants, do my dance
Spin around, bitch, you could kiss my ass
Never seen a nigga in this much Raf
Still doin' math when I miss my class
Nigga, never mind, was another time before Vince
Had the Gucci gold tips with the letterman
Nigga, dollar sign was my favorite number at the time
Fresh freshmen 'til they skipped my ass
Senior citizen, don't forget my pass
Been that nigga and you knew that there
Make the dick disappear, how she do that there?

Mad 'cause a nigga's neck chill like that
Why you puttin' bad vibes in the-?

Fuck the rap, I'm tryna own a planet
From my other fuckin' business ventures
These niggas these days
Teeth is glistenin', Jesus, Christmas
He just shittin', she exquisite, bitches be expensive
WANG$AP on the bumper sticker, fuck you niggas
Fuck global warming, my neck is so frío
I'm currently lookin' for '95 Leo
My mom say she worried because I'm so ill
I should stay in bed, but got too much bread
To make, she said watch my weight
So I stayed home and start eatin' some meals
Get out of my way, way, boy that's McLaren
That's 0 to 60 in 2 point nueve, I'm gone

Call me, call me, call me, uh
Call me, call me, call me
Call me, how you doin'?
Call me, my name is Lonely, nice to meet you
Here's my number, you can reach me, woo!
911, call me, call me some time
911, call me

I'm a 19 year old fucking emotional coaster with pipe dreams
Since Kanye tweeted telling people he's bumping all of my shit
These mothafuckas think I'm 'sposed to live up to something? Shit
I'm still jacking off and proceeding my life careless
Philly to Paris, I'm getting these weird stares
At skateparks and airports all in a year, it's weird
Yonkers dropped and left them craniums mindfucked
Now competition missing like that nigga my mom fucked
But that's a whole fucking different argument, shit, I got over it
And a couple bucks in my pocket, so now I could go buy
A couple hot pockets and grandma could stop cooking
Them nasty ass collard greens, pressure's on me like this top hat
Bastard intro, how the fuck I'm gonna top that?

"Tyler, you'll top it, you'll top that, you're a very capable individual"
"Okay, you guys caught me, I'm not a fucking rapist or serial killer, I lied"
"You know, you just want attention, you'll be fine"
"I try too hard, huh?"
"No, you don't"

Made a couple thou' and I just don't know what to buy yet
The 'preme shit is free and I don't drink, so fuck a wine set
Nigga, fuck a mindset, my brain is an obscenity
I'm fucked in the head, I lost my mind with my virginity
Oh, that's a triple three six, isn't he a devil worshiper
Cause I'm too fucking ignorant to do some research?
So no one else gets the respect that they deserve cause of you
To have a bunch a critics call my shit a bunch of horrorcore?
Like I didn't make "Parade" or "Inglorious"
Cause I'm too scared to tell my friends the way I really fucking feel?
Of course they only listen to lyrics about me pissin' off
Let me bust one in they mouth, I know they full of flavor

"Can't they just be happy for me like, a kid with nothing, living out his dreams? Why they got to fucking hate?"
"I think everyone's happy, everyone's immature, everyone loves you Tyler, you have to believe that."
"I don't even skate anymore, I'm too fucking busy, I can barely kickflip now."
"Why? Why is that? Do you not have any free time at your home?"
"What the fuck you mean I'm not talented? You see the shit that I've been doing?"
"I have, I mean you're a great person."
"I mean, I'm not that great of a rapper but as a whole, I'm pretty cool, right?"

Getting co-signs from rappers that I don't even like
What the fuck you want me to do? Start to gobble his mic?
Cause I don't listen to the Immortal of Tech-of-the-nique
And all this underground bullshit that's never gon' peak
On the Billboard Top 20 and Jam of the Week
I'd rather listen to Badu and Pusha the T
That's bull-of-the-sheet, but they want to critique
Everything that we, Wolf Gang, has ever released
The nigga that's in the mirror rapping, it's made for him
But they do not have the mindset that's same as him
I'm not weird, you're just a faggot, shame on him

"It is, but Tyler, you're going to have to cut down on that "faggot" word, that's very, that's a bad...
"I'm not homophobic."
"I mean, I don't think you are but..."
"Faggot."
"Alright, well, since the last time we..."
"The fuck is a good performance? I get on stage and I have as much fun as I can."
"I mean, you, you, it seems like you have fun. But your Twitter posts, just.. I mean, they're really random and it's ADD."
"Who doesn't have ADD..? Well, I don't."
"I mean, sometimes, you're just really out in the distance and we just want to know, what's the problem for this?"
"I wish Thebe was here."

Therapy's been sinning and niggas getting offended
They don't want to fuck with me cause I do not fuck with religion
You see, that's my decision, you fuckers don't have to listen
At 47 kids, I don't wanna see my name mentioned
College wasn't working and I wasn't working
So I was at home jerking off until my dick was hurting
But I was determined to be great, so those classes can wait
Now I'm living dreams that I wanted since eight
And can afford to get my mother something on her birthday
They claim the shit I say is just wrong
Like nobody has those really dark thoughts when alone
I'm just a teenager, who admits he's suicide prone
My life is doing pretty good, so that date is postponed for now
Wow, life's a cute bitch full of estrogen
And when she gives you lemons, nigga, throw 'em at pedestrians
I mean, you've been doing pretty good, I've seen that)
I still live in my grandma's house
Sell out a fucking show in London just to end up on couches
I hate my fucking life, but when I make that announcement
My hero calls my phone, just to put that in doubt then
And then I am confused if I want in or just out
My friends really think I'm playing when I say I need counseling
I sit in grandmother's living room and just pout
Odd Future came from the bottom
And it's gonna take a couple armed armies tryna stop 'em
The devil doesn't wear Prada, I'm clearly in a fucking white tee

Whoa, umm, alright, uh, so Syd was telling me you went to New York...

For your boy
I'm watching Freaks and Geeks with the trampoline on the floor
I'm tryna cop the new McLaren with the vertical doors, nigga

Money, money, money, money
Money ain't the motive
What's your name again? Nobody knows it
Don't speak to me nigga, you not impo'tant
I'm focused
They say I'm nutty, I'm picnic basket
I'm short of a sandwich, I'm peanut butter
Boyce Watkin's a faggot, please come and get me
Said I suck him at your neck, like a hickey, boy I'm sicky
Like a HIV victim, ain't nobody fuckin' with me
I got banned from New Zealand, whitey called me a demon
And a terrorist, goddammit, I couldn't believe in it
Ban a kid from a country, I never fall, never timber
But you fucked up as a parent, your child idol's a nigga
I clearly don't give a fuck, so you could run that shit back
And fuck your loud pack
And fuck your Snapchat
Cherry Bomb
The greatest fuckin' album since the days of sound
And that shit gon' pop
Just like that nigga that was never 'round
Damn, 'bout to drop
Gas 'em up, thick exhaust
Young T, came quick, hard to beat, dick is soft
We ain't lyin', we the truth, call him Simba, beats his hooves
Tyler, The Creator sweatin' Jesus juice
Put that fuckin' cow on my level, 'cause I'm raising the stakes
Mom, I made you a promise, it's no more section 8
When we ate it's the steaks, now our section is great
'Cause that's the level I'm at, my niggas pass 'em a plate
'Ye!

Why, oh why, why, why don't they like me?
'Cause Nike gave a lot of niggas checks
But I'm the only nigga to ever check Nike

Richer than white people with black kids
Scarier than black people with ideas
Nobody can tell me where I'm headin'
But I feel like Michael Jordan
Scottie Pippen at my weddin'
They say I'm crazy, but that's the best thing goin' for me
You can't Lynch Marshawn if Tom Brady throwin' to me
I made a million mistakes, but I'm successful in spite of 'em
I believe you like a fat trainer taking a bite or somethin'
I wanna turn the tanks to playgrounds
I dreamt of 2Pac, he asked me "Are you still down?"
Yeah, my nigga; it's on, it's on, it's on, it's on
I know they told they white daughters
"Don't bring home Jerome"
I am the free nigga archetype
I am the light and the beacon
You can ask the deacon
It's funny, when you get extra money
Every joke you tell just be extra funny
I mean, you can even dress extra bummy
Cocaine, bathroom break, nose extra runny
And I gave you all I got, you still want extra from me
Oxford want a full-blown lecture from me
And the Lexus pull up, errr, like hop, I hopped out, like wassup?
Err-err-err, step back, hold up, my nigga, you suck, hold up
I studied the proportions
Emotions runnin' at a Autobahn speed-level
Had a drink with Fear, and I was textin' God
He said "I gave you a big dick, so go extra hard"

I'm tryna cop the new McLaren
With the vertical doors
I'm watchin' Freak and Geeks
Got a trampoline in my room, damn

Hold your fuckin' horses
Niggas really fuckin' thought that T lost it
Like I bet it at a auction
Been exhausted
I been workin'
While y'all silly bros smoke like broken exhaust tips
Fuckin' losers

Hold your fuckin' ponies my homie
I'll whip your donkey by my lonely
It's Tunechi, homie, Master of Ceremonies
I knock 'em down, Domino effect, no pepperoni
I swear

This them Golf boys, like them Hot Boys
For the nine-nine and two-thousand
But its the two-thou'
And the one-four
And the one-five
Yo, what up Wayne?
Yeah, I'mma go hard like before 'caine
Got too much drive, need like ten lanes
Life is a broad, and she give brain
That's a dream car
Got a full tank of that same year I was born
That's that one-nine-nine-one
'Nother nigga like I, you won't find one
'Cause nigga I'm a god, a divine one
Tune

My trigger finger wise
Middle finger blind
So it's fuck A-N-Y-one
Fuck, skate, and die son
A hundred ways to die son
I'm starin' at a tramp-on-lean
Make my eye jump
Use Adderall like alarm clocks
Wake my high up
Stakes are high, well done, and prime cut; eat up
I stick my Rolie in her mouth, let the time come
She got hair like Sheneneh, and eyes like Wanda
Oh my goodness

Wayne, them bitches ugly
These niggas colder than Tommy' buddy
Ye, we hittin' models
Like Tony Parker be hittin' bottles
Bitch, I'm goin' harder than yellow cabbies stoppin' for Lionel
They be duckin' us niggas, shout out to Donald Sterling
Boy, lets get a scrimmage
And cut some niggas
I'll bring the Clippers
And a couple owners that's kinda German
You bring the nooses
And a couple trees, where the money grow
And get bodies burnin'
'Cause I'm tryna hang like I'm Mr. Cooper
Or Jews in Berlin
Or some niggas from Alabama, Birmingham
My new music's all over the street like Erick Sermon was
Fuck us
Maybe we should team up
Anti-Golf boys
'Cause I don't fuck with me either

Son you need Jesus
But I heard he left Sunset, to go on tour with Yeezus
Well, I'm prayin' for the new Yeezys
And you pussies prayin' that we squash the beef, like zucchini
I know; it ain't gain, nor fame, nor tame
Or lame, nor strange

Nah faggot, it's Golf Wang

Okay, okay, okay, okay
Okay, okay, oh

You live in my dream state
Relocate my fantasy
I stay in reality
Anytime I count sheep
That's the only time we make up
You exist behind my eyelids, my eyelids
I don't wanna wake up

20/20, 20/20 vision
Cupid hit me, cupid hit me with precision, I
Wonder if you look both ways
When you cross my mind, I said, I said
I'm sick of, sick of, sick of, sick of chasing
You're the one that's always running through my day dreams, I
I can only see your face when I close my eyes
Can I get a kiss?
And can you make it last forever?
I said I'm 'bout to go to war
And I don't know if I'ma see you again
I don't know if I'ma see you again

I said, okay, okay, okay, okie dokie, my infatuation
Is translatin' to another form of what you call it? — Love
Oh yeah, oh yeah, oh yeah, I ain't met you
I've been looking, stop the waiting
'fore I stop the chasing, like a alcoholic
You don't understand me, what the fuck do you mean?
It's them rose tinted cheeks, yeah it's them dirt-colored eyes
Sugar honey iced tea, bumblebee on the scene
Yeah I'd give up my bakery to have a piece of your pie
Yeugh!

Cupid hit me, cupid hit me with precision, eye

Okay, okay, okay, oh
La la, la la la la, la la
La la, la la la, la la
La la, la la la la
One more time?

Nigga had the fucking nerve to call me immature
Fuck you think I made Odd Future for?
To wear fucking suits and make good decisions?
Fuck that nigga, Wolf Gang

Who the fuck invited Mr. I Don't Give a Fuck
Well, you fucking up, and truthfully I had enough
Full of shit, like I ate that john
Come on kids, fuck that class and hit that bong
Let's buy guns and kill those kids with dads and mom
With nice homes, 41k's, and nice ass lawns
Those privileged fucks got to learn that we ain't taking no shit
Like Ellen Degeneres clitoris is playing with dick
I'm jealous as shit, cause I ain't got no home meal to come to
So, if you do, I'm throwing fingers out screaming "fuck you"
I got ten of these Kennedy's
Not Dom, but if I was a Dahm, I would be Jeffery
'preme hat the color of a leprechaun with leprosy
I'm fucking 'bout it, 'bout it, like I'm Master P in '96
It's fucking immaculate, the way your daughter smacking dicks
Surprised she hasn't taken gymnastic dick inside her alley oop
The Golf Wang hooligans, is fucking up the school again
And showing you and yours that breaking rules is fucking cool again
I'm going harder than a midget jumping over me
Chronic youth, I'm shoving blunt wraps in bitches ovaries
Punches to the stomach where that bastard kid supposed to be
Fuck a mask, I want that ho to know it's me, ugh

Wolf Gang, Wolf Gang
It's the Wolf Gang, Wolf Gang
It's the Wolf Gang, it's the Wolf Gang
It's the Wolf Gang, Golf Wang
Wolf Gang, triple six crew
Wolf Gang kill them

My love is gone for you mami, you could ride in hearses
I'm sick in the brain dumb bitch, can you nurse this?
You told me life would never, ever, ever get this perfect
Then you smoke a J of weed, and take his kids to the churches
Uh, fuck church, they singing and the shit ain't even worth it
In the choir, whores and liars, scumbags and the dirt, bitch
You told me God was the answer
When I ask him for shit, I get no answer, so God is the cancer
I'm stuck in triangles, looking for my angel
Kill me with a chainsaw, and let my balls dangle
Triple six is my number, you can get it off my Tumblr

It was hilarious, well it ain't fucking funny now
I'll push this fucking pregnant clown into a hydrant stuck in the ground
I step through the stomach, replace the baby with some fucking pounds
"My baby daddy shoot bricks, the nigga also shoot rounds"
Cause if I shoot blanks, oops, thanks
I'm right back in it dead yummy and her mildew stank

Free Earl, that's the fucking shit
And if you disagree, suck a couple pimple-covered dicks
Um, Wolf Gang, that's the fucking clique
Golf Wang kill them all nigga, triple six
Fuck 2DopeBoyz, all them niggas bitches
We don't need y'all, The Fader's who we really fucking with, bitch

And we don't fucking make horrorcore, you fucking idiots
Listen deeper than the music before you put it in a box, Wolf Gang

Papa ain't call even though he saw
But now my balls, balls deep in this broad's jaw
Swallow girl, it's just nut
Bitches scared to let me smash on they ass
Yeah, they heard I'm fuckin' nuts like the swag of a fag
Like me and Tekeli was gagging in the back of the cabin
Camp Flog Gnaw, nigga, you can tell by the badge
I'm sick of hacking and coughing, I'm often this fucking awesome
I'm animal, Noah's arking, all from this rapping nonsense
Get shit poppin' like Peter's pores during puberty
Take bets on how quick Tyler can reach maturity
Cussing out Siri like a waitress with no patience
Oh, you want a tip bitch, well here's my dick for gratiturity, bitch

Shut 'em down!
Nigga, shut 'em down!

I tumble-crush on huzzy sluts, give money up then nutty butt
Professor Nutty Buddy Klump gets petty when you touch his lunch
Like, what the fuck? I'm drunk as fuck, turn the fucking music up
So I can't hear these stupid fucks, talk-no-walk, let you discuss
You're talking too much, Who the fuck are you to us? Uterus
I put that on my pubes and nuts, if I don't begin moving up
I'm shooting up, you and her crew on turf, new desert
I can see the bitch in a nigga through his shirt
I can smell the whore on a bitch when she walk around my crew to flirt
It's on ya' shoulder, lose the dirt, yeah, it's the movement first
Fuck a human nurse! I'm ill I used this earth to infuse the birth
Of my scrotum on the Channel 10 news, my only motive is to
Skip to my Lou, get hip to the pew
You can drink piss and eat a dick in a few, the sickening view
Of visuals, woo, I'll eat your ribs, I'm a wolf
Then meet your kids after school, and give them drugs cause it's cool, fucker

Hodgy, fuck this beat, nigga, let's smoke weed
That shit I need, be the shit that's green
A little purple and pink, come get some Swisher Sweets
About three or four more than needed be
I got a eighth I could face, I got a blunt flavored grape
I hate the grape, I could taste it when I'm inhaling the vapes
You could smell us in places when we walk in our clothing is always covered in flakes
Enough for two shake blunts; and what the fuck is this? Uh...
I think this Mary is laced; my heart is beating at paces
That Pacquiao can't relate I'm fucking faded like gradients
Shit, I'm stuck like tape that's super glued
To the center of Kelly Price first waist
It's like my first date with Mrs. Mary, the shit is scary
The paranoia from this marijuana's very heavy, I'm lifted
Fainted by my fifth hit, Lionel, pass the sherm
Let's use the Philly as a dipstick for this bath salt, you dipshit

Here's my number
You can reach me, woo!

911, call me some time

Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
My thirst levels are infinity and beyond
Sippin' on that lemonade, I need a Beyoncé
Can't see straight, these shades are Céline Dion
Sucks you can't gas me up, shout out to Elon
Musk, yeah, I got a sold out show
Crowd wild out but don't matter 'cause you not front row
I've been lookin' for a keeper, listen to the speaker
If you fit description, hit me on my beeper
At that 911

Please bang my line

Call me
You should call me

Chirp, chirp
Woke up in the 'burbs, 'burbs, with the birds, birds
Where you used to come and get me with the swerve, swerve
These days you gotta find time
Even the night line
Work line
Dial nine

Five car garage
Full tank of the gas
But that don't mean nothing, nothing
Nothin', nothin', without you shotgun in the passenger
I'm the loneliest man alive
But I keep on dancing to throw 'em off
I'm gon' run out of moves 'cause I can't groove to the blues

I can't even lie, I've been lonely as fuck
Old lonely ass nigga
Forreal, you need to go somewhere, like, get some bitches or something
Old weird ass nigga
I can't even lie, I've been
Lonely, lonely, lonely, lonely

They say the loudest in the room is weak
That's what they assume, but I disagree
I say the loudest in the room
Attention seeker, public speaker
Oh my God, that boy there is so fuckin' lonely
Writin' songs about these people
Who do not exist, he's such a fuckin' phony
One thing I know, is that I wanna
Win so bad, but I'm not Chicago
Heart is low, it's real low, it's so low
You can't lift me up, I'm like Gallardo
From the start it's been real dark
It's been so dark, I guess that you could call me charbroiled, huh
I'm playin' like Hasbro
I'm really Saari, call me Arto
Crashed the McLaren, bought me a Tesla
But what the fuck else do you want from me?
That is the only thing keepin' me company
Purchase some things until I'm annoyed
These items is fillin' the void
Been fillin' it for so long
Current battle as an adult
My partner is a shadow
I need love, do you got some I could borrow?
Fuck it, I could find some tomorrow
But that never comes
Like a vasectomy, what have I done?
I got the talent, the face and the funds
Cupid actin' stupid
Do you got another number I could call?
Never had a pet
I've never had a pet
There's more fish in the sea
But I never had a goldfish to begin with
I never had a dog
So I've never been good with bitches
'Cause I never threw a ball, fetch
I never had a pet, that's where it stems from, I bet
Treat me like direct deposit
Check in on me sometime
Ask me how I'm really doin'
So I never have to press that 911

Ohh! Damn! Damn!

Part 1 - FUCKING YOUNG

Day that I met you girl
I knew that it was something special
And this is where the story and confusion begin
Cause I was at nirvana but I had to pretend that I wasn't

Fuck, 'cause

And when temptation calls my phone, I never pick up
And girl, you stole my heart but you're too fucking young
This is more than a crush, I just might be in love

And you fill a void that was once missing

Fuck, cause

When you're 35, I'll be 41, and when I'm 27, you'll be 21
Yo, this is dumb, and when that time comes for that 1-8
I'll probably run, cause I'm fucking terrified
Yo this is dumb,you should find someone else
I'm not the one for you, shit, I'm still growing up by myself
And mentally you're older than me and that shit doesn't help
Cause if they see you with T, they'll think T needs some help
So when you mention "hang," I'm thinking about a tree and a belt
And I don't want no relation, shit no relation
Ship when my dick is longer than my attention-
Span, it's gonna suck your shit, it's that kitchen fan
It splattered on me like my dick in my hand
What? I'm still fucking off, not good at ducking off
Because I found a goose that I like, but I'm still running off
She gon' want a nest, that's why I cannot get fucking caught
That's a scary word, you could save that shit for the birds
And girl, you stole my heart but you're too fucking young)
Funny thing about this is, by the time you hear this
It won't even matter, I'll be in the clear, it's T and Uncle Charlie

Part 2 - PERFECT

Boy I know, that we could be more
Than just friends, but you're scared

I know that there could be
Somethin' for you and me
What's your philosophy?
You're scared, scared
And I exit and wait a while
Just say the word
See the answers are all there
But I'm just too blind to see
You and I are cut from different fabric
I wonder why, I wonder why, girl
Don't be too material to see
Somehow, this world is such a struggle just to be
Fuck 'em all baby, it's just you and me

But you're too fuckin' young
And girl I know that you're the one for me
Fuck, cause you're too fuckin' young
And it hurts, it fuckin' hurts
Cause you're too fuckin' young
And girl I know that you're the one
That you're the one, for me
And girl I know that you're the one for me, yeah

I rock

Uhh, addicts arise, when I arrive
In this cracked crack fag back slab in disguise
Fat sack of knives in the passenger side, bitch
Reach for the door, get your access denied

I'm not an asshole I just don't give a fuck a lot
The only time I do is when a bitch is screaming "Tyler, stop"
The big bad wolf to me you're just a minor fox
Red riding is getting some of this wolfly odder cock

We the niggas you scared of, like bad dentists
Flow is anthemic, dirty like it's plants in it
Sick, spit a pandemic, crack and cancer mixed with cannabis
To have a bitch, ready to stab a clit with some glass and shit

Your whole gang will be diminished, Bunch got the Brady's in it
Spit sick shit like my saliva got the rabies in it
Fuck rap, I'll be a landlord so I can rape the tenant's daughter
Leave my house with a new stomach, and a baby in it

Face it, me and Ace's is sick like malaria carriers

AUGH, oww, oww, oww, oww, oww, oww, oww, stop!

Jim Carrey her to the cemetery to bury her
Listen busters, scarier when I finger fuck her
After I dig her up and then eat her out with a bit of mustard

Took karate, mommy told me "Tyler toughen up"
Rihanna haircut, somebody tell Chris Brown to fuck me up
Had to teach the bitch manners, now I gotta learn her
I'll beat the fuck out your bitch anonymous, Ike Turner

Over, sloppy seconds is my preference
Except for when I'm feeding on the flesh of a pedestrian
Nessy loch monster stop Will he though? Probably not
Silly hoes lick my balls like FIFA lollipops

Get the certain tingle, eating Haagen Dazs
With some soccer moms where they like to fucking sit and mingle
Watch an Animal Planet document on the Eagles
In the flyest '06 Supreme beanie, Sigel

Your grind's feeble, I'm regal, really, I'm Willy Smith
I am Legend, a snicker dick in a vanilly chick
Come take a stab at it faggot, I pre-ordered your casket
This is known as a classic, yeah that chapped lips crack shit

Hat is always forest so the bitches call me Gump
But compliment her tits and then its off to hump her
Fuck her in a Hummer while I rape her then I put her in a slumber
It's not a figure of speech when I tell you that I dumped her

Known narcissists, sipping on arsenic
Carved carcasses in the garage, don't park in it
Hard as finding retarded kids at Harvard
It's Wolf Gang barking keep you up like car alarms and shit

Over the edge, yeah I hide in a potato sack
Cause I'm cold as ice like Anasia when she fucking Traq
I'm the type to put you down to bring myself up
So when I rape a bitch I hold her down and get my best nut

The reincarnation of '98 Eminem
60 Crip and Grizzly and some RMK Denim
Pay attention I'm stabbing your women friends, like a gentlemen
Then dipping with the fucking pen to go sin again

White girl, you can ask her what the dick be like
At monster madness doing drive by's on a fucking fixie bike
Fuck it moron, snorting oxycontin, wearing cotton
Oxymoron like buff faggots playing sissy dykes

This the shit that get cripple bitches to hop
Dirty crack pipes lit, bullshit to stop, halt
Boss broke, spouse choke, blouse open
Sly's little shop of horrors, now showing

I hate gays, gangbangers and fucking jerkers
Unless it's gay gangbangers, that's fucking jerkers
Whoa yo, yo.. no homo, I'm not gay, faggot
Odd Future Wolf Gang, Wu-Tang banging in your system
Probably banging in your sister with my children swimming in her system
Let me say this shit in slow-mo, homo
You don't fucking skate, take off that box logo

What the fuck I look like, saying I'm sorry
To a bunch of fucking fags that can't potentially harm me?
I ain't never gonna bow down to your expectations
By the way, I got sixty fucking wolves that'll guard me
That skate hard, Thrash black hoodies, try something
Make sure your fuckin' feelings end up up in a Glad bag
Fuck all your opinions, I'm tyin' 'em with a shoestring
And fuck the fat lady, it's over when all the kids sing

Kill people, burn shit, fuck school
I'm fucking radical, nigga, I'm fucking radical
I'm fucking radical, I'm motherfucking radical

Odd Future Wolf Gang, we came together cause we ain't have nobody else. Do you? You just might be one of us. Are you?

Fuck cops, I'm a fucking rock star
Rebel and defiance makes my motherfucking cock hard
Fuck pigs, fuck guards, all some fucking retards
Fuck school, I'm a fuck up? Fuck Harvard
I ain't got no motherfucking daddy, he ain't teach me shit
Child support ain't come, that faggot still ain't bought me anything
Fuck the fat lady, it's over when all the kids sing

Fuck school

See, we can be ourselves, but you gotta let us know
You gotta let 'em go, let 'em go
You gotta let 'em go
You gotta let 'em go...

"Nigga, fuck you."
"I'm just trying to help you man, trust me."
"Look, I mature day after day nigga. You don't know shit, you're a fucking therapist."
"Whatever."

Part 1 - PartyIsntOver

Uhm, I said, the party isn't over
We could still dance, but I don't have no rhythm
So fuck it, take a chance with me
The party isn't over, we could still dance girl
But I don't have no rhythm
So fuck it, take a chance with a nigga
Like me, like me

Part 2 - Campfire

Yeah, uhm
All I needed was a stick, grab the marshmallows
Motherfuckers getting lynched and burned
I earned it, my Flog Gnaw badge is looking good
On this brand new jacket
The donuts on the flag waving over the cabin
Now grab them graham crackers and pass them over here
Hurry, quickly I need a piece of Hersheys
Darker than the corners of the bushes we be lurking
I centered the mellow over the graham
Heated it too long now, it's melting over my hand
Fuck it, I'll bite it, I burnt it, but I liked it
Camping with my niggas, its so fucking exciting

We're making smores by the campfire
Camp flog gnaw, golf wang summer

Sat by the fire
To witness gentle, but radical
Transformation ceased to be mindless
Create our own sweetness
At last growing the heart

Yo bring the bass back in
Yeah, hehe
Who ate all the fuckin chocolate?
Oh that's Domo fat ass, haha
I ain't trying to go home, really

Part 3 - Bimmer

You remind me of my bimmer
A lot of trunk space, the perfect two seater
And you got a lot of drive, I’m trying to keep up
But it's not a lot of miles on ya meter
See your ignition, baby girl I'm trying to key up
And your head lights are off, I'm trying to see 'em
So let me start it up and smash

Pop some Tame Impala, your man got a lame Impala
And I'm sharing Slurpees and you ain't even begin to swallow
You’re fucking nuts, green top we coupled up
Run my fingers through em as you wax and buff my muffler
Cause I fingered you, you think the fucking ring is coming up?
Maybe, I don’t know, I think you’re chill
Riding on my pegs, and my back against your legs
And a seatbelt is needed if I get between 'em, yeah

You ain’t gotta lie to kick it darling
It’s cool we’re moving slow

You got a lot of drive I’m trying to keep up
You remind me of my bimmer, smash

Where you been, man?
Oh, I had a drop off to make real quick. Hey, have you seen Salem?
Oh she with that new dude, Wolf, or, Darnell, whatever his name is
Fuck that nigga, man. Hey you know where they went?
I seen 'em going down by the lake
You good man? You need some sherm? I got some
I got a can of these baked beans too

Can we talk on the phone or something
I hope you pick up your phone
I'd like to talk to you
I hope you answer
Yeah, I hope you answer
Because when I call

Hey Dad, it's me, um...
Oh, I'm Tyler, I think I'd be your son
Sorry, I called you the wrong name, see, my brain's splitting
"Dad" isn't your name, see "Faggot's" a little more fitting
Mom was only twenty when you ain't have any fucks to spare
You Nigerian fuck, now I'm stuck with this shitty facial hair
Also stuck with a beautiful home with a case of stairs
So you not being near fucking fire-started my damn career
But fuck it, I got Clancy, he gave me the chance to see
A world I wasn't supposed to, I'm stoked that I didn't know you
But sucks you ain't give a fuck and considered a sperm donor now
The fuck is an Okonma? I'm changing my shit to Haley
And I just ain't being passive, nigga
You a fucking faggot, nigga
Got a show on Monday, guess who ain't getting no passes, nigga?
But if I ever had the chance to ask this nigga
And call him...
I hope he answer

Suck my fucking dick and swallow this case of nuts
Ace hates your guts, I'm a selfish fuck
And I ain't sharing green as if I'm facing blunts
Frank is out the closet, Hodgy's an alcoholic
Syd might be bipolar, but fuck it, I couldn't call it
Supposed to be gone til November but quickly came back in August
I left two months through September to clearly remember all this
I would like to tell my grandma, but she just nostalgia
I'll call her number
But she won't answer

You claim to hate my fucking guts
But say I'm on a island in Thailand and I was wilding
And, if I got stranded had to man up and hold my nuts
And hope that I could live off salt water and fucking coconuts
Phone ain't got no service -- this 3G is fucking worthless
Day is getting dark like the area's turning urban
You'll be fucking nervous like me inside of a church is
But, I'mma get in contact regardless, and

That last verse was about this girl. Ha ha

Went to Six Flags, six fags came up
And said "Ayo! Can we get a pic?" I said no
And they said "Oh! It's Wolf Gang, "Yonkers", Goblin is my shit though"
Now I'm like, fuck, I don't want to be an asshole
So I'm sitting there posing with Travis, Devon
With a fake smile like her titties was drawing it on
So fucking annoyed cause I missed Goliath
Cause some kid said I was there, then they caused a riot
Now I'm surrounded by a 25 hound of fuckers tryna get a photo
All because they noticed the top with the box logo
And them fucking ears, guarantee they didn't even hear Bastard
They bandwagon-jumped me from a pogo
I'm going fucking loco, "Hey, Tyler, can I...?"
No, bitch, don't you see me tryna buy a fucking churro?
"But Tyler, you're my hero, I used to get bullied
Until I heard "Radicals," the last part got to me
See, I used to give a fuck until my cock would bleed
Now I'm the happiest I think I'll ever ever be
My life is just like yours, no father
My momma must have forgot to stop with a popped condom
In school I was the one thinking outside boxes
So everybody in them would say that I got problems
So when I heard you say it, I said it back like fuck 'em
You're an inspiration to niggas like me
Not the niggas who like you just cause of lyrics and beats
I'm talking 'bout the niggas who don't know where they're going to be
I heard the song "Bastard" right in the moment of heat
Not in summer, but of course I was holding a heat
Gun on the edge of my feet, I heard that first piano chord
And it drew me in like predators carrying treats
Then I said to myself, fuck, is he speaking to me?
See, me and you, we go together like snare and a beat
I mean snare and a kick drum, see my forearm?
I carved OF on it this morning with a glass shard
That's hard, that scar from playing air guitar
Wish I had a basement meant for me to hide you
We could play X-Box and listen to "In Search Of..." and eat donuts
Over conversating bout what church does
Come up with weird-ass videos with roach bugs
I'm straight edge too, so no drugs on this trip
And Raquel that bitch, you should've killed that bitch
See, if you can't have her then he shouldn't neither
And if I can't have you then she shouldn't either
No one should see you, but me in your t-shirt
Odd Future, Wolf Gang, Golf Wang, Flog Gnaw, free Earl mobbing
I know it seems like just I'm slobbing on your knob
I ain't got a job and I went out and bought Goblin about 5 times
I like tie-dyed tees or just plain white tees
I like pants that's cut, I like words like "fuck"
I got your pics on my wall with the mouth cut out
And I hit you on Twitter about 10 minutes a day
And my boys think I'm gay cause I play "VCR"
In my car all alone speakers waking up neighbors..."
All right, my nigga, calm down, it's getting weird, take this pic
So I can get on Colossus, line as slow as molasses
And I appreciate the fact that you would suck on my dick
But I'm not gay so it's awkward, now I'm grouchy like Oscar
After spilling some shit on his newest pair of beige Dockers
I'm grateful that it worked, I attacked and I conquered
"Yeah whatever but I had a fucking blast at that concert
I was at the Boston one, I got a t-shirt from Sagan
The one that say "Sagan Lockhart" and when you came out to "Sandwitches"
That's when my fucking boycrush got started"

Just take this fucking picture man, shit...

Don't kill a rose
Before it could bloom
Fly, baby, fly
Out the cocoon

You don't have to lie
I can smell it in your eyes
That there's something more to say, baby
Them words
Damn, run me back, yeah

If I could, if I could
If you could
Find the words to say
Find the words
In the garden
Shed

Garden shed, garden shed, garden shed, garden shed
For the garden
That is where I was hidin'
That was real love I was in
Ain't no reason to pretend
Garden shed, garden shed, garden shed
Garden shed for the garçons
Them feelings that I was guardin'
Heavy on my mind
All my friends lost
They couldn't read the signs
I didn't wanna talk and tell 'em my location
And they ain't wanna walk
Truth is, since a youth kid, thought it was a phase
Thought it'd be like the phrase; "poof," gone
But, it's still goin' on
Big fan of the beige tan
Polka dot nose, how it goes
Had to keep it on the subwoofer
A couple butterflies wanna float
But I was always like, "Eh"
Barely interested, but bagged just to brag to my boys like, "Bruh"
This is a crucial subject matter
Sensitive like cookin' batter
'Til the temperature that's risin'
Steppin' on that ladder, tryna
Grab the rings of Saturn, I'ma
Planet by the time you hear this
Shit and chatter 'bout the heat
It will not fuckin' matter

Knock-knock, mothafuck it's me, Mr. Clusterfuck
What, when, where, how, like who gives a fuck
Golf Wang M-O-B, mopping niggas ante up
Ain't been this fucking sick since brain cancer ate my Granny up
Rest in peace or lie in it, life ain't got no light in it
Darker than that closet that nigga Frankie was hiding in
Open it, dope in it, Bobby where's my fucking pipe?
Dress my little dick as Ike, twenty says I hit your wife
This is life, truthfully I just want to fly some kites
Grab Salem and Slater and go around, riding bikes
Get some ice cream, Golf Wang Roscoe's for the night
To skate around and do annoying shit that older peeps despise
Nigga fuck it though, going hard as riga mo
Got a nigga dollars and a couple cracker kids at shows
Cracked a couple kids in the head with this cast
Had a blast out Europe, had a Swedish bitch licking toes
That's how it goes, designing clothes
Cats on everything, cats on everything
You think all this money will make a happy me?
But I'm 'bout as lonely as crackers that supermodels eat
Everybody's sparking but me, and I keep coughing
Can't keep calm in this spot's hot box and I'm getting nauseous
Hop in the car, ride to Saugus, and head straight to the office
Pissed off at Jasper because that's some faggot shit called "Pink Dolphin"
I roll here on a mean unicorn
Green hat, Vans, Golf top is the team uniform
Downing that Capri Sun, tighten my bandana up
Something like a lez, I'm forgetting my damn manners cause

I am the cowboy on my own trip
And I am the cowboy on my own trip
And I am the cowboy

When you're alone thoughts start coming in
Punching in that dark lock box and they start rummaging
Shit you've got to battle with, wishing they could skedaddle
But it makes your shadow say none, fun and grab the gun again
I needed to get out of the house
So I hit the Dead Sams, and we went biking it out
In a black hoodie, with an Arizona and a bag of Skittles
Just to see what all that fucking hype is about
Now everytime you see a roach you think of me, ay?
Cause everytime I see one I think what his parents would say
In court saying I ate him, I wasn't present that day
I was with Whitney smoking, sitting at the dock of the bay

Do you know how weird it is knowing I make a bunch of cheese
While my friends can't afford little pizzas from Little Caesars
And their whole goal is to roll up and smoke bowls
So I don't feel bad when they not eating
Wolf Haley got more methods than Pinkman
I'm never civil, fuck Lincoln, 'Preme out the bag it's no wrinkles
I'm okie dokie and loopy and booboo nana and caca
If you think I'm fucking koo-koo, try talking to my shrink then

"Hey..."
"Bitch."
"I'm right here."
"Yo, who's that..?"
"That's Salem, that's my girlfriend. You stay the fuck away from her alright?"

"So, you tell me that everything just isn't going well..?"
"Well, first off..."

My only problem is death
Fuck heaven, I ain't showing no religion respect
Brain damage, therapy's the only thing I regret
Talking to me is like a fucking body missing a neck
But, I'm surprised I ain't pop off my top off
Life is a bitch and my cock's soft, the Glock's cocked
My hands tremble, my finger slipped, the wall's red
Her life is fucked, she's sad now, her son is dead

I told her I'm her worst nightmare
This is hell, you don't ever gotta fight fair
My spirit floats around in the night air
Or in your day dreams, that's how death seems
Or in your daydreams, that's how death seems

When I was younger, I would smile a lot
I'm getting older, getting bolder, but a wiser top
Now I'm drunk driving, lap's full of Budweiser tops
Life is a movie and you're just a prop
They begged me to stop, but I listen like deaf drums
Love? I don't get none, that's why I'm so hostile to the kids that get some
My father called me to tell me he loved me—
I'd have a better chance of getting Taylor Swift to fuck me
Annoying and I'm ugly, most niggas wanna punch me
I'm surprised the fucking doctor even touched me
Feel like Humpty, you hoping that I'll fall? Fuck y'all
I'm Ace, I'm parentless, odd, kinda arrogant
Ignorant as fuck, offend people for the hell of it
Because I am the devil, fucker, get on my level
Doughnuts and keys and kick-flips, Supremes and markers
My life is Ms. Mon-unique Parker, but a little darker
I'll see you in a couple, OF

"Tyler, here's some water, man
You seem a little tense... how's Thebe?"

All because a nigga just don't give a fuck
Parents wanna blame me all because their kid is fucking up
But fuck that, you're a shitty parent, face it, suck it up
That's what you should've did before that nigga bust, huh
Feel like I missed my little brother growing up
Feel like my little brother missed his brother growing up
But this is Golf Wang, like he missed his family growing up
I got a little taller since the last time you seen me, bruh
Now I'm emo, so fuck it, I'm pouring up
My nigga Jasper said if I drink and get drunk enough
I won't feel the feelings I be feeling when I'm sobered up
But that's a fucking lie, why would he say that? I'm
Don't look at me, I'm 6'5", about to fucking cry
About another guy, but this is Golf Wang, do or die
I finally had a family
Domo's in another state, and where the fuck is Riley?
Now you niggas wanna be nice because the labels wanna sign me
But before the co-signing and you fuckers couldn't find me?
Fuck that! I hope you die in a fiery death
One ear I got kids screaming, "O.F. is the best"
The other ear I got Tron Cat, asking where the bullets and the bombs at
So I can kill these levels of stress, shit
They say that I'm shock value
How about you hop off cock and turn volume down?
All I want is her support, but no, it's the fights at home
When mommy cusses out cousin, some knifes get shown
Now she's really fuckin' pissed, so the knives get thrown
And hit her in her fucking neck, now her throat's all gone
Looking like a fucking monster from the Twilight Zone
Then they wonder why I stay at Travis' pad with a backpack
For the whole week, full of plastic-wrapped black tees
And deodorant like his house is my home
I could live with the same hat
And the same flat-screen TV watching Flapjack
And the same bacon and waffles on a nice Saturday
Where I skate with the same fucking friends that
Didn't give a fuck about fame or a name, oh
"Message from The GZA, oh, another one from Plain Pat"
Email full of emails, I never write back
Ain't kill myself yet, and I already want my life back

One shot, two shots, one gun, two cops
I'm blowin' them flu shots, couldn't kill me with two top rockers
You're on the side of faggots and cock blockers
I'm on the side of bad-ass kids and the top notches
I'm Barney, dinosaur Harley of a human
Cause I'm shrooming with the bangers and the carneys
You niggas can't harm me cause y'all know that
Nigga, get off me

I don't know, it's like I'm a different person at times
It's like I got a fucking voice in my head
Tron Cat

I was 16 when we first laid eyes
Scrawny little fucker, yeah, I was that guy
And you was down for the weekend
I was down for the greetings
And you eyes the same color shit that Jasper be chiefing
Couple freckles on ya noses, roses made you blush
Gentleman I was like I wasn't tryna fuck
But it was my first offical date so I was stuck, like
It was past curfew, and we was at the Grove
And it was raining, and I had to be home
And then you grab my hand, talking about tryna get home safe or something
All I remember was your motherfucking face

I play in your hair as you rub on my ears
Then we awkwardly stare until our lips locked
Then we awkwardly stared because our lips locked
Now it's awkward in here because our lips locked
Feels like i’m floating in air
Can't believe that this dare turned into a reality when our lips locked
Man, this feels like a dream because our lips locked
You officially put my feelings inside a Ziplock bag

You gotta a nigga sprung, whenever I’m holding your hand and
Making eye contact I feel like the damn man
Cause even though I am and get round of applauses
I’m insecure and start to think that I do not stand chance
But, moments, wish that I can own it or lease it or clone it
Cause holding your fingertips is golden
I fucking love you, now treat my palms like a bowling ball and
Grip and keep holding on girl

You got a nigga...Wait
Don't think this is going to work
Things got complicated and a couple feelings got hurt
I haven’t talked to you in a couple of days
I got too comfortable
And started to think that we was really a couple
But hey, at least there was time spent
But by the time you hear this you won't know what these rhymes meant
But when you realize, its awkward, your name still my password
So I’m always fucking reminded
You got a nigga sprung

You're my girl.. you're my girlfriend, you're my girl girlfriend
You're my girl, you're my girlfriend, you're my girlfriend
You're my girl.. oooo
You're my, you're my Girl
Ooooo girlfriend... girlfriend..
You're my girlfriend you're my girl girlfriend you're my girl
You're my girlfriend

Crack fucked up the world, and I wonder if they realized the damage
I mean, they come from an era who made a lot of money of that shit
I wonder if it fucked with their conscience
It fucked with me being out there, I couldn't stand it
I couldn't stand seeing people fucking themselves up like that on the shit
And that's where the money came from

48, 48, 48 states I get it in
They call me Mr. Treat Your Nose
If you really need some blow
I can get it for the low

Shit is getting warmer on that corner
Gotta watch out for them 5-0 foreigners
Your mother is a goner
I warned you before you supersized my fries with that dollar
You got a daughter, shit's getting harder
The only thing you wanna bunk her was your freedom
You can't afford to get caught up but you in too deep
And the seashore ain't saw ya
You got a mother, she don't support you
But you bought her a new house cause you love her
Growing up you barely had a roof
Now you got a coupe and it doesn't have a roof
I guess you’re accustomed what you’re used to
So you bought two, nigga
They coming for you, nigga
Niggas be hating I'm doing them bitches
Like Susan and Karen be doing your pockets
And running the man and he's losing his fucking mind and it’s all an illusion
Who was alludin' all of this potent
I am the reason your family is using and shooting up, it’s my fault
You can blame me motherfucker, for killing your aunties and uncles
The hustle and hunger, all I wanted was a cheeseburger
And a little chain, tuck, didn’t realize this game fucked up some lives
“Oh, how’s mine?” -- my conscience eats it up all the time
But other than that I’m fine, I got a little money in my pocket

Nigga, we broke as fuck
Homie got a chop shop I stole that truck
And I sold that dope
Motherfuckers hope this nigga go broke
But like my work I give no fucks, I’m sorry
She could have been a doctor, nigga, I’m sorry
Could have been a actor and won that Oscar, said, I'm sorry
I sold that soap and I killed black folk, I’m sorry
But I got a nice car, put my sister through school
While my momma all cool, I'm sorry
I'm in too deep and I can’t see the shore, I'm sorry

You get addicted to the flip, we used to call it
You get addicted to the flip, the transaction, the hustling
Even more than the money, it's just your job
You feel like it's your duty to be the man in between the man
And make this happen for that person, and to do this and do that
You become the go to guy forever and next thing you know you’re in too deep
Way too deep, scare the shit out of you
You wind up with so much work, that you'd be scared to death
It's important for us to realize man, we gotta get out of that, man
Dudes is buying choppers to shoot down people that look just like them
Dudes is buying guns to take down each other, nobody wins
Ya know what I mean?

I'm not crazy, I'm a fuck.. oh shit!
Floopy goober, motherfucker, floopy fuckin' goober
They ain't ready for what we 'bout to bring back!
They ain't ready for Tyler with the green hat!
They ain't ready for the Wang$ap, niggas!
Fuck is niggas talkin' 'bout, nigga?
We gon' die legends!

I hope you stackin'
I hope you not incriminatin' you and your niggas on songs if you're trappin'
I hope you dressin' yourself and not followin' niggas opinions on fashion
I hope them cars that you drivin' ain't rented just to get some comments on 'Gram
Oh shit, they are because you're not the man
You ain't got no plan, but I'm not here to judge
Cause apparently you're doin' your thing
Your pants got a flood, a little bit Katrina
Oh you wearin' Vans and Supreme this season?
Stop lyin' to yourself, nigga, me the reason
Ahh! Right now nigga
A little goonie with some nice sounds
This little groupie want the pipe now
Yeah, she eatin' coochie, kinda dyke now
Got a new dirt bike, wow
I really want the La Ferrari, but shit...
Can't you lower the price down?

Right now, nigga!
Right now, nigga! Right now!

Cause I'm not one
When it come to a vision, they ain't got one
Rolling Stone never gave me a cover so...
Ummm... so I shot one!
I ain't do college, I said fuck them lessons
I ain't join no gang, I said fuck them weapons
Grabbed the keyboard, Clancy crossed my path
Cashed my first check and said fuck depression, nigga
Nigga what you scared for?
Everybody lean, everybody gang though
Nigga you a new slave, I'm an old one
Thanks to Ben Yang, still walk around with chains on, like
You ain't seen no shit like mine
You ain't seen no dick like mine

What the fuck right now?

Tell you dickheads I'ma go nuts
Niggas told me to grow up
So I matured to a V10
There go my ego, Leggo my Eggo
Never sip syrup, shout my nigga Scooty
Y'all don't want beef, let us know he can eat that bread
Cause he pushin' that mayo, fuego
Respect when you see him
Boy, last album was a musical museum
Somethin' always lost with you niggas like Liam
Neeson, boy, you better run
Here I come, snortin' glitter, portrait pictures
I don't run with many cause their walk is bitter
Niggas mad at T
Where the tall freckled white boys at? Cause I don't fuck with niggas
That's not my homie, that's not my woadie
That's not my team, nigga, they're benchwarmers
I am a stormer, I am a trooper
I am a Koopa, bring the losses now, you assume as I moved it
I run the business
I do not got time for niggas' opinions
They fuckin' stupid, don't need 'em, don't want 'em
I drop 'em, they're deadweight, them niggas useless
Neck heavy like mothafuckin' bad news
Thanks to Ben Baller, walkin' with a hunchback
I got a new white one that I worked hard for
So the doors on my car doin' jump jacks
My big bro Frankie got a Porsche
My little brother Taco got a Bimmer
If you see 'em around me, they eatin'
We all good, it's like FEMA
But of course

Get money, nigga! Get money!
All you funny lookin' niggas back the fuck up!

I wanted to add this
I sit in room with a to do list
Proceed to do and play acoustics, you
Sit around and look at me feelin' foolish
Rollin' up and make excuses, fuckin' losers

Fuck them niggas!
Aye man, aye man!
Aye I just got one mothafuckin' question
Why the fuck these niggas wanna look like me now?
Why the fuck these hoes wanna fuck a nigga like me now?
Why the fuck these niggas frontin' like niggas ain't been invented the swag they runnin' with?
Why the fuck is niggas actin' like niggas ain't the originators of this shit?
Man I tell these niggas they can die and suck a dick!
How was that? Cool?

Oh I don't need the metronome bro
*mumbling*
Wanna eat all the cheese, in the store, yeah
Alright

She lives next door, to the store that I loiter at
We talk every night, she cry to me about her guy
And if we text I get pissed when I get no reply
I know that she's the key to love
She is who I'm thinking of when I am beating Richard up
To mental images her face look
The closest that I got was when I'm poking her on Facebook
Video chats are so exciting
Cause it's like she is inviting me to her world full of privacy
I'm getting gassed up, I think she's liking me
She's gullible and I just wanna take it like a pirate
I see her in class
Not really, two doors down, but anytime that I pass
To take a piss in a stall, I picture us in the hall
Locking lips on the wall, her hand grabbing my dick
My left hand on her tits, ah my shit's getting hard
From thoughts of dating this bitch
Her name is my passwords, fuck

All my niggas got they bitches and stuff
But all the bitches they fuck, are known as bitches and sluts
But she's special, I know to y'all I come off as rough
But I'm the nicest to her, and I just want to concur
A relation, I want the cheesy dates at the movies
And stupid walks at the beach, and sharing straws in a cup
I never had that, so when we holding hands walking home
I look past that, the fact that she's fucking guys that I hate
But, things are looking great, cut copy
Now that Mr. Fag is gone, there's no one that can stop me
From bagging her, I got these tickets to the Roxy
Next day metro's taking me home
I see her in a cut at Wendy's, but she's not alone
Who's that guy? Wait, why the fuck he 'bout to kiss her?
Come to find out she got back with her nigga
Damn, fuck

She's so pretty
Fuck self pity
I feel so shitty
I wanna text her in a jealous rage
But if she reply to say anything, I'mma smile, I know
What do I do with myself, sit in my room for some days
Play Xbox and piles full of wet socks? Fuck that

My nigga ask, "Ace, what happened to such and such?"
I could slander her name, and then tell him I probably fucked
Or I could tell him the truth, and just say she ain't like me much
But instead I lie and say she moved to Nebraska

But she's not mine

This life is a game if you wanna play
Counting all your own mistakes
Living it with no delay
So fast I'm getting growing pains
Father didn't show me my instincts to take the open lane
I go insane
All these problems come with my growing age
Blowing haze tryna clear the doubt that's sitting on my brain
I don't complain but the kid inside me's feeling so restrained
Gotta stay golden
Let desire rekindle the flame
Searching for the Fountain of Youth
When I'm free in my brain

Bring in the horns
You hear that fucking brass?
That's little boy nigga with the trumpets
Marching with the bandwagon
Looking for his heart
No sleeve, but his hand carry muskets
Lurking in the meadows, oblivion
Motherfuck Geppetto; he's a leader, not a puppet
Some professors nuttier than Klump's dick
So think before you blink and aye-aye make assumptions

Your left, your left, your left, right left

They want a story - a story
I write the shit that I find very amusing
Cause all the other fucking stories are boring
It's really awkward to know that a bunch of kids do adore me
It's like I fathered these fuckers
So you won't find me on Maury
I'm still a kid in my heart so I have a problem maturing
But it will come from experiences and shit I see touring
I'm like a bird when I'm soaring, really high
And I'm really horny, from watching this porn
Nope, but

Lurking in, the meadows, Oblivion

5, 4, 3, 2, and where's Tyler?

Bottom of the countdown, shit ain't been the same
Since I found out Hodgy Beats ghost wrote for Bow Wow
Now I’m the loud shock value style foul mouth fucker
That your teenage kid likes to bow down
Riding around town in Seattle
With the same shotgun that Kurt used to click-clack, boom-pow
Still suicidal but some assume that I'm cool now
Cause I got a fucking award and my own room now
Nope but I can flip shit like a couch pillow
And have my death silent like a loose vowel
The bandwagon turned into caboose, so
So, don't let that little nigga trumpet lose sound, just let him play

Got all the black bitches mad cause my main bitch vanilla
She tryna get her groove back like Stella, grab the umbrella
When it comes to your perception of my shit, I'm Helen Keller
When it comes to the perfection of my shit, I know you smell the
Rectum, I'm like a chromosome I always X them
Like Wolverine stepson attacking a deadly weapon
I'm opening a church to sell coke and Led Zeppelin
And fuck Mary in her ass..
Yo, I'm fucking Goldilocks up in the forest
In the three bear house eating their mothafuckin' porridge
I tell her it's my house, give her a tour
In my basement, and keep that bitch locked up in my storage
Rape her and record it, then edit it with more shit
Octopussy special effect the wet bitches be banging
And please never disrespect my set
With Canons hanging from our necks like it's a mothafuckin' circus

You little niggas better check my French
You getting money? Better check my French
What time is it, huh? Check my French
If you got my shit you better check my French
I'm making moves, check my French
I speak English but check my French
Your ho be on my penis, she check my French

I guess I left my dignity up in the cupboard, cause every girl I'm digging
When I'm digging in her pussy, I'm never using a rubber
But fuck it, I guess I got to stretch it out like it was flubber
And leave it dripping green and red like double cheese buggers
Chewing on cum like bubble gum from Hubba
This bitch knew dick like Bubba knew shrimp, yeah
Yo, I'm seventeen, already sniffing blow
I tell my friends it's asthma every time I start to itch my throat
I got a new show for MTV, "Pimp My Boat"
Because some bitch said my semen was dirty, that's silly ho
The most that they can do is find me, I'm hiding
Somewhere where Chris Stokes can't find me
Oh no, Mr. Stokes, I don't like misters, no
Don't tell R. Kelly where my little sister go

Yo, you little niggas better check my French
I got all stars and you can check my bench
Left Brain, Super 3, Creator Ace
Put expressions in their music and create the face
Of the picture punchline figured out, ahh I get you
No you don't nigga so why don't you go and figure
You seem confused anyway, pressured enough?
You the type of dude that choke when the pressure is up
The pressure is the pump and the pressure is us
Bitches having eargasms and the pleasure is us
Niggas wanna be O.F. and write letters to us
Competition's competition, yo you better than us?
Digest what I'm saying? I don't think so
We sick shit, throw it up down in the sink, yo
The Odd niggas are beginning to spill these pink hoes
We think sorta odd so we think so

Crusing in my go kart at Walmart selling cupcakes
Go ahead admit it faggot, this shit is tighter than butt rape
That involve ballpark franks and silver duct tape
Pornos and hormones and boxes of DiGiorno
You homos is loco you're probably drinking Cuervo
With some vatos with the door closed watching Zorro, you homos

O.F., yes
No, I'm just playing the field, just for now

Aww shit
Three icy ass niggas from Odd Future doin' some crazy shit
By the way, we do punch bitches

I'm swagging bitch, I'm iced out
Oh you mad bitch cause I'm laying on the couch
Smoke a blunt, fuck a bitch, in the butt, I'm bossing
Don't give a fuck, I never roll Slauson
I'm fly bitch, I should poke you in your eye bitch
Got the burner bitch, bow, bow
You dead bitch, I'm hot as fuck
I ain't never cold, but I'm icy bitch

My bitch suck dick like she suck dick

Got the bops in the house, socking bitches in they mouth
At the fucking mall, 40 bitches on my nutsack
Wolf Gang nigga scream that 'til they mothafuckin' show me death
Golf Wang nigga, free Earl better show some motherfuckin' respect
All this ice around my neck, all this ice around my dick
Gun to her head make your bitch massage my shoulders

You fuckin' bop, you better swallow it
I got a chain with a fuckin' platinum plaque on it
Is that a hundred dollar bill? I'll shit on it
I bought a fuckin' whale, cause I'm ballin'
Your bitch work for me, she my dick washer
Swag on my dick, 30 thousand million, nigga

We all know why, cause you's a boppin' bitch
I got the burner, I pop you in your lip
Zoom-zoom, yeah, I'm going fast bitch
I'm loud as fuck, I'm ignorant
Punch a bitch in her mouth just for talkin' shit
You lurkin' bitch? Well, I see that shit
Once again I gotta punch a bitch in her shit
I'm icy bitch, don't look at my wrist
Because if you do, I might blind you bitch
Mount Everest ain't fuckin' with my fuckin' wrist
Fuck global warming, this the Ice Age bitch

Swag, swag, punch a bitch
Yo, yo. Jasper. Taco. Y'all my niggas, man

Geek, fag, stupid loser find a rope to hang
I'm not bipolar, see I'm just known by those couple names
I wanna tell my pops but shit, he'll probably say the same
Fuck...hated by everyone, that's the way it seems
I don't know whats shorter, his damn temper or my self esteem
I sit in my room and I listen to tunes, I'm amused alone
Cause none of the cool kids would let me join a team
Depression's on the stalk again
My best friend's an inhaler because it will not let me cough
Whenever I am losing oxygen, bully hand around my neck
Cause he felt disrespected when I decided to talk again
I brought that on myself, see I should know my place
But not at lunchtime, see
I know better then to show my face around them
But the day I do it'll be everywhere
When I share these feelings finally they gon' fucking care

Grab a couple friends, start a couple riots
Crash a couple-
Gather all the bullies, crush them motherfuckers
Odd Future hooligans causing up a ruckus
It's us, nigga
I said it's us, nigga

Murder, murder, m-murder the last they heard of you
Was when I... "uh" with all them burners, you
Think that I'm some punk bully bitch who ain't gon' trouble you
Well, I'm gonna burst your bubble two times if you dont mind umm
"Who are you again?" I'm Samuel and that's Tyler
We came to get wild and style in these trench coats!
Don't start asking what's packing in these trench coat
Just know if you start acting, I'm grabbing for these trench coats!
My step-father called me a fag, I'll show him a fag
I'll light a fire up in his ass
And recently them assholes been fucking with me in class
So I'mma keep them motherfuckers there and make sure they pass, huh
My prom date, she dismissed my offer
So I'mma --- and toss her in the principal's office

Crash a couple

Bum bum bum bum bum
Bum. bum. bum. burumrumrumrum bum bum bum
Bum bum bumbumbumbum, hehe
We are the Sams, and we're dead -- it's just four of us
We come in peace, we mean no harm, and we're inglorious
We took their heads but we just took back what they took from us
I guess we lost ours

Music had nothing to do with my final decision
I just really wanted somebody to come pay me attention
But nobody would listen, but stuffed animals that I had
Since I was a kid but I'm growing up so they're missing
I didn't mean to hurt anybody, I'm sorry
I wouldn't hurt a fly or consider joining the Army
I'm hardly ever angry, Roger Rabbit framed me
Momma I'm the same fucking kid that you made, see?
I don't wanna go to jail, I just wanna go home
And I want them fucking kids at school to just leave me alone
And I... I hear helicopters make a dip
I'm fucking reloaded -- I told you all that I ain't taking shit
You better back up before this Mac start to lift up
I'll pump it like my inhaler when asthma begin to act up
The difference between us and our class is tan khakis
I got 99 problems and all of them's being happy

Right now we got some new music only here on Golf Radio!
We're going to dance
And exercise
And have some fun

I ain't got time for these niggas
Better throw a watch at the boy
Had my boys in this bitch, looking like a seminar
Who the fuck you talking to motherfucker?
Boy, I ain't got time for these bitches
Better throw a clock at these hoes
Have these hoes in this bitch looking for a waterhose
Who the fuck you talking to, motherfucker?
Boy, I ain't got time

Boy, I need a Kleenex
How I got this far? Boy, I can't believe it
That I got this car, so I take the scenic
Passenger a white boy, look like River Phoenix
First... happy birthday!
You bitch ass nigga, yup I'm thirsty
Them little shots that you threw, they ain't hurt me
I ain't fuck with you bitch ass in the first place

Nat Turner would be so proud of me
'Cause all these motherfuckers got they style from me
I bet they all looking from the crowd at me
And if I ask them, they would bow at me
But you're a house nigga, so you don't know
How that shit go, with my big lips and my big nose
And my big dick and my short hair
'Cause you already know how slow my shit grow

Tick tock

Been the man with a pickle plan, niggas know the dill
When I sell the carnival, I bet I get a 100 mil'
Next line will have 'em like "Woah"
I've been kissing white boys since 2004
One me, two feet, three mmms
Four, five, six years ago sucked
Seven figure conversations with Converse finalized
'Cause Vans fucked up
I'ma read commas, you gon' leave comments
Saying what I shoulda did, but you ain't did nada
You ain't important
I'ma keep sporting
All smiles over here
Shout out to The Garden
And I just handle all my business like a chess board
And at them Golf boys?
That's my motherfucking set, boy
Hard pill to swallow like some thick soda
Walk weird 'cause my pockets look like thick Yoda
With a Skywalker, riding 'round solar
Anakin skin Sprite, and my tint cola
I'm getting neck from a broad like some big shoulders
Till I bust like that 9 in ya heat holster
Everything I say is hot, bitch I speak toaster
And I break orthodox like I eat kosher
Green bread, got me chilling like a clean sofa
What's that thick odor?
Young Millie T
A young, focused black boy, oh silly me

Better talk shit
'Cause I'm either in my Cons or my Golf shit
Pants got a lil flood, nigga pipe down
I'm Lil Boosie, Lil Boosie, way I wipe down
Yeah right now
'Cause niggas dying every day and I ain't light brown
And i-D ain't wanna give a nigga no post
So I went and did a 12-page spread in Vogue

Listen man, I'm that boy
All you little niggas clones
Boy I fill that void
You better kill that noise
Turn around and remap route
When they see that boy with them big ears and that gap tooth
Tick, Tock
"Fuck... Hello"

When you're having fun, fun
Time flies, time flies, time flies

Find some time
Find some time to do something

Boredom got a new best friend
Na-na-na, na-na-na, oh-na-na-na
Oh, oh, oh

Boredom, boredom, boredom, boredom
Boy, my bedroom floor is a cereal burial, I'm serious
I ate 'em all, dry boxes, bodies, yeah I caught 'em
If we're talkin' 'bout real meals, ask my stomach, he ain't saw 'em
I've been in this fuckin' room so long
My eyeballs are turning to dry wall
My friends suck, fuck 'em, I'm over 'em
"Hi y'all, y'all ain't hit me all day
What the fuck is the problem? Is it me?
'Cause I'm not solved, I'm... bored."

Bored and getting desperate as hell
Cellular not amusing and I hope someone will
Message me with some plans that are amusing as well
Cause I haven’t seen the exit of these walls since before this morning
Morning, morning, morning, morning
Got some cars I can handle but nowhere for performance
My stomach angry and yellin', I need some food, I could order
But I hate eating solo
Need someone, we can loiter in parking lots
As sunsets at the border, yeah
Ringy dingy dong, I can't be alone
I been starting to feel like I don't know anyone
So now I'm staring at my ceiling fuckin' going
Like I have no idea where I'm going

Cause boredom got a new best friend

Find some time, find some time
Gotta find some time, find some time
Gonna find some, find some time
Time, time, time, time
Time, time, time

"Ride's over, we got some tickets to see s-"

Left Brain, Wolf Haley
Golf Wang, Free Earl, uh

Goddamn I love women
Daydream about penis being in 'em
Meet them with a big grin with a Mac-10
Rope, katana, and then I skin 'em
All beige suit made out of white women
With the red lipstick, dancing to John Lennon
With the red splattered jeans made out of blue denim
They can catch me in the spot where the sun don’t shine
Bitch don’t mind me, shake your hiney
The only motherfucking Wolf here that spit venom
You’re a bad bitch with a real good kitten
And I got the appetite of them fat black women
Wolf Gang in this bitch with a bunch of rats with 'em
Lookin' like the holocaust with Supreme hats with 'em
I am tryna get Ms. Piggy by the motherfucking hairs of her chinny chin chin
Umm, what’s that? The cock of a black dude
I’ll take her to the back room dungeon, fighting and punching
And now the slut is under the fucking assumption
That I will be fucking and munching her muffin
Cunt will be bleeding, but that’s not from the time signature of the month, umm

Don’t got a problem smacking a bitch
Kidnapping, attacking, with axes and shit
'Til I grab them throats and start smacking them shits
Kidnapping, attacking, with axes and shits
'Til she decides to take Dracula’s dick

Goddamn I love bitches
Especially when they only suck dick and wash dishes
Cook and clean and grant my wishes
And make me and the Wolf Gang sandwitches
Transylvania crypt let's take a, tour
Bitch try getting through that black trap, door
Keep yelling and working them vocal chords
And that’ll be more of a reason that you'll get slapped up, for
Fuck me? No, fuck Buffy
That little bitch keeps trying to hunt me
Jumping over gates, what the fuck she want from me?
She keeps sending me garlic
How many times I gotta tell her I’m allergic
Bitch, I got it for a bargain at the neighborhood Target
Fangs are sharp and I hope you know
That all I really want from you is that throat
I can’t eat pussy cause I might leave cuts
Then there’s blood on my sheets, but that might be a plus
On the channel, a fucking animal, leaking like pairs of candles
Bitch, is it hard to handle?
I don’t want a bride, I just want bone marrow

Bite her in her fucking neck, bite her in her fucking neck
Bottom of the fucking lake, bottom of the fucking lake
Call my gang of wolves and bats, call my gang of wolves and bats
It’s a full moon tonight, and these hoes ain’t acting right
It's because; Left Brain, Wolf Haley, Free Earl, Golf Wang...

"Tyler, you... obviously have some fucking problems...
And, this is... this is the end of this session, let's... anything else you've gotta say?"

Mom is getting jealous, I see my manager more than I see her before I go on tour and it hurts
I miss the days when this was fun, but now it turned into work
My friends are turning into opposites
Because my life is turning into opposite of sloppy wrist
And all the bitches who forgot about me want to ride my dick
Harder than the white kids who copy shit
Ending it is all I fucking think about, that's the shit I think about
All alone, bawling 'til my motherfucking eyes bleed
See, he's a leader in person and smile, shit gets disgursting
When there's no person around, talking discussion shit, man, fuck
Niggas saying "Free Earl" without even knowin' him
See, they're missing the new album, I'm missing my only friend

You have everyone around you, with... thirty names a day?
I don't see what it is? I mean, you--not like you don't have anyone to talk to...
I'm here for you, I'm your friend
When I say Odd, y'all say Future
Odd.. Uh-uh, nah, that shit's corny as fuck, fuck!
Tyler, you're doin' good. You have a cult following, you're-
To these white kids?
Oh, my gosh

Charbroiled nigga on these dark beats
Nauseous with the Nazis but it's normal what the cops see
Awesome at his concert, but he never had a pop, see
Mommy was a living single queen with a lat ti
So while my wallets piling with some symbolic colored paper
I lace her, cause she gave me such a lot at such a young age
20, why didn't she get that abortion?
Probably cause that motherfuckin embryo was morphing
Into a Grammy winning schizophrenic fucking orphan
Oops, I mean bastard, a skinny ass disaster
Mom works hard, still working on her masters
Son lies about, taking classes at community college
Just to record some bullshit he calls Bastard
Start a fuckin cult, clash his talents in a brash way
Before he even had a mustache and cash
And all I got was a fucking shitty article in Thrasher

"Alright, just calm down"
"That ain’t shit, man"
"Now don’t, don’t, don’t make yourself seem guilty. That, that article was great"
"No, fuck that, nigga"
"Fuck that… fuck all this shit"
"You, you, you act like I’m not here"
"You're not"
"I'm exactly who you’re supposed to be talking to"
"You don’t fucking help me with shit
You don’t help me with shit, fuck!"
"Yeah, you get... that, that—who wouldn’t do that?"
"Fuck you! Fuck you!"
"Who wouldn’t, who wouldn't shoot their friend?"
"Old fucking fuck!"
"That’s fine, it’s not your fault"
"I killed my fucking friends... fuck!"
"I’m gonna need security in here, and, uh…"
"Fuck! I didn't fucking sign up for this shit!
I'm, I'm not fucking crazy—I'm a fucking table! I'm a fucking table!"
"Yes, come quick. He’s losing it"
"No, fuck this shit!"
"Tyler, calm down"

And I’m not even human, I’m a body shaped demon
And a life that’s fill with crap, and a finger filled with hate
And a gat that’s filled with love, now let opposites attract
But this marriage has a hearse and the parents of the one
That’s getting married has a curse and it’s made up inside of him
Too late to reimburse but, wait it gets worse
So they tied the knot, now it’s too late to reverse
But it was obvious in all the photos
He was paining, now a bunch of whispering immerse

"Yeah, he's right there. Security's right there."
"Shit! No, get away from me."
"Get him."
And then the nurse blurts
"What the fuck is his problem? Here, we have two doses to give him, here"
Why didn’t anybody ask him first?
"I’ve been asking you this whole time, Tyler..."
Because nobody gave a fuck
"Get the fuck off of me..."
Someone gave a fuck Tyler
And, uh... the person that gave a fuck was me
See, you’re not, going crazy... it’s me. I’m your best friend, Tyler
I know everything, I know everything about you
You’ve been helping yourself this whole time
Your friends? They’re just figments of your imagination
Dr. TC... See Tyler, I’m your conscience
I’m Tron Cat, I’m Ace, I’m Wolf Haley, I’m... Me

Tyler we ah, I know it's short notice but I brought all your friends here
For some reason I couldn't get a hold of Taco and Jasper
But, I just brought all your friends to talk to you
Because, they're really worried about you
I thought it would be better if, they could talk to you

It was all a dream, I used to read Complex magazines
When I rhyme I'm tryna get pictures in High Times
Smoke trees and see my dreams hanging in the sky line
Swanton bomb off the bed into a fine dime
In my mind I'm just tryna smoke the finest
And get high sticking bad heinas in vaginas
I'm the flyest when it come to this, fire when I come to spit
I am getting higher when the lighter comes in front of this
I'm a stoner yeah, yeah, yeah you get the picture now
30 thousand feet gon' make it hard for me to simmer down
Another flight, another beat, another city, wow
Thus another couple bitches crying when I kick 'em out
Where we at? We on top of the world

And five minutes from suicide, I biked it to the park
I walked onto the block, met a guy, burgundy 'Preme snap-back
Hurling himself at cars, and flirting with blonde Cadillacs
All was gray, all was gray, Frankie had the blues in fact
Bunch of pale hipster girls, pretty, but they booty flat
Teenage males, couldn't tell I was going through it
Had a wallet full of cream, Amex Green, Beamer almost black
Parked in front the studio Bastard's recorded at
Earl, Gilbert, Tyler, Hodgy, Domo, Left, Taco, Nakel
Sydney, Lionel, Juan, Michael, Jasper, Hal and Matt
Bet I'm missing several but I had to bring that pattern back
We live inside a house that says fuck 'em on the welcome mat
Deep inside the ear canals of Bill O'Reilly's daughter that's
Where I'm at? Now where we at? Wolf Gang, where we at?

Swell motions get promotions, to my whole team
Hell yeah I smoke weed cause I like to go green
Professor Beats educates niggas, let me proceed
Shine chandelier bright might make your nose bleeds
We at Randy's ordering that 306
Milk and glaze is the greed gold mix me
Your bitch is coming along, yeah she hum to my song
Singing like they were for her, but they were for the blur
No longer, but we were in premature, immature
She's unsure, I'm for sure, blouse and dress and my shirt
On the floor then pick it up, out the door, door
Chased, an imaginary friend, a reverie absorption
Impregnate the dream 'til it has an abortion

Everything they say I'd never have, I'm seeing
Now, I bet they see that we balling like All-Star Weekend
Always been the most cool, they chase our shade
They say life switches pace when you got shit made
So I'm just tryna get paid, don't you remember the days
When your dreams were the only thing that kept you sane
And too often they think that they could stop me
Now every show we makin' half a Maserati
And the only thing blocking me is paparazzi
Now it's gold Rolex's if they try to clock me
Everything stays in the box like fighters in hockey
Miss me if you're thinking we slack, work hard
I got the world saying every single Friday is black
Took your bitch, you ain't getting her back, cause she know
Where we at nigga? We on top of the world

Where we at, niggas?
Where the fuck we at, man? You niggas don't know me, huh
Where we at?

Down to fucking Earth, huh, down to fucking Earth, huh
Fuck everybody, here goes some extra girth Sir
You fucking critics are making my nerves hurt
Since I'm saying fuck everybody I guess that I'm a fucking pervert
My window is a book and I'm a fucking crook
Stealing phones to call home but the line is off the hook
My mom ain't paid the bill, guess I can't pay it either
I ain't signed a fucking deal yet
But when I do Clancy and Dave are taking percentages
That could pay the whole fucking city's mortgage
Hopefully I make a lot of porridge from touring in fucking Oregon
From playing piano organs and hopefully I can pay the bill
Shit is getting real, people begin to feel
Like I'm changing, but their complaining making big fucking deals
About some shit, they bitch and pout
You wouldn't be Tyler the Creator, you're from the Dirty
I can tell whenever you perform, a leopard can't change it's spots)
Look, you can't stop me, I'm going full monty
Fuck that, I'm Hitler, everyone's a fucking Nazi
Wolf Gi-di-dang you be roaming where the fox be
And I be where, anybody cares
I try to preach "Fuck age, live dreams and have fun"
Of the bed, when I don't even fucking have one?
When I'm on that stage I feel important
A whole fucking assortment of children that's taking Ritalin
Because the teacher said that the therapist wasn't feeling him
You gotta be fucking kidding me
At school I was a zero, now I'm every boy's hero and they fear it
You can hear it when that little fuck is reciting my lyrics, yeah I'm rebel nigga
Cheer it, dead parents everywhere, it's smelling like teen spirit
Okay, fuck it, Elvis has left the building

I'd tell him to eat a dick quicker than Mexicans sprint over borders
I give a fuck like a quarter with 20 cent
At Hamptons with Fred Hampton relaxing at Happy Camper
It's the fucking financial aid at Hamptons wasn't relaxing, I'm taxing
"Fuck 'em all!"'s what I'm chanting
Don't complain I'm just ranting
Fuck ranking, I'm the best, I'm the champion's chariot
I'm a liar like Carrey in Liar Liar
I'm dirtier than the sheets in the Marriott, Cable guy like Larry
Peter Pan in my youth, fucking fairies
I'm using my tooth bait to get that bitches teeth paste
Fuck it, Odd Future some Nazis, black Nazis don't copy
We perfect, you sloppy, hotter than Saki Takei
Fuck a label on my jacket, screw you like a ratchet
Screw you like a black teen on Judge Hatchett
Hang with thrashers and jackers
Drug dealers and crackers, AP students and slackers
I'm backwards like Jermaine Dupri in '93
Escaping from concentration camps with a fucking girl board and a ramp
That I ordered from CCS with some diamonds that's VVS
Like I went to Sierra Leone in a homecoming dress
With some matching pink panties, lipstick from my granny
Sup on my hat like that motherfucker friendly
White, red-headed bitch reminded me of Annie
She dino like my state of mind, so yeah she understand me
Fuck You Bunch is here, never disrespect my family
That’s for my little brother, sister, cousin and my auntie
Wasted fucking youth? All you old niggas antiques
We go skate, rape sluts and eat donuts from Randy
Bitches like Tia Landry watching Billy and Mandy
Motherfuckers wanna be Odd but you can't be
Sit the fuck down all you old niggas stand me, faggot
I guess I got to be a fucking hand-me-down rapper
From Los Angee area anytime I'm fucking landing
Fuck 2DopeBoyz and NahRight, shout out to Hype Track
Them motherfuckers could never get rid of me
Guess I gotta do a fucking song with Dom Kennedy
Get these fucking hip hop bloggers to start feeling me
Because I'm seventeen, compose my own beats
Lyrically I'm dope enough to ass-fuck the dude who made nicotine
Maybe I should buy some Hundreds, wear some fucking skinny jeans
And follow in your footsteps like a motherfucking millipede
Centipede, make songs about Gucci and ciggaweed
Jerk with my freshmen like it's some motherfucking little league
No I'm not no fucking hipster, mister
No I'm not no fucking Kid Cudi, all my fucking fans love me
Collaboration hits for fans screaming fuck buddies, yo, yo
I'm driving in a stolen truck, and I'm probably fucking drunk
Wasted as fuck, can't walk it out, DJ Unk
My nose is filled with coke and my license is revoked
Fuck everybody here, everybody vanished, I'm managed
Hop off my dick and make a fucking sandwich
Everybody listening can suck my dick in Spanish

Yeah, um, as you can probably tell from listening to this record
I was, I was probably angry, probably on my period
But um, I didn’t mean to offend anyone, alright, I'm lying, OF

You are a whore, you are a whore
Fuck you, fuck you, fuck you, fuck him
Fuck everything else I can see
I know, fuck you I hate you so fucking much
I know you think I'm crazy
Cause I think you’re a fucking fag

"Sam, the music sounds good, man! You've been practicing?"
"Thanks"
"Sam, this is Wolf. He's new here."
"Sup, dude"
"So, you guys are into jazz?"

Say some more, never want to talk about it
Feel a way, woah

Take me back to November
Hawaiian shirts in the winter, cold water, cold water
Yeah, take me back to November, wassup
Can we go back to November?
Hawaiian shirts in the winter, deep thoughts, deep thoughts
Naw, take me back to November, wassup

What if Clancy fuckin' me over?
What if 'Who Dat Boy' is rhetorical and this shit is over?
What if I'm hustling backwards?
What if my accountant ain't payin' my taxes?
Fillin' his pockets and IRS show up asking me questions
I couldn't answer 'cause I was too busy tryna make classics
Boy ain't got no motherfucking classics
What if my music too weird for the masses?
And I'm only known for tweets more than beats or
All my day ones turn to three, fours 'cause of track seven
Fuck, what if I get stuck?
What if I got comfortable? I gotta keep it buck fifty
What if I lost it all and ended up back in Ladera
At them shitty apartments that's across the Bank of America
Damn, I would be hurtin'
Writing all of these songs cause Wi-Fi wasn't working
Last year in total, I put out two verses
But five-seven figures since then, life's kinda perfect
Oh is it really? Oh is it really? Bitch you know the dealy
Really hilly willy tilly silly, hold that billy how I Milly Rock
When they can't relate him, when they start to hate him
They don't drive these cars so what's their ultimatum?
Tell me, what's your November? Is it a person?
What if I thought the brake was the gas? What if I crashed?
What if these deep thoughts was my last?
Let me pull over, quick!

And drive back to November
Hawaiian shirts in the Winter, cold water, cold water
Hawaiian shirts in the Winter, deep thoughts, deep thoughts

My November was those Odd Future Sundays, where we used to just skate all day
My November was performing with Lil Wayne
My November was awesome, I booked my first feature film
My November was when I was gifted this Getz and Gilberto album
My November was seeing Erykah Badu perform
My November was when my brother took me to first concert ever...
My November was summer 2015 when I fell in love with someone who fucked my whole world up, showed me life through a different
2014, Miami 43rd Street, every day was November

Take me back, take me back
Take me back, take me back, take me back
I ain't doin' fine, lost my mothafuckin' mind
Time travel back and help me find
Take me back, take me back to November, this I know
"My November is right now"

I wrote a song about you, I want your opinion
Opposite of my heart rate, it slows down at the ending
'Cause the love I got for you has exceeded appearance, the lyrics are
Matter of fact, I'ma just call you, so you can hear it
If you do answer, I'll play it to state facts
Although I already know the response you gon' say back
At that point I'll hang up, disappear and just stay back
And if you don't I'll leave a voicemail with the playback

Hello, no one is available to take your call
Please leave a message after the tone
*beep*

Me and Slater just hit a curb
Bunny hop, zoning out, listening to N.E.R.D
Made a couple thousands turds spitting written verbs
Shit, now I kick it in the 'burbs

Me? I'm from the slums
Niggas who push a ton
Ton of drums
With foul flow, dirty mouth like kissing bums
Mama done made her one
Uhm, a witty son
With no respect for women, so show me your titties hun
Me? I'm twenty-somethin'
Okay I'm twenty, but I'm soon to be twenty-one
I wild out at shows, break shit, it should be fun
Venues are like pussy with me, "Should he come?"
I'mma wax that
Like the Chapstick in my backpack
For my black lips
Then dip to Europe and come back with a stack of cheese
A stack of cheese for these rats
That Mac and Cheese
New 'Preme shit got me feeling flyer than a bag of bees
Y'all on my dick more than my index when I take a pee
I came up with ''Rella'', ain't touch a bag of weed
Shit was doper than Whitney Houston's needs
Golf Wang
That's the team to be, ay
Getting T.U
O.F., indeed
We was missing Sweatshirt, like
"Where's the hooded sleeve?"
Okay, nevermind, we found him

Guess I win
Checks started cashing in
I stop rapping and start asking
Where my fucking passion is
Tyler talking father problems
Shocking shit he spit to popping topics
In them gossip columns
I ain't ask for this, I did it out of boredom
Thought that roach was cool
He died and pushed me into stardom
Now; Ye's, PJs
Sipping leche
Chips Ahoy, boy
Listening to Cowboy, ay boy
AUS was Awes', I enjoyed, boy
Y'all niggas played as a tot's toy
Have a good day as I annoy, oi

Cameras with panorama
Views
My shoes
Have seen more Vans than Mexicanas
Or crackers in Alabama
G-O-to-the-L-F
This O.F
I opened up a store so I don't stress
Mosh in gardens
Jazz punk shit
Playing chords, making up shit
Pardon my Dolly Partons
And I keep sharting
Hoodies with rectangles and different colors
Niggas think I started kindergarten

My bitch is on my handle bars
Slater, Slater, Slater, Slater
Hair blowing in the wind
Her freckles look like candy bars
My cool summer never ends

Oh my God, seriously?
Mister cool guy
You're talking to a fucking bike, loser
Ha ha, Ohh... Fuck

Part 1 - Fish

Slip it in her drink
And in the blink of an eye
I can make a white girl look chink
Don't know what to think
'Cause last time I attempted this shit
The judge ordered me to see a shrink
Started with the link
Contended her to meet me at the local
Odd Future Wolf Gang skating rink
We was uniquely in sync
Already fucking and we only met last week
We were both young, not yet antique
So her mindset was working for my technique
Tell her that I love her and by next week
You can hear her shriek from the gashes in her cheeks
No, I'm not a freak, I am meekly a creep
The neighbors by the creek says my house stinks
And it reeks on the sheet, girl
Streaks of red, even though all pussy is pink
Oblivion makes obvious seeks
Which make meats for my obvious feasts
Used to just blot up thoughts, plot, and rethink
Now I get daughters and tie 'em and clink
Got my dick harder than iron and zinc
Now they just rot up, arms caught in the sink
Where they get cut up to fit my physique
Critique my chic in this brand new mink

Bitches running 'round
Down pussy take a trip
Make you strip
Got my dick harder than the unzip
Tyler swiftly slips his dick
Inside of Taylor Swift's slit
Round trip in that pussy, here comes a ticket
Film clips popping on that Canon
Busting Ottoman cannons
On the pill
Is he real? Gaza stripping
In my living room
Wolf Gang full moon
I'm assuming mushrooms
I'm a necrolampoon
Not of Charles Mansoon
This fuck is ending soon
Because I'm ejaculating

Now I'd like to take this time of day
To thank the Mother Earth
Letting the sun shine down on the lake
While I fish your waters
Ooh, hide your daughters, hide your sisters
'Cause the fisherman's raping everybody in the pool
He on the loose, yeah

Got to wash it down, all this gold is fucking bait
Wait 'til you see the semen swimming
Baby, please not half, the whole is great
Morals? Your body's near that coral reef
It was once upon a time you came home with me
Then the next chapter left you in my teeth
Fill your gills with goo
Going deeper than Pacific Ocean
This specific motion
Makes this hammerhead puke
Got to wear a wetsuit, can’t get seasick
I love when you're in fishnets, you want me to eat you
You’re fucking wet, fish

Part 2 - Boppin' Bitch

So I met this girl at the club
And I just wanted her to suck my dick
Now she's drunk and talkin' to me a lot
Until we go to another room

This little slut whore sucks cock for a little more bucks
Than them other sluts fuck for, real easy
Cause I didn't even knock on the front door, sleazy
I used the welcome mat as a cum rag
And all the Wolves fucked too, yeah she’s a cum bag
Filled with a bunch of shit I purchased at a drug store
Four more Dora-looking sluts let me explore
Until my cock got sore and started growing cold sores

Now she thinks that I like her
But all I really wanted was that mouth
Now she text messages me every day
And I don't ever hit that bitch back

This little hoodrat started jockin at my jock strap
Until my uncircumcised penis finally unwrapped
Flapping up and down until the cack finally go splat
Now you gotta spat, spit it out until you do scat
Then you gotta sat and shit it out, bitch, fuck your feelings
You wasn’t feeling shit when you was down there kneeling
Now shut the fuck up you got another dick to deal with

Now I'm at a fuckin' clinic
Cause my dick is swollen' and keeps itchin'

Where's my gun? I'mma kill this bitch
And don't let her suck your dick or you'll get hurt

Domo roll another one, I'm just fuckin' with you I ain't smokin' none
My squad bring terror, no intended pun
Merch booth made niggas extensive funds
Momma got the Rover with the Range
She don't ever ever gotta struggle, not again
And I put that on my dead grandmama's name... Too soon

My nigga Slater, yeah that's my little pony
Little homies is repping like I been fucking with Kony
Nigga Phillip and Kobi, to my niggas that know me
Ya boy seem happy as fuck but truthfully ya boy lonely
Niggas a target for marketing, he's an artist
Can't even walk into Target without bothering customers bothering
Asking me for a picture, can I talk to they sister
Naw nigga, get lost, you're fucking smothering
God I wanna quit, but I can't
Cause mother and sister can't pay the rent
Four stories with storage, I'm 21 with a mortgage
And touring's paying the bills, life is paying for thrills
Lifes' a bitch bruh but from the third floor man, she's gorgeous
A year ago I was broke, now how can I afford this?
I started off with disposables, now I have an assortment
And I'm using these negatives to develop a portrait
Now the frame is a pain in the ass to get it in
Without a scratch or stain on the glass, but that's not important
Just as long as it's printed, and I hinted it is
And when I get it I'll make sure you get a copy, bitch
Shit I'll even add a signature with the fuckin' pic-ature
I'll even tell you the film I used, and the aperture

Grandmother died, didn't cry not a tear
Not gonna lie, fucking weird no water dripped out the eye
But when I got the news, yup it left your boy stuck
Cause when my mom dipped out, she was the one that gave me a fuck
Mom calling and calling, I'm on my way to a show
I answer, she crying, saying Sadie is dying
The doc said she only had a week for us to speak
Before she deceased, cause cancer was just eating her cheeks up
Fuck, nah this is really awkward for me, bruh
I hang the phone up, and adjust my seat back
And started to think, like, "What the fuck just happened?"
I never had a death and I just seen her a week ago
Meet them at the hospital I should
In between the set of BADBADNOTGOOD
Lionel asked what happened I said it's bad bad, not good
Just take me to the Cedars-Sinai off of Oakwood
Getting there, family sitting center chair
Awkward in the lobby, it was floating in the thinning air
Getting there, need a sticker saying how I got in there, there's a room
Open up the curtain, she's just sitting there, hello
Our conversation's brief, couldn't even make eye contact when we speak
Lookin' at her you could tell all she had was weak
And I'm not talkin' days bruh, I'm talkin' 'bout her strength
I sat there 20 minutes tops, hoping it was just a fucking plea that she could cop
She died that night

Let's take it back to them days
Counting sheep on Sadie Hannah's floor
Carpet was my baby mama
80 dollar profit from the coffee I poured
Rent-A-Center calling everyday
Nobody home, they're knocking on the door
Now I skrrt, skrrt, skrrt, skrrt
In toys I only dreamed that I could afford
Now I roll through Okaga

I ride to California
These frog oval goggles
I'm leaning out the window
OJ shining on me
Simp-Sun shining on me
Slick circles floating
Vro we off this world
Yeah, yeah

Run it, run it, run it, run it

Ain't nobody fucking with T, but that just may be my ego
But don't be too cool, you may freeze
Shit weighs a ton, water your garden my nigga and stunt
Tell these black kids they could be who they are
Dye your hair blue, shit, I'll do it too
Look, I smell like Chanel
I never mall grip with my manicured nails
I coconut oil the skin
I keep the top low 'cause the follicles thinnin'
But other than that, man, it feels like I'm winning
Went from statistic to millionaire
CNN doubted 'cause my skin is dark
Then they forget when I get in my car

Simp Sun shining on me
Run it, run it, run it, yeah

Flower boy T, nigga that's me
Rooted from the bottom, bloomed into a tree
Took a little while, nigga making leaves
Keep 'em in the branches so my family can eat
Favorite color green, energy is strong
Giving niggas life like birdies and the beez
Dropping them seeds, not what you want
You don't know what I keep in the trunk.... tree

Ah, shit!

Run it

I don't fucking like this shit, fuck

Tall ugly nigga with lips bigger than Tigger
Cotton-picking nigga, Golf Wang season sicker than the block
Workshop is awesome, ask Dill and let's pretend like
Pulling down my zipper and she quick to say she doesn't suck
Pink haired Mrs, I'm her mister, sipping Slurpees, bag of chips
OF is popping like a blister, need some Listerine
Sick of being black, sipping paint thinner out a tin flask
Plotting on the babysitter before dinner
And hopefully I get her, if I don't, fuck it then
See I never simp son, polar opposite of Smithers, I'm done bitch

Until the ozone leaves and the Earth is hot
Loiter Squad lurking in the parking lot
The moon now working and the stars align
I stay golden, y'all thought I was out my mind

Not a shocker bruh, I had the stun gun in my bum
And when I drop shit you better have a towel and a sponge
And ask Bob bitch, I eat a ton bucket of chum
In Bikini Bottom, I am the biggest problem
This shit fishy niggas dip like we were set in Harlem
Heaters turn them into nuggets like Carmelo Anthon
We just sit and burn shit just like my fucking anthem

I'm like goals, those are something you have to stand to reach
My campaign speech elect me Commander in Chief
Respect to whoever's minor appearances cause mass hysteria
But I'm still incomparable, I'm like the face of America
I'm the ambassador from a land made of gold
I'm a fucking centerfold, I'm something to behold
I can kill a hundred shows, take one for the road
I'm results of putting persistent pressure on coals

It's a dog eat dog world, don't get bit bruh
A son of a bitch I am, yup, I'm a sick pup
I'm also half ass a racist who hates niggas – yep, I'm a mixed mutt
Preme is the top bunk, green is the pillow case
TrashWang sticker on that Chima Fergolfson
I'm real with the box, and I murder with the pen
It's Bimmer Boy's boy never swerving in the Benz
I'm listening to Dead Sam demos on the ten
Can I get a medium with cheese and bacon?

It's Loiter Squad nigga...
Fucking Loiter Squad...

Yo, Wolf, nigga
What? Why are you running?
Sam's after you
Sam's after who?
You!
For what? What the fuck?
He found out that you and Salem been hanging out, he said he gonna kill you
Kill me? What the fuck you mean kill me?
You got a booger in your nose
What the, wait, slow down, wait, slow down, what the fuck you mean he gonna kill me?
I don't know, he just said he gonna kill you
Not if I get to him first

God, goodness gracious
I can't wait to see the look on y'all niggas faces
That boy T nuts, surprised his thoughts isn't chafing
Fuck them crackers up at Mountain Dew them niggas is racist
Cabbage was made, critic faggots was shook
So I told 'em that I'll exchange the word "faggot" with "book"
And all them "books" is pissed off and had their page in a bunch
Fuckin' attitude switched just like a "book" when it struts
But, I'm a fraud I pray to God when the six triple "book" bashin'
While me and my favorite author's lips tickle
Peter Parker pick a pack of peppers when the plot thickens
Tyler, The Creator fuckin' kill you with a popsicle
Cold blooded so we rock mittens so they won't find him
Not kiddin' keep the Tommy on me bitch, I'm Ms. Pickles
Said I seem off, last time that team talked
Sick of making niggas cabbage so I took the 'preme off
Should've bought some stock in it
Not Golf when the little homies don't, wait,let's weigh my options
I bought me a mansion, and bought some attention
Ain't give none to Hopsin,and dear Boyce Watkins
Why you mad? It's the slave in me
It's facts boy I'm back like Rosa Parks least favorite seat
Videos, stage dives, popups, they watching T'
While y'all niggas watchin' the throne, the throne be watching me

If you fuck this up
There are so many fuckin' kids right now, listenin' to this guy
Get those wings flapping motherfucker!
Cause this kid's ready to fucking fly

Eenie, meenie, miney, mo, nigga nigga on the wall
Rap bars, jail bars, die or shoot a basketball
Tyler, the dark skin, arrested in Austin
Cops know who I was cause their kid said the show was Awesome

Tyler, Tyler, I swear to, I swear to fuck! If you fucking...
Do NOT fuck this up!
You have the whole world in your fucking hands

How many leaders in the house?
Well can somebody bring the mirrors out? I'm getting lonely
Likes and apologies and snaps make it obvious
That everybody on this fucking planet lackin' confidence
Well can somebody bring the camera out so I can film me
T a great director nigga's vision must be blurry
Boy I get them epic shots like jaywalkin' in Missouri
Wait... How many leaders in the house?
Well can't somebody bring my album out so I can hear one
Pour me a drink, shit I don't know what to think
Cause all these niggas leaning like they Forest Whitaker's blink
See why nobody got they hands up, see that's the issue

How many cars can I buy 'til I run out of drive?
How much drive can I have 'til I run out of road?
How much road can they pave 'til I run out of land?
How much land can there be until I run in the ocean?
You niggas go with the motions and all the plans
Sea I was never into the beaches and all the sands
See, I was in the woods with flowers, rainbows and posies
Falling outta my pocket, but ya'll want to know if I swam to cool down
How much cooler can I get until I run out of fans?
How many fans can I have until they turn on the AC?
If the AC blows, well then I'm TNT, I'm gone

I'm gone and I'm finished
And I ain't seen my friends in a minute
Guessing nothing lasts forever
Yeah, nothing lasts forever
Nothing sticks together
Sick of sitting in doubt
Please let me figure this out

Shout out to the girls that I lead on
For occasional head and always keeping my bed warm
And trying their hardest to keep my head on straight
And keeping me up enough 'til I had thought I was airborne
How many raps can I write 'til I get me a chain?
How many chains can I wear 'til I'm considered a slave?
How many slaves can it be 'til Nat Turner arise?
How many riots can it be 'til them Black lives matter?
Niggas click clack splatter, pew, pew that nigga
Life a game of basketball, you better shoot that nigga
'Cause if that cop got trigger, he better pull
'Cause when I get pulled over, I usually play it cool
'Cause I know what I'm driving is usually paid in full
And my ego and possessions, will not let me be one
Because I got a mansion, my mansion got some rooms
Them rooms got some windows and my windows got some views
Them views get some stares and my backyard does too
And if you walk to the bottom you'll prolly see a pool
You better not drown, keep them ten toes up
'Cause if those ten toes down, that mean that you fucked up
And that's what I swim in

And if I drown and don't come back
And if I crash and don't come back
And if I fall and don't come back
I'm wondering if I don't come back
Maybe then I'll know

I like my girls skinny with brains
I like my hoodies fucked with Lame
I like my friends imaginary with no names
And I make music for the fuck of it, no fame
Aim, shoot, the gun of love, round
Tried to find ammo but it's none around town
So I went Down South but I ended up North
Uptown sitting on Cloud 9's white porch
And of course, my car's off course
You're so white, my blinkers don't work
I'm trying to let the force be with you, I get you
Music is my first, but I contemplate divorce
You make a nigga sing songs nice
You make a nigga's night turn day
And you make the flowers sing say turn green yellow
It sucks that I didn't get the chance to say hello
I want to eat you out like jello
And mess with your body like the bass and the cello

Another love song about shit
And I'll be rich if I get another diss
And maybe Cupid won't miss

I like her L-I-K-E, the only difference is she won't fuck with me
But she will fuck with that vegetable with the hairs full of X's and O's
I want to tie her body up and throw her in my basement
Keep her there, so nobody can wonder where her face went

- Tyler, what you doing?
- Shut the fuck up!
- Uh-umm..
- You gon' fuckin' love me bitch
- Uhh..
- Or I'mma fuckin' put this gun in your fuckin' head

But all I really want is a kiss on the cheek
In private, not public in the streets
And your cupcake how we eat and your toes
Cause I got a big fetish with the feet
I just want somebody I can see
You can be a gold digger, you ain't got to love me
Your heart literally is what I do want for lunch
Now this shit is turning to a habit
I'm the burger king, I gotta have it my way
And truthfully girl you really make my day
I would probably kill myself if you told me you was gay
And I can't even look the other way
Your aura is a magnet, my eyes a metal bag, it's attractive
L-O-L laughing, you're a gold Oscar and I'm just actin'
And I want your cinema hole, and have our kids play supporting role
Climbing up the pole, Jack and the Beanstalk, bitch it's gold
And I was in loath, I would never get over you, ever, Sarah

Half your body laying on my chest
The rest is in my stomach, that's including your breast
And I'ma just take another guess
Now you probably wishing that you would have said yes
Am I crazy? Maybe, but fucked up is how I been lately
Shit, I don't give a fuck, your family looking for you, wish 'em good luck
Bitch, you tried to play me like a dummy
Now you stuck up in my mothafuckin' basement all bloody
And I'm fucking your dead body, your coochie all cummy
Looking in your dead eyes, what the fuck you want from me?
What did you want from me? What did you want from me?

Oh, you the motherfucking man, huh?
Oh, you be fucking bitches, counting all the bands, huh?
Oh, you be trapping out the bando selling grams, huh?
Oh, you be smoking, drinking lean, and popping Xans, huh?
You see, that's the bullshit that I don't need
I'm telling y'all niggas, y'all ain't fucking with me
See, I look in the mirror and he said, "You are the man"
And I said, "Hey man, I agree"
Rocks on rainbow, Ben's a nice fellow
Your neck reflects your personality, and mine is yellow
Boy, I hit the block, like I hate Legos
They know, they got thirty seconds; Jared Leto
Before they see some halos, and I reload the ammo
Boy, it's Golf Wang-o, and that's the squad I bang-o
Until my fucking brain go, now let's reload the aim-o

Can't a nigga get some fucking chaos in hurr?
I'm the truth and the dare
And you can get your ass beat like a kick and a snare
ScHoolboy's my niggy, you know I'm good in the 50s
That boy's not that bad, enh, it's no Biggie
It's the G-O, the L-F, we go-go, no homo
We black out, and go hard like JoJo and fuckin' Diggy
No ship in this series, since I pissed off Iggy man
We been that man since Batman had a sidekick
Catch me in some Vans like one of them soccer mamas
And them bitches blue like that family went to the Dodgers
And you'll get fucked up like the thoughts inside of my noggin
Going harder than the quidditch in Harry Potter
All my shows got one black in it like Larry David
And I'm that nigga, meaning I'm two niggas, I'm schizo
Brent Lowe, my motherfucking bingo
Pink and yellow on my neck remind you of my dickhole
And I don't really fuck with you niggas, shout out to Jim Crow
Don't get offended, love being darkskinned
23 with the crib and I don't got no tenants
And I don't like sports, but the court got a tennis
Is that diamonds on your neck? Stay the fuck out my business
See, that's that Cherry Bomb, get my burr on
That's McLaren, '91 out the Chevron
Motors Flog Gnaw, Vans on, fuck your Jordans
Went from throwing up to throwing carnivals
Boy, I'm a sicko, flaco nigga, but kinda macho
Boy, I got some vatos and shout out to ScHooly, he kinda loco
Pack a de la pistol, we splitting nachos, then for that cheese
Boy, he was using some shells just like a taco, so grab your goggles
Nigga, Taco Tuesday, you don't want none of that
Have you heard of Fairfax? Boy, we was running that
Nigga took the store from us, yeah, fuck all of that

Pants heavy, sag to the left with the belt strapped
No face mask, nigga, just toe tags
Still the blunts getting passed, yeah
I'm from the era of crip walking
You was clown-dancing, you wanna be me, huh?
Cuz is wack in his raps and what he rap, he ain't done
Top Dawg, Wolf Gang, smell the cat on your tongue
Pussy boy, you fucked over, nigga, control your gums
Teeth missing, moms' won't recognize your face when it's lump
My square homie's license, double life in my trunk
Mind, power, body, and soul, we break handcuffs
Got a strike on my record, double cups, and duck
You want the life like us, you need to crip that coast
You want to steer that wheel, you want to smoke that kil'
Well, who am I?

Shit, piss, fuck, cunt, cocksucker, motherfucker
Anything that'll piss you muthafuckas off
I don't even smoke and I'm a level up of all of y'all
Bitch, you couldn't reach me with a ladder and a calling card

I'm special, nigga
Who the fuck are you?!

They used to tell me to calm down, said I have a problem
Now I'm runnin' shit, that's why you never see me wearin' joggers
Lead by example, how?
All y'all is my son and I ain't never had a fuckin' father
Boy, I'mma bring the noise
I got my own beat and we all got drums
What these weapons about? We're just flexin' about
You on your grind who the one that got the wep at their house?
Bitch, I do this on purpose, you niggas don't got a purpose
This nigga call me a clown, nigga I own the circus
Stack is sittin' in my pocket folded up like a papaya
You know I golf bitch like I been sleepin' with Tiger
Woody woody, my mob, mob is goodie we Oddkast
We o-K-K-K just like the clan
Hoodie golf shit packet, rip it out the fuckin' package
In that all pink fit lookin' like a fuckin' faggot
Who the fuck you think you fuckin' with, nigga!?
I'm a bad case of I don't even know
I'm about to tear the shit out this goddamn house
I think I'm about to blow my muthafuckin' brains out
Tyler, take a chill pill, nigga

Um, excuse me mister but can you please turn down the lights?
I don't really like all these cameras, man
And this shit just don't feel right
And I don't really wanna be rude to you, sir
But fuck you mean I can't wear my hat in here?
And you got me fucked up, if you think I care, nigga

I hope you little niggas is listening
Them Golf Boys is in this bitch like an infant
The blind niggas used to make fun of my vision
And now I pay a mortage and they stuck with tuition
So special the teacher asked if I was autistic
And now I'm making plates, you just washing the dishes
So if you don't mind, get the fuck out of my kitchen
But keep your ego here so I can butt fuck your opinion
But in the meantime brainwashing millions of minions
And you would never catch me in none of their fucking shin-digs
I hope you fucking niggas is angry, pissed, and offended
In Search of... did more for me than Illmatic
That's when I realized we ain't cut from the same fabric
I made my own shit, you went out and bought yours
Man I got too much drive, motherfucker, I hate traffic
La-di-da-di, I'm going harder than coming out the closet to conservative Christian fathers
When it's a lot at stake carne asada let's be honest, I'm really morphing
Named the album Cherry Bomb because Greatest Hits sounded boring
I don't like to follow the rules, she said that I must
I don't have any armpits
She wanted to talk who's in charge of this Golf shit
I said "Howdy do? How are you? I'm the sergeant"
And who I are isn't really important
My heart is as dark as a window with car tint
So hop in with your friends, gal and I'll unpark it
And I'll do donuts until the fat one is carsick
It's young T

I don't like to follow the rules
And that's just who I am
I hope you understand
And I don't really think y'all cool
So give yourself a hand
No, no, give yourself a hand
Better pose for that camera
Better pose, boy you better pose
And it's your life nigga I suppose
For the lights, for the camera, and the action
Now you're face is meltin' from the flash of the big ol' lights
Nigga you ask for this life

Welcome to death camp
Yeah, welcome to death camp
Kissing on my bean bag
Your lips high-five my tongue
Fingers moonwalk through your hair
This is fun I can tell
I don't know if you'll handle it well
Welcome to hell camp
You should be mine in a way tonight

Da na na na na, da na na na na
Da na na na na, my baby
I'm losing my mind because
I hope that we can be more than just friends

Firework, I feel like glitter
You're the one that I needed in my life

Ayo, mirror mirror on the wall, who the brightest of them all?
I never been the darkest one 'cause my self esteem is tall
So I never seen eye-to-eye with y'all niggas, ayo
Uno peso, never paid attention to what niggas gotta say-o
So I keep that buck, I ain't give no fuck
They ain't build me up so I block 'em like Lego
Feelin' glitter, feelin' good and great
Got the burner, got the heat, like wait
Got the shit, it's all up on that hip
I'll use it on myself on the day you dip
Got that 4, 5, 7, track 8 for me
Baby doll, I hope you agree
Because you light my

And every time you come around, I feel like glitter
'Cause I love having you around

Yeah, look at my face, look at that joy
This is one sided, yeah, I can't lie
We ain't gon' work out, we a fat boy
Yeah, sumo, got it, memo
Your pale skin see-through, must be a window
'Cause you ain't an L, could be a DJ
'Cause when I see you my heart beat changes tempo
Yeah, simple, that's what I want but I can't
We can track 10 skiptrace, I'm caught in your quicksand, wait
Please don't save me

Ooooh
How ya feel?

We didn't get your message, either because you were not speaking or because of a bad connection
Fuck

Nigga this is my cup
Drink the cyanide up
Dope as fuck
So I would really shoot a group of guys up
Put me next to awesome
Still can't tell the difference
Just like Asians with their eyes shut
Butt fuck a couple Rots
In the Wendy's parking lot
Barking at the sight of light from my bright sparkling
Cock-a-doodle
Eatin' toaster strudel
At a nude beach in Rome
In a black Bape spaghetti strap made of Ramen noodles
My bitch is bad
Mixed with a thicky ass
Get my dick Iraqi
This will end up in a sticky blast
Chrissy Brown, mask on my face, now I'm kicking ass
Life's a bitch, fuck college, mommy, I am ditching class
I rather be happy than fucking forty
So fuck the teacher's lecture I'm having Sydney record me
Oh well
Let's get XXL to write us a fucking story

It's sitting right in my lap I see it
Scribbled across the lines I read it
I'm the fucking poet who knows it
You know it, you bogus
Comprehend the language
You scared of war? I'm all anxious
We got the Angus if you want beef
Now that's a burger for ya ass nigga
Now have that burger, eat it fast nigga

Fucking aw, get you some
Obviously intended pun
Same time it took Jason Dill to get the stitching done
Custom made, one of one
Sold out Roxy performance
Ski mask color of a pickle just to perform Sandwitches
Started back in fucking London
Cracker children wanted something
They could bump and punch a bunch of fucking faces
Moshing pits to breaking arms
Zombie Circus not a carn–
Evil wolves is on the farm
And were all evil harmed
Any sheep creep
Quiet tendered sleep
Make a peep
Fucking body will go missing in a week
Roam around the city with her titties like a fucking greek
Bastard was the fucking shit, explains why it never leaked
I am coming of my age with my Memphis Bleek
Shooting from the sky, the only problem is the missing beak
Oh, that's the black talking in me
Let me down a couple cups of bleach

And if you disagree lick a couple pimple covered clits
From some stripping lesbian dykes that fight niggas
That like to rap about those dykes that fight niggas
Enough with this shit, let's talk business
Acquire more currency, disregard bitches
Go to Shake's house and play Goblin in his kitchen
Then force him and his mom to listen to track six, then
If he doesn't like it I'll just slice his fucking dick and
Put it in the cabinet where the fucking cookies and chips is
Take a bunch of pictures, and
Post 'em on my Twitter, then
Go to Jimmy Fallon, like "Faggot, when we perfomin'?"
Then a bunch of Golf Wang niggas start stormin'
On the stage
In a rage that will scare Zack Rocha
Better get ya tanks before this wolf war's over
History repeats itself, I'm a O.F. soldier

Hello, I'm a salesman sorta giant
I sell molly and mary and other various items
One time one guy came to where I'm residing
And I didn't invite him, so instead tried to fight him
I got violent, long story short he's not breathing
For some reason I liked it and it was really exciting
Couldn't stop the addiction, and the irony is
A couple junkies went missing and I know right where they're hiding

Dope in the bag, pretty bitch on the side
I sell dope in the back, if you tryna get high
Dope in the bag, Pretty bitch on the side

Task force poured into my fortress
Found some lipstick, a couple corpses
Bitches was harmed and they couldn't reach the alarm
I'm ripping sockets out like I had fucking problems with arms
They found a couple portraits on the porch
But they don't check up under the floor
It's bodies and hotties and we was raging I'm gauging a shotty
Hit so many bitches I was pimping like Scotty
I'm a bull, red, piss me off
Like that lipstick position when she kissed me
So I bit 'em off, they was too soft, I'm a Wolf
And a designer mixing skin cotton leather and wool
And most people like flying kites, riding bikes in the woods
Baking cake cause its good, I mean I would if I could
But I like playing dress up and mix match
Sorry I'mma 'fess up, you aren't getting your kids back

I sell dope in the back, if you tryna die

What's in my trunk? White, girl

You need a warrant, officer
You could say I kill 'em, if my product doesn't
Couple basement stairs where I drug them, down
It's pretty disgusting, finger crush your face
I'll leave you permanently blushing, blood
Nosebleed drugs, cook you in the oven

I can grab the fireworks, and soda, all the cookies we can eat
Make you nauseous, but be cautious, this is not Dawson's Creek
We could sneak away, fuck it, you can bring an eighth
I'm not gon' smoke, but I'm just asking baby; сould you meet me by the lake?
Said bring a towel, well baby meet me by the lake
Bathing suit, it's going down, shit just meet me by the lake
We could count the shooting stars, well could you meet me by the lake?
Summer never has to end with me

I'm give it to her, she wants that summer time
I'm give it like no other cause she knows I'm hers
Damn right she's mine, we both know it
So when we separate everything fine, her phone ringin' in her purse
Damn right it's me, I'm her nigga, nigga
Come for mines in summer time, I'mma bust that trigger, nigga
Catch us Venice beachin', she wanna go shopping
Sun down after club cause she like to get it popping
Sangria on my freedmind, cause she likes to get it popping
No ecstasy for her, but she wanna get it popping
Drop topping, I measure her pleasure
Then drop in when she get out of place I quantinize
She is my concubine, I am her porcupine
I poke her face her throat for taste, give me head like I'm on her mind
I know her analyzation, so when she try to fake
Summer time in the boat of love, meet me by the lake

I can grab the fireworks, and soda, all the cookies we could eat
We could sneak away, fuck it, you could bring an eighth

I packed a couple sandwiches inside that basket
And brought some extra towels if anyone was asking
We should take a dip in that lake quick and then split
Then do something that's beyond what we both can imagine

Watch the sunset, we can watch the sunset, grab a drink
Watch the sunset, we can watch the sunset, look in the sky
Watch the sunset, we can watch the sunset, we never have to leave
Watch the sunset, we can watch the sunset
We're here, all night, school is in session
Look, you know, the water's pretty deep, let's go to sleep

Niggas at the fucking mall, niggas where my fucking drawers?
Think I'm happy? Think I'm sad? Bitch you fucking know my dad
He wears his pants up in his ass, touch his ass, grab his dick
You's a fag, you like that shit, O.F. is the fucking clique
I'm going off the top of the brain
Nigga don't know how to rap but I'm in the game
Fuck that shit, I don't give a fuck
I'm back up in the fucking club, niggas know I'm at the mall
Eating chips with my drawers, how you doing? How you fall?

Swag, swag, swag, swag
Tina perm your fucking weave

Eat my ass, lick my balls
Bitch I got that fucking swag, you don't know my fucking dad
I don't know my fucking dad, what is this a fucking purse?
I ain't fucking Mexican, but we can have sex again
What the fuck? That's your fucking brother? I ain't with that jerkin' shit
Unless it's Steve Harvey's buff sister trying to jerk my dick

Swag, swag, swag, swag, swag, swag, swag, swag

I'm with your girlfriend eating chips
Mmmmm, stop the beat, bitch
Uh, oh, oh, shit, fuck, mmmm, mmmm
Wait, stop the beat
Alright, yeah, nigga, I was in the mall
With my niggas busting triggers, yeah, swag

Bitches, weaves, hoes, leather jackets

My mother warned me that some niggas ain't my right hand
To trust her, only my heart and that elder white man
His name is Clancy, I fancy him, gotta give him props
He half the reason why dealerships even let me cop
So now I'm speedin' and tryna drive away from the fact
That she was right, so I triple left, tryna double back
The streets are filled with some clues
Fuck it, I seen some familiar stuck in the cul-de-sac
I pull up, get out, what up? I wanna help
But what you want for some, some niggas
Really don't want for themself
Now do I stay? Do I go? That's my dilemma
So I speed off, we talk barely and it seems awkward
And I heard through some words that you're off it
I got too much drive, don't wanna steer off path
And crash and get distracted
But I listen to that weather man 'cause it might rain
Keep my windshield wipers prepared
Cause y'all throw so much shade
And I got jacket in trunk, but that's in the front
I also got power for both of us if you're ever in need of jump
Just let me know, my nigga

I had to switch gears on 'em
You know, swerve, left turn, steerin' wheel on 'em
Nigga that's a pothole, watch out for the pothole
Watch out for the pothole, watch out for the pothole
Look out for the pothole, watch out for the pothole

Snakes in the grass, but I walk
I got some new boots, on the back it says GOLF
So I be prepared for their bites, they're all talk
I left the condom in the grass so fuck off
Watchin' Clarence in a mansion with nobody in it
Young successful nigga, ride McLaren with no windows tinted
I drive by piggies when I'm in it 'cause it feels amazin'
The irony is I stopped eatin' bacon
Don't get it twisted, nigga, I'm still hungry, oh he lonely
All my friends talk about their hoes and tenderonies
But all I can show 'em is a couple cars and more things
That I've made in the couple past month, he's on, please
Everyone is a sheep, me, a lone wolf
Nobody gon' make a peep 'cause everyone wants some wool
Since everyone is a sheep, not everyone here is cool
Man I'd rather drown in a pool by myself
Than fuck with their fleece
See, man, T-Man fans be seesaw
Wind blows, they go, which way, who knows?
One day, "Fuck no," the next day, "Okay"
But fuck y'all, I know that T is four for four
I just want that garden and that Batmobile
Good health, success, time on earth worthwhile
Find somebody who love me and raise a couple of lizards
But my vehicle's good for now, that's in a couple of miles
Now keep it pushin', nigga

Fuck, okay, next one
Do-do-do-do-do-do
Gotta watch out for the potholes
Ooh, said watch out for the potholes

If this was a game, I already know that I would come out winner
And I'm not bragging, I'mma be in her
But this bitch really think that I'm 'bout to buy her dinner
My steak good, I got a good cut like Splinter
Juicy and hot such a black bitch temper
Now she wanna talk and chop it up like a blender
But I don't give a fuck and or even listen like Schindler
She's cute but her forehead's big
Got stretch marks like she got four kids
Her legs can't close like the four door hinge Bronco
That O.J. killed the white whores with
A wealthy white girl without the facelift
Lure her with expensive dinners and a nice bracelet
Leave the bitch breathless, what the bitch don't know is that
I'm a mothafuckin' sellout and a rapist

Baby, you're an angel
How about we turn this into a fable of some sort?
You already know you're dead
Ironic cause your lipstick is red, of course
I stuff you in the trunk, drunk
Cause all I really wanna do is fuck and snort blow

If this was a game, I would be considered a mothafuckin' legend
And I ain't trying to gas you up like Chevron
But I'm high as fuck bitch, you really need to get on my leverage
Now we're in the cabin, in the middle of uhh
Trying to find ways to really stuff you in my cabinet
Dreamy little bastard, I done ran outta luck now
It's time for a bloody foot you little rabbit
You're very attractive, and notice that
My hat is always the color of cactus
And I hang with wolves cause I'm an evil bastard
Pictures of you on my wall no glue, no tape but just cum plastered
Met you at my school, departed at my house
Ended at your panties, started at your blouse
Pushed you down stairs, I took a nap up on the couch
If you wanted a date, don't come
Now you gotta make it easy for me don't run
You call this shit kids, well I call these kids cum
And you call this shit rape but I think that rape's fun
Wait, now it's about eight something
It's late and you stuck in my basement
Come downstairs with nothing but a shoe string
Yeah bitch this date's done

I like my girls how I like my drugs, white
Lord, you're so pretty, lying in my arms
I just got one request, stop breathing

You wanna hear the new song we just did? It's not finished but... yeah

I want to go
Baby, let's go
To my treehome
Treehome

Special
So let's go
Lets go oh oh
Oh, lets go
I wanna go

Bridge!

Colorful you are
Yeah, that won't stop
You're my favorite crayon in the box
Let's think outside the lines

Come to my treehouse, yeah let’s escape
Then let me go, head first in your lake
From what I heard, it's great
It's great

There's a party

Tuesday is good news day
Not usually a full tray
Can you pack your PJs?

Come into my treehome
Boy, you must be special

I'm special baby

No one ever comes here

Not usually a food tray
Boy, you must be
Let's just escape
Let's go to my tree house baby

Lets just escape
You and me
Oh, he's special
Will you come into my tree house?

Part 1 - VCR

I don't want to play you
I just want to tape you undressing
And I'll lay you down and record soft porn
If it's romance then it's hardcore
If it's horror, pop the popcorn
The thoughts to rape you really turns me on

Press my buttons baby
Press my buttons
Press my fucking buttons baby

You're my favorite show, any chance I get I try to watch
Die hard fan can't stop with the tapings
Sort of like a psycho when I can't stop with the rapings
Of the VHS especially during sex baby

Press my buttons baby, press my fucking buttons baby

Ready to watch? I'm a slip it in the tape deck
But put it in slow-mo, I don't want to bust the tape yet, press play
Now this is what I call an evening
A live show, almost equivalent to the screening
Your dream movie? I'm the clearest copy
Now time for Blow, I'm Johnny deep with the rarest poppy
Snort a little, now you're getting groovy
Cause I'll kill if I find out you're watching some other movies, bitch

Part 2 - Wheels

Danielle, Danielle, yeah you heard about Raquel
Well that didn't go well, let us try to make it swell
Put the beaver in the mail, we can take it slow like snail
Lock my heart up, this is jail, throw away the key

Can I sleep over, and wake up next to you?
I want to feel you near, just let me whisper in your ear, um

We can kick it on the couch, blunt you can roll it up
But I'm on some shrooms if you really want to feel the room
I just want to kick it, kick it for the rest
I skated all day, I just need some rest and your breasts

We can count the stars on the hood of your father's car
He's a buster anyway, I can take him any day
Look into your eyes I realize that I like you so much
That was corny, now I'm horny, can I have a kiss?

We both teenagers with the same mind state
How about some ice cream and some South Park for this first date?
Your cat is waiting for that raw fish I can't wait, get it?

We can speed in my 2 seater
Girl I got a 2 seater
Speed in my 2 seater
In my 2 seater

About a hundred on Fax and it's easy to stop
You see my shit isn't stock
I used to piss in a pot and now I piss on the walls
Since I pissed off a cop, a couple tickets I have copped
But I can pay for them all
And by the model of my vehicle you know that I ball
E92, but '91 the year that Tyler was spawned
And If I crash in the woods then I'ma follow with this
Tiptronic stick or automatic you pick
Shit is static as shit, sure my shit is a M
Might get that X6 end, don't follow exit him
Might take back street hidden
House got all sports cars like his garage is gym
Two sapphires on him neck next his precious gems
Now AMG it's in boy I will eat him Benz
New engine, you got that old shit with those deep rims
You got a warranty don't care if you scratchin rims again

Sit in my passenger seat
You tell me I got too much speed
And I should slow, I should slow down
But I can't, cause you drive me wild
Girl I get a rush when we're speeding in my car
Sometimes it's too much
And you can feel the wind in my heart

I know some dudes that would find you that carry rugers
And shottas, and fucking shoot at your Honda
Then fucking zoom out in Mazdas
Them GOLF boys is bad for you like the food from McDonalds
Boy, I'm a king and I ain't lyin', boy, hakuna matata
Better watch for them hyenas if you flex then they swarm
Cashing so many checks there calling him Tyler O-Comma
I'm tryna ball like I was Domo O'Connor in '09
Probably September...
Boy I'm just rhyming these syllables, suck my genitals
Album cover looking like the mascot of the timberwolves
Skate park at Pemberton
Hoping that I ditched the chords and go pick up the pen again
Cause I kill the dark shit like I'm motherfucking Zimmerman
Turn around and lose pounds like I'm fucking Timbaland
Give it till he cop brick like a wall with pig in it
And money coming out the blue
Like cops are changing fits or shit I'm killin' it

Back when Left Brain had the hightop fade
And we would go skate on them concrete waves
And now I switch gears to hear the cylinders pump

Can you roll my window up?
The fuck you turn my music down for, man?
Why? Damn!
Cause it's windy!
But I love it when your hair...

Blows, when it blows, when it blows
When your hair blows
Hanging out the sunroof
I love it when your hair blows
When it blows, when it blows, when it blows
When it blows, when it blows, when your hair blows
Listening to Mac DeMarco
Hanging out the roof window
Switch to third gear turbo
Skrting on these niggas
Skrting on these bitches

You can say you don't want to take that drive
But your hair, it blows
I know we'll have a good time
You just gotta stop being scared
Just roll
Just come and roll with me
It's all good

Yeah, man,what's good man, you good? I've been chilling, man. I've been doing some push-ups and shit
For real?
50 a day...Oh w-w-wait...is that that nigga Tyler?
I think so
Bitch ass nigga here he comes, man FUCK this nigga, man, this nigga stink... w-wait be quiet, be quiet
Ight
My nigga, T, man, what's good, man, you good? Alright, I see you!
I'm good, man, I'm good, I'm good
Aw thanks, man, I'm trying, man, I'm just trying
Yeah, let me know if you need anything...I got you...just...you know...yeah
Alright um...yeah we'll probably walk around and come back when the movie starts whenever
Ight, man, I'mma see you
Ight, my nigga...ight
Fucking FAGGOT, man, I swear to GOD
This nigga bitch weak too!
Yeah, she is
God dammit! I'd still fuck!

Hello, the hype is so mellow
Bitch I'm dope but my pipe is so yellow
The blue polka dots, pink stripes and it's pink on the title
Nigga fuck your role model bitch, I'm my own idol and
If you can't face it my nigga, you can ass it
My accessorize accessories bring out my assets
Nigga they sound on acid, tablets
Stussy’s G-Shock with my custom pair of 3D glasses
I suffer from ADHD
I should win a fucking award for being me
Beat banging the tom-toms
My producer selection is fresh nigga, fuck Vons
Ace the underdog, thrown them on the back bender
Cause I change my outfit more than transsexuals change gender
Eating Belgian waffles with Italian biscotts
I sold my soul to the devil for thirty percent off
And to you emo kids who walk around pissed off
Nigga didn't bother, so my father didn't help
So when my mom would beat my ass, she would always hit me
With Gucci belts, Gucci imprint from leather welts

I'm so dapper man, funky fresh Dapper Dan
I'm your favorite rapper, fan, it's an honor to shake my hand
On award tour, on excursions, I'm a virgin of swap meets
I'm so pure, so sick it's no cure
I'm dope, where the fiends at? Aight, where the jeans at?
The hat, the crew, the t-shirt is Supreme

And they see me they play Pictionary
I got a good way with words like a dictionary
And in that dictionary my name is by "Fresh"
They at the same spot they making no progress
Becoming a good rapper ain't that easy of a process
Eargasms they have them
The hotels we staying in twelve star
Tyler say "Yo Casey just write a twelve bar"
If I'm with twelve people, I'm with twelve stars
You haters put up your guards
They against us? Oh no
Red and white diamonds, Supreme box logo

I don't want you thinking I love you cause I stay
Girl I really like you and happy we got laid
I think about your windows like two times in a day
I'm a pervert with a purpose, like priest who just got saved
Kissing, kissing, I'm on a mission of licking
The holy grail of your body, when you be kissin', Mrs
This is a kid from Africa, you, you are a kitchen
I come quicker than pitches from Sammy Sosa
You hoping I'm joking, but first

I'ma eat your pussy til you tell me you can't take it
Screaming "Stop it," don't you fake it, wanna tape it
Grab my camera,nine months later with a Tyler baby
But that won't happen til I blow my load

Your pussy tighter than door hinges
I munch you like sandwiches
But not any more cause I'm on tour, so
I go hard, shit, I might need an ice pack on my wrist
Fucking, I'm pumping,you know it's coming
Bust in a couple of seconds, I'm sweating, I leave you slump
In the back of my truck, butt naked, suck it out of me
I leave you with nothing, get it?
This is what you wanted, this is what you came for

You blow me away
With your cherry

That was new music from the soundtrack of the upcoming film *honk*
Be caller eight to win tickets to the triple feature Moon Theatres tonight
Three back to back to back movies at the Moon Theatres tonight
Be the eighth caller, only on Golf Radio
G-O-L-F, G-O-L-F, it's Golf Radio

I really made this song just so I could perform it
I don't even know how to perform it

Aw, nah, boy don't cut that wood
Found out your flowers don't smell that good
But if they smell real good to him
Then he don't need anybody else's nose to win
Look, I am a God, nobody prays to the sight of you
All y'all niggas wear camouflage
I'm in a field wearing pink and blue
I wear pink, they can see me
Nigga, you don’t create, you just repeat
Nigga you don’t got drive, you just beep beep
Beep beep, talk shit from the backseat
Come and light my fire, I'll blow your fuckin' face off
Nigga I'm the got damn pilot

Tie the knot
Kick the chair
Float in the air
It's cherry bomb

Yeah, yeah, yeah
You muthafuckas want war, then come get it
You motherfuckas want war and i want more
Nigga fuck you and everything that you come for
You motherfuckas wanna blow?
Pow, pow-pow, pow-pow
Then let’s take ‘em to the gun store
I don't got enough time, fuck your rolex nigga
Don’t compare him to mine, ‘cause I don’t know that nigga
Nigga I’m the got damn pilot
And I decide when we gon' take off, let's get it

Strangled in the air

You muthafuckas want war?!
Fuck that light, this, that Cherry Bomb

Firecracker and I’m ready to blow
Don’t fire me up
I lose control

GOLF 191, Okaga
Play classic hits

Girl, you're so special
To me, to me

Let's move to California
Girl, I know you ready, I can see it in your eyes
Oh, nobody has to know and if they did, they wouldn't care

It's nice that I need to
The earth is so rough I'm not calling your bluff
I think I believe you
Take me higher
Let's make our way over
To the Okaga cave
There we will stay,  play it cool now
X-Y-Z how?
Welcome me in
Then we'll begin

Suckin' on my ears,fingers rubbing through your hair
Fastwind, slowwind, fuck yeah, we behaving bad, uh
Probably couldn't tell but I be blushing when you with me
When you kiss me, swear to God, blood was rushing to my Jimmy, oh
Laying on my trampoline, looking at the stars
From my fake space fog machine
Laying on my arm, it's dead
From the pressure of your head
I said I loved you, said it back
Like it was scripted, but you meant it
Like the flavor of that lemonade
That we was sippin on our sushi-ridden dinner date
Oh, you think you special now?
Other bitches trippin' now
Cause we're fleeing to the moon
Fuck Earth, man we sick of y'all
Wings on my backs and we ain't gotta cop a ticket, nah, nah, nah

Oh yeah
Oh yeah, let's go to the moon!
Come on, baby
What you wanna do?

Take me away
Fuck what they say
To another place
Another day
We in outer space
We'll waste our days
Yes!

Broke dick, I'm looking for a drug lord

The beat, wears it like a kevlar
As I smoke my tree, medlar, South African
Coughing 'til there's pains in my fucking abdomen
I spit negative just like a halogen
My breeze more of a fucking masculine
The rascals win, killing 'em off with a javelin
Snakes, I'm just rattling, suit tailor never tattling
You niggas a bunch of squares, Madison
As far as real niggas, bitch nigga my battle's sick
On top of being talented, bitch I'm fucking passionate
I'm a golden curse, call me treacherous, treasure chest
Better yet, I'll build on to the beat like tetris
Remember me forgetfulness? I am your correctionist
I stitched Odd and Future together like a leather vest
You fucking sweater neck, feather peck, Rosetta checks
I put together decks and push for beef, if hefferless
I'm headed out to Sydney Australia with Tim Donnelly
He gets caught up at security, the TSA don't follow me
Tea parties are the shit, forty mags by the scones
I'm fighting for gun rights to shoot a nigga in his dome
Click your fucking heels, there's no place like home
Cock back and blast off written on the tombstone, ain't that a bitch

Let's see, what's wrong with me? Might be my fucking tourettes, see?
I need a vacation cause all this shit got me stressing
So after the showers with Sandusky
Me and Sean Kingston went and rented a couple jet skis
Lionel rolled the blunts up, so meanwhile me and Lucas getting fucked up
You can smell us coming like a faggot when he hicks up
Listening to Common's last album to get pumped up
To finally ask *censored* when I can get my dick sucked
You know Casey Anthony, was handling
Dropping her kids off so she could come out and dance with me
Wine in the pantry, wrestling on my trampoline
Learned some new chords while you uncreatives were sampling
I'm Wolf, I spit flow retardedly
As retarded as the sound of deaf people arguing
You hold the future of the kid you daughter's gargling
Me, I have the Odd Future mothafuckin' sergeanting
My poppa didn't give one, that's why I'm like this now
I'm still down to cut throat and if another fan asks
For a fucking photo while I'm snacking on my pizza lunchable
I'm 'a fucking snap like Berman when he acts right
OF will be done for, niggas will be dumb poor
Don't believe me, ok be right back, I'm headed to the gun store
M-16's and them 6 teens came out of nowhere
Like your kid's wet dream, what you mean old news
Oh you really need us to fucking show you
That we're harder than finding a fucking snickers bar in whole foods
In a black hoodie, nose bruised and a gold tooth
Hoping the fuckin' security guard doesn't hold you in custody
But luckily had a couple of guns with me
Like gay step mom, none of you mothafuckas can fuck with me

Vete a la casa de tu mama
No mas andan aqui con sus babosadas, que Odd Future ni que Odd Future
Yo no se que es eso, idiotas, que chingados es Odd Future
Golf Wang, Golf Tyler? A mi me vale madre
Ja.. y mira esa ropa, parecen una bola de payasos mugrosos! Por favor!

My father died the day I came out of my mother's hole
And left a burden on my soul until I was old enough
To understand that the fucking faggot didn't like me much
He loved my moms enough to bust a nut and then he shake Junt
Bring your pops to school day for twelve years I cheated
Told the fucking faculty that he was at a meeting and
Bring that dude to life day, he wasn't at the meeting
Made a U-turn on the way there like "the fuck am I thinking"
And a new fitted instead I got some CDs
I hated, some Ritalin, some white socks
I was hyper because I didn't get attention from my real pops
Cops say I'm supposed to be in jail but they don't know it's me
Statistics say that niggas with no father ain't going to be shit
Well I guess I had one because nigga I'm it
You smell that? That's the odor of success bitch

I know I'm not the only bastard in America
So I'm going to need some help, on this next part
Scream it with me niggas

Eat a dick nigga, bitch

Father's Day was the worst when it came to gifts
Cause I ain't know for who or what the fuck to get
Now my momma mentioned the day before what she would like
Cause she's playing both roles like her occupation was dyke, fucking right
I ain't look up to Obama and Nixon, I look up to the Hugos and Dixons
The niggas in the vision rap about the shit they cooking in the kitchen
Pushing keys like them niggas that were banging on the keys
My father never seen me, the nigga probably Stevie
He bought me a hoodie, a couple albums
Like that's going to make up for the years and the tears
And the money that my momma spent on rent and clothes
You fucking dipped out, I swear to God if I see you
I'm a get out the M-16 and let a fucking clip out
Cause in 16 years, you let your kid doubt the existence, none
I don't give a fuck either like father, like son, I'm done

He ain't give a fuck about me
He ain't give a fuck about you
He ain't give a fuck about we
So what the fuck we going to do?

The cold is nice, and I'm not talking about the weather
The skin is thick, no need for leather, your father called
He said you're better without him, I'm not the only fuck
Without them, how to tie a tie and how to get your suit hemmed up
Take it to the shop, then what?
Fuck it, momma's proud of her asthmatic thin fuck
Luck on my brim Supreme keeps me warm
When the cold blood swarms in my veins, fuck rain in the summer
The bummer is the fact that I'm black
And I hang with white Neos whose marrow stays frio
Now this counselor is trying to tell me that I'm emo, she don't give a fuck
D-low where's the trigger, I'll let this bullet play hero.. bang

Goddamn nigga!
This shit ignorant as fuck, my nigga!
Bitches, this your motherfuckin' chance
Go on the motherfuckin' dance floor, shake that ass bitch
If you got a problem with a nigga
Sock that motherfucker in the motherfuckin jaw right now nigga
If you didn't know nigga, if you didn't know nigga, I'm back!

Spit on a bitch, punch on a bitch
After I eat some steak, have her tug on my dick
Nigga filthy rich, two car notes
No house nigga, that's how I roll
Yeah nigga I do this fuckin' shit
Count money, get my hair braided by your bitch
She drivin' me around town, nigga
Where I'm at nigga? Dog pound nigga
Oh shit nigga, what's good ho?
Your bitch givin' me head, countin' money though
2 chains, three dames
Rollin' with my niggas cause we gang bang
I roll big, we roll deep
Only skate in the streets, what's good nigga?
I'm hood nigga, with my hood niggas
We ratchet, we goon in the hood section

We got bitches, we got bitches, we got bitches
We got diamonds, we got diamonds, we got diamonds
We got cars, we got cars, we got cars
We got jacuzzis and your bitch be on my dick

Mobbin' in the club, 60 niggas deep
Keep talkin' shit and you'll meet 60 feet
I fuck with a bad bitch I'm smokin' on some weed
Nigga got racks, shout out to the team
Posted in the house, nigga countin' green
Golf Wang, Wolf Gang, niggas know what our name
Six hundred sixty six bitches on my dick, man
Six hundred and sixty motherfuckin' six

Hey you, whatcha doin' and why you runnin'?
Supposed to fly and take control cause you're the pilot
You can't swim, you're gonna drown, the sharks are comin'
The sky's your home, there's no limit, you know you gotta

We can go down to the rainbows
Don't let your high keep your brain low
You're a bird
You're supposed to fly away
The way you stand there
The sky is your home, be free
Be free

Sometimes, I sit in my room

"It's Golf Radio, you're on the air with Shane Powers
Taking requests... What's uh... What's your name? Hello? Um, okay, well, since, you want to be Mr. Fucking Secret Agent, what song you wanna hear?"

The one about me

Rollin' in a golden Tacoma, the shit's stolen
If that bitch tell on me, I'mma do a fuckin' drive-by in her colon
With my meat, gotta keep it obsolete
Like Chris Brown when Rihanna got her fuckin' ass beat
Fuck Jeeves ask me for advice, if I'm not reading a Vice
I'm squatting down, picking cracker bitches scalp for some lice
Everything that I write is dope because the pipe
And nope you can't have a hit unless you gimme the light
We be burning Dutty Rocks with a light switch
Bitch nigga, you about as hard as a dike's clit
I'm goin as hard as Bishop Eddie Long's John
After I bought a Sidekick and sent that fag some nice pics
They say I try too goddamn hard
No shit, I want a Grammy you damn retard
You can't be great when you settle for a flea bargain
Unless you're a thrift hipster bitch in a leotard
Painless
Hodgy lost his motherfucking mind because the brain left
Wolf Gang got the ink on me now it's banged out
Box Logo hoodie, still haven't got the stains out
Congress
I guess I'm fuckin' with the best blondes
Um yes, I am now beating off to mom sex
Raquel is wrestling a prom dress
While me and Ray Charles have a fucking staring contest
To all the step dads in here
Trip-six kids got you motherfucks scared
Could be worse, nigga that's absurd
Nigga I am at Pharrell's tryna butt fuck nerds
This just in, Tyler the Creator and Justin Bieber
Was just in the room flippin' Selena Gomez
Go 'head, give some, pucker up
I'll fuck her up until the kids come in, umm
After Tron Cat I got the rat shook and I ain't even have a hook
For the white kids to sing along
I don't wanna sing a song, fuck that
Now cyber bully sissies on my little sisters Macbook
I got you niggas nervous like a pop
Tryna ask his virgin, hot, vegan daughter where the cock goes
Wake up, wash ass, go and eat some Rosco's
Head back to the studio to munch up on some tacos
When I was younger I was bitchin' and
Now I'm coming quicker than
The shit that's swimmin' in my sock hole
When them teeny boppers ain't around
So Johnson and Johnson baby lotion
Beat on my Johnson 'til my cock swole
Stop saying you're sick, shit is kinda old
I'm a fucking Herpe in a coma, you're a common cold
Have you heard my brother verse on Llama?
When that nigga's home
Me, him and Hodgy gonna take the game and
Get a stainless steel AK and aim it
To the fucking referees head and put his lifeless body
In a choke hold
Uh-oh, these niggas is loco
Best thing smokin' minus all of the tobacco
Still hard to be black, well
Malcolm X would be proud, this white bitch getting black-maled
Blue eyed cracker named Jenny, and skinny
And Obama wanted change, I threw a couple fucking pennies at him
Just a chip off the old block
Chipped tooth ruth got some dick off my swole cock
Cause I bag bitches, she's a zip off the old lock
And thats just a logo on the center of that old box
Oh stop, tryna be me, kids will go cop anything
That I put on from the gold watch to the boxers that I put on
Probably cause I'm goin harder than erect cock dick through a botox
Oh shit, you're as hard as senior citizens dick
Oh fuck, don't slip break hips and pop backs
Show some respect to old chaps with my left fist
Cause I'm the next best spitting wreck thats left here
That's my ex bitch
Her? She's my next bitch
Have you met her mouth? No? Oh that's my bestest
Bestie, and she gets beastie
And she's my favorite babysitter cause the children never exit
I was taught to act my shoe size, I'm eleven and a half
Cock the umbrella cause when I spit Seven on your ass
It's gonna be mid stage Coachella
Shake's faggot ass keep hatin'
But I work hard for the shit that I got
So it's still fuck 2DopeBoyz and fuck Planet Earth
All associates can suck cock

I'm Tyler, Mr. Green Hat
Pro-abortion, anti-clean rap
Fuck your blog opinion and your feedback
My self-respect I leave that, in the lost and found
Where the black girls get their weaves back
Awesome I achieve that mini, blasting "You're a jerk"
In some fucking yellow skinnies looking like a fucking faggot
Bouncing 'round the house trying to find an easy way to rape Minnie
Bet you thirty dollars you find her like Cartman found Kenny, dead
I like my girls smart, skinny
Kinda pop tart, when I bite into them red
I'm a self-racist, you should tape this, ask Sarah, I'm the rapist
I'm a fascist, fuck fashion, Gucci belts is for them faggots
My hat is by Jabbia, and if you got a fucking problem
With the future, you can get a death wish just like Atiba
Fuck the biz apparent, Odd Future errant
I'm watching the Berrics getting head from someone's parent
Blind fucking hate inside my heart, guaranteed
That I'm sharing in the force with the cyclops staring
I'm flying on a beaver, you're a disbeliever
So don't ask for no mothafuckin' ride when you see us
Swim right past you, the shit-list said that I'm nutty such a cashew
Cause I jack off with dish soap and smell gas fumes
Permanent brain damage similar to tattoos
The shit, you can mention me if anybody ask you
Kill the jungle let the cats loose
You didn't see me here if someone ask you

I want to feel her in every way
Mary Jane keeps me high like every day
Bong, vaporizer, in the sack now
Stuck in my high, afraid of heights, I'm trapped
Buy a swisher for a dollar or two blunt wraps
Roll it up and ensure that everything's fat
She ain't got time to try and relieve ya
But she'll get all in your head, Sativa

I'm good but y'all don't want me like vegetables
I'm all in front of you zeroes like decimals
Let's take them high like the decibels
So we get them high, get them high like cholesterol
In a overweight mother-lover, my tracks is filled with blubber
That's fat, who needs another producer?
Chica-Go-Getter from Odd Future, used to ride solo
Cause I ain't really care what the rest say
Type of nigga to jerk off to his own sex tape
Best stay away when the door closed, I show up with four hoes
Best believe I'm leaving with more of those
And I got a girlfriend so I'm a keep lying until the verse end, FIN
Brandun Deshay, Hodgy Beats, Ace the Creator
Odd Future, O.F. until, until from now until forever

We grind, these niggas asking for some promo
We sit back, observe, stacking hella box logos
Square circle jerks starting O.F. moshpit
Preaching to the poets, I'm an O.F. prophet
No less profit, fiened when we drop shit
Convertible coupe, bitches scream when they tops split
It's that crack, give you something to sell
Put these bitches on lock down, something like jail
Thought she hot I swear, probably rougher than hell
And she ain't gay, but the only thing she like is fucking Chanel
Light skinned women, all sex everything
Think we can fit ten in, bowls packed with everything
Everything that we call flight, living life
This is everything that we call hype
I'm everything that they call nice
She in colors and shit, she off that northern lights, right
Intimidated by niggas you can't be
I'm a G, and this is something you can't see
Top ranked, number one my son
And she looking for them trees, baby we got some
And stay focused on the women and you get less done
It's ironic cause I always hear you talking about one
Them other niggas smoke, they ain't this high
How high? Nigga, higher than the kites they fly

Got the whips, got the hoes
Got the ice, got the clothes
Niggas know that keys open doors
Half price nigga keep the o's
Keep the o's, nigga keep the o's
Know they call me Mr. Treat Your Nose
Know they know me by treat your nose

Look, UFO, bow, land
Skrr landed on the ass and
Adidas leaf in the grassland
My finger got a yellow Pac-Man
Blow your purple, go in circles, so inertia
Go reverse it, no rehearsin', gold is perfect
Open curtain, flow inversion, golden person
Yeah I'm nerdy, yeah I'm swerving
Yeah you heard me

My garden's full from breaking these hoes
A hand full of green and a couple of stones
Your lawnmower's foreign, you rent you a home
But nigga, how much of that shit do you own?
See me, I don't compromise, I know my accomplishments
Fuck your compliments, bitch I got confidence
I don't need your approval, my nigga you suck
I do not have to adjust
You stuck, I'm talking
So shut the fuck up
Speedin' and gleamin' and stuntin' so Evel Knievel
You convene with that circle of demons you’re hoping them niggas’ll see it
Results may vary
Chain not too heavy
I'll rather pedal smooth on my bike than crash in that Bugatti
Back to the garden
Niggas gon' do you dirty
Y'all already saw it
Killing your flowers
This thing’s impossible
It's the new slave apocalypse
Isn’t that obvious
All you stupid niggas got the whips

Keep the o's
You gotta keep the o's

Keep da o's
Cause you never know when it's over
You want the doors that go up
You want the girls with the big butts
You want the diamonds, you want the stones
You gotta stunt on these niggas
Stunt on these niggas one time

Find your wings
And fly
Cause you'll find your wings
You'll find your wings
Let me tell you what I want you to do
What I want you to do
Learn how to fly

I'm rapping about diamonds, and cars, and money now
What the fuck has gotten into me, man

I was taught to act my shoe size, never my age
I always judge a book by the cover, never the page
I never judge a murder by weapons, only the rage
That he felt when he dealt with the physiological phase
They say that I never cease to amaze
While half my mental belongs in a cage
The ape is a beast, tranquilize that bitch
If you niggas selling dope then you selling my shit
Selling my assets, I'm so damn illegal that I need to be arrest
But then they'll get my mom for 18 years of possession
She showed me affection like a drug dealer using her pocket for my protection

The pigs fly away in the morning
But I ain't get to see you today
And if I want to go outside
I got to make sure that I can play here
I bet you've never seen a pig fly
Well you ain't been looking through my eyes

I bet you've never seen a pig fly, nope
Right next to the fat lady hitting high notes
Went to sleep at seven never woke up from the dream
Wore my wings and my jeans but my hat is from Supreme
So I guess that's where I hide my things
Caged, and the wonder is seen
Middle finger missing so I can not give a fuck
I can hear the bells ringing off the nice dream truck
So I'm chasing the dreams, no realities
Hoping that maturity won't be too mad at me
But if so, I'll take the scorn, indeed happily
Long as I can feel my heart tap like happy feet

Fatherless kids, orphans like me and Domo is
A fuck that we will never give is like our pops
But what we did was found our niche and made a stitch
Just like a shirt, that's why our stains smell like the shit, that's from

I'm an odd fellow, the opposite of mellow
The therapist said hello but my mom would wonder
I was dealing with iller shit like professional plumbers
Like food for thought was my father but I ain't have the hunger
My self esteem was like me, tall and full of flaws
My pride is gone, I'm that guy like Aaron Hall
Shit, I know some niggas wear their hearts on they sleeves
But I wear mine on my head, Supreme

They don't paint pictures, they just trace me

Odd Future, I'm your mothafucking sergeant
Nigga, I'm in charge, I fuck with Freshjive
Cause I get it, no charge, and BBC for the low price
No barging, nigga that's a bargain
Cow print t-shirt like mothafucking dog
On the mothafucking farm with cockadoddle doodles
I'm making straight bitches pussy wet just like a noodle
And my dick must be dog food to these bitches' poodles
Felines on the free time, I'm tossing bitches' salads
And I'm eating up they croutons, Erica to Milan
We was flying to Milan, was supposed to go to Bangkok
Until she figured out that she don't really like to bang cock
To Soho, Baby Milo so dope
The cocaine flow, niggas spit heat, propane
Niggas get the picture, I see, why?

My nigga, no hook
No hook, fuck a hook

Yo, beside me, nobody likes me
Mainly because I am not a fucking HypeBeast
I think Supreme suck, we gnarly in our Nikes
I can wear some Wranglers, with a fucking White T
Doo-rags to match, and I do sag
In fact, my hat is in tact with the Fubu pull over
Nigga, you pull over, fuck a Rover Range
And I'm driving a unicorn, plus my bitch is strange
And I'm the only fucking rapper without a chain
With a four finger ring like I can't spell my fucking name
And I go to Obama rallies screaming out "McCain"
Them ignorant thrashing mothafuckers is my gang
And the dirty Ladera, I can't forget where I came from
Nigga, you don't claim none, fun I am the teacher
White and black bitch like she's a mothafucking zebra
Candies in my pocket, I see you niggas on Easter

The beat is turning old, so go

Synthesizer, I'm the mothafucking master
Nigga, I'm a bastard, I fuck with chord keys
Cause the sound lasts longer, bass drummer song
And a hi-hat made of plastic, nigga's sound is elastic
Nigga, you can bite this, unless you want to bite back
I didn't take my fucking Ritalin, this is a hype track
HypeTrack that and send it, nigga it's a sack shit
I had you motherfuckers eating salad like a fat bitch

Drop it, Ace the Creator, O.F.M, banging on your FM
Ace the Creator, drop the drums, nigga, thank you to HypeBeast

Mula!
Like Adam in the Garden of Eve
My bitch got an apple bottom and she swallow my seeds
Follow my lead, fire I breathe, water my seed
And sit back and watch money grow on trees
Droppin' seeds like classes, these hoes drop they asses
I drop a seed in her panties, if it smell like pansies
I'm a banshee in her panties, nigga, ask your mammy
Never played golf, but got a driver and a Caddy
Whole squad slammin' like Onyx, you know Sticky Fingaz
Some drop science, I'm droppin' English
Even if Tyler named the song "Flower"
No seeds in the bud, still don't trust bugs
I'm down

Droppin' seeds on these niggas
Droppin' seeds on these bitches
For the love of the sport
I'm droppin' seeds, got this garden
Flowers poppin' of course
I'm droppin' seeds, motherfucker
Weezy Baby the boy! Yugh!

Fly with the birds in the wind
Where you wanna go, who, what, why, when?
On a scale from nine to ten
You taking L's baby, hold my hand and feel like the wind
Now fasten your seat belt, and turn everything off
I got your attention, mothafucka I'm bout to take off
I'm the new pilot in this bitch
And I ain't bring no extra baggage for this trip
But I do bring a terror like I hate America
A brand new camera and a parachute
Nigga you and I are not the same, we not parallel
Don't talk to me 'fore I fuckin' embarrass you
Now sit your ass down you doin' three much
I'm the captain on this bitch, don't get it fucked up
Or you'll get fucked up

I'm so far ahead you niggas I'm in the future
Y'all don't even know about my existence, it's like I'm dead to you
You niggas, I'm sayin',look, y'all be on the stupid shit
I'm the fuckin' pilot, your role is to be the stewardess
I'm the fuckin' bomb like I was stuffing my shoe with it
The boy's a fucking problem like turbulence boy, get used to it
If anything happens its one door
If I see a building, motherfucker we're done for
I'mma hit a couple of 'em up this is Parkour
Better call your family and give 'em your last wishes, nigga
And every line dirty, you thought that I dug ditches
But I never give a fuck, it's like I was born dickless
I don't wanna crash anymore, I don't wanna crash anymore
I just wanna soar through the space, let the wind hit my face
Till there's nothing left in the gas tank
I don't wanna crash, I don't wanna crash anymore
I don't wanna crash anymore
Till there's nothing left in the gas tank, I don't wanna crash

I'm in first class but I feel like coach, yeah
Uh, cause I'm in first class but I feel like coach, yeah
It's kinda weird
Cause I'm in first class but I feel like coach

I'm tryna find a place, a place where I can land at
A place where I can be
With no alphabet dictatin' where to stand at
You can buy a car, you can buy many things
You can buy happiness but you can't buy wings
You can buy a parachute, you can buy a parrot
But you can't buy a pair of wings, aerodynamic
To stay cloud level
That's why I'm in first class but I feel like coach
It's just crazy how you can have everything in the world but
You in first class but you feel like coach, damn

I don't wanna --

Yo, I've seen a lot of niggas
So when them niggas start talkin' reckless, I get offended
I get it, they try to keep a image
But look real closely at the pictures and you see that they chameleons
How you doin'?
You in the motherfucking building?
Nigga, I'm an architect, got another crane and I don't know if Imma park it yet, you ain't even start one yet, fuck off my property
Tell Australia I'm sneaking in with a mic in my damn hand
Instead of the vegetables that I packed in my backpack
When Marshall had this problem, what the fuck was they telling him?
Is it cause of status or his melanin lacks black? Huh?
I think people love to be mad
How can I be misogynist? I love titties and ass
How can I be homophobic when my boyfriend's a fag?
And we been hiding in the closet like our passion is fashion
Still trying to come out
Couldn't deal with niggas who decide to take the fun out
Probably cause I like to be in places where the sun out
So comparing niggas lights is a motherfucking bum out
Thought y'all niggas nudists but y'all clothes
I was 'bout to tee off and putt-putt till the end
Now it's Anti-Golf Boys cause I don't fuck with my friends
Worse thing they gave me was an opportunity and a pen
Look, freedom of speech? My freedom was breached
Border Patrol put me on streets immediately
For shit I said when I was a virgin repeatedly
Posting on Hypebeast cause nobody would listen to me
My child is product of me, very honest
Left of center, very different, they didn't want us
They didn't get us, didn't fit enough for their standards
Diverse and loud, so they ignore us
You put your life in a child that everybody hates
Now everybody hates papa despite that papa's great
But that's your favorite child boy that's your favorite one
I don't think they hear it, I was fearing deteriorating
Almost ate my spirit til the children cheered along
Watching them sing the songs
Eyeballs inspired from Pilot to 2Seater, I couldn't steer them wrong
That's why I rode the Mclaren, couldn't stop at the Bimmer
"Tyler losing himself, and that nigga turned to a diva
Nigga preaching and wildin', nigga smilin' and breathing
Tryna inspire all the little niggas that wanna be him
Cats cats daddy problems
Kickflip fuck fuck, cupcakes buttrape
Golf Wang, daddy problems fag fag dad dad
Bike lake everything that I hate, plus being sad"
Y'all can cry about your year's top rap new albums
Golf did a quarter million in about two hours
Money money ain't the motive, but it is up for discussion
Niggas frontin' niggas wish that they could fuck with my production nigga
Saying you the plug, get your chords up
I was writing string sections on my tour bus
They adore me, my little birds
Be free flap your wings, I encourage it
Look, I wish I had a fucking xanax problem
So y'all talk about how I deep I am
Man-child in the flesh bitch I'm Peter Pan
You captain tier hook  muthafuckas won't ever be the man
I got a muthafucking vision I don't see your plans
So shut your muthafucking mouth when I be speaking man
Cause T the only sober nigga that be tweaking fam

Fuck, I don't like rapping like that

Welcome to the euphoria of cocaine without Abel
I can make music that makes sense, but not meant to be stable
Eighteen with the whole world in front of me
Odd Future teenagers, nobody can fuck with we

I scream and jump around on couches while you sit and talk
I skip to places, smiling faces, while you fucking walk
My TV stays on Cartoon Network, fuck that Twilight shit
You have highlights about your life, I have life about my highlights, bitch
Go to college, get a job, marry, have a kid
Watch them grow and then you die? No, nigga fuck the system

Good kids make bad grown ups
Stay gold, stray old, maturing means that your life sucks
In my wolf suit I roam where the wild things at
Still growing, still learning, not knowing that I'm maxed
I don't want to grow up, I know that shit for a fact, nigga eighteen

They say I'm immature, I say that they depressed
I talk to unicorns, I'm wearing a uniform
Of a nigga that don't give a fuck about time
You live your life all serious while I'm enjoying mine

Wow, that's, that's a really good way to look at it
Yeah I mean... I don't
I mean I'm really hyper and everything with my imagination
Ohh okay - ADHD?
I'm not having ADHD like
One second I'm real hype as fuck
But the next minute - I can just slow that shit down

Ace, The Creator
Hodgy Beats

We come through throbbing like thunder storms
Make their feets get wet and funky up in they under arms
I'm too explosive for your ears like I'm throwing bombs
With the exclusive on the channel, bitch I know it's on
Niggas get mad like cheerleaders, they throw they pom-poms
Suck a dick, eat salaam getting they nails done in salons
Hodgy Beats is like lip balm
If you talk shit, I'll make you cry and tell your big moms
I got nice hands, niggas eat out my big palms
Haters must be starving nowadays I make California Vietnam
And I'm going to embalm my creativity
Into a CD-ROM, so you can feel this shit I'm on

Turn it up, where's the bass?
Bring the keys, yeah
Bring the keys, oh my God
Turn it up nigga, where's the bass?
Could you bring the keys? Yeah
Turn it up, nigga where's the bass?
Drop the drums

Pink chinchilla, something like thrilla
My t-shirts are bathing, a bathing gorilla
You niggas all hype like you drink a cup of Splenda
But I ate the whole plate like a fat bitch dinner
I'm never the winner, always the loser
I don't choose to win, but I will choose her
Her kitty-cat fish loves his tuna
I never use a fork I always spoon her
Go nuts, instrumental flow much
European model white bitch is eating donuts
Fuck you faggots, I'm with a fat bitch
Making shit come like I'm go-go gadget
I'm mental, it's instrumental
Make your bitches' therapist ask for dental records
And I hope this record have you stabbing niggas with colored pencils

Yo, bubble gum that Reese's Pieces
You fail at life, I'll mug your teachers
I've got Muslims calling on Jesus
I fucked Kelly, where is Regis?
Found Alicia, now she keyless
Cold as ice, and now I'm creamless
Murdered every bod from my squad
So technically, now I'm teamless, O.F. is so prestigious

Listen, Listen
Real nigga I got y'all
Hit up and eat up a nigga, hot dog
AK-47 shoot a nigga
Fuck you and your crew nigga
Ya'll niggas weak as fuck
I come through in a pink ass truck
Big rims, big body
Ya'll niggas 12 gauge shottie
Pow, pow to a nigga dome
Run up through a nigga home
Nigga know his bitch a bitch
And I'm a dog I give that bitch a bone
Arf, Arf, bark, bark can't see a nigga in the dark, dark
Hit a nigga quick, nigga got a problem, make his bitch lick a dick
I'm mothafuckin goon ass nigga you don't really wanna fuck with

Boy, I know
That we could be more
Than just friends
But you're scared

Something for you and me
Oh darlin', it's in the way you want me
You can see the answers are all there
Some how this world is such a struggle just to be
Fuck em' all, baby, it's just you and me

You make me better
And I know this don't make sense
But you make me better

Alone, alone, alone
Ah-lone
Alone, at home, alone
Yeah, oh
Alone
Lone

Fuck you running for nigga?
Aye nigga, come here nigga
Let me try that hat on
I told you come over here stupid bitch
Come over here with that weak ass hat

All y'all niggas smoking y'all brains out
In the car called life take the lame route
Going nowhere fast but you think that you not
Cause you never hesitate to take the thang out
In the drop top, pop the trunk then pop pop
At his drop top, took another lame out
Oh you the big nigga? Took a hit nigga?
Well I hope you understand you ain't shit nigga
Cause them niggas whole purpose is to get niggas
And make sure that your mama cry the pain out
Now that gang is out to get you
But you stuck in the same house
Nigga never came out, wow
It's a shame how you got sucked in that life
But hey man at least you got a name now
They say you a "real nigga" cause you kill niggas
Nuts for that ice and that cream banana peel niggas
Banana clips spill, niggas wanna bang out
For they approval boy, you can't even hang out
That light you hit, it was the light I held
That's why you never ever see me with my chains out
I don't need to, truth they don't feed you
Lies what they got on their plate, they gon eat you
They got a homie called Karma he gon meet you
Better look the other way if he ever see you
And run as fast as you can, nigga

That's the shit I be talkin' bout, though
We ain't try'na hear that shit, my nigga
Cuz, stay preachy cuz
Like nigga come on homie
I don't wanna hear that shit, preachy shit my nigga
Yeah, we all black, who give a fuck, cuz?
I don't give a fuck, nigga
Whatchu mean?

Now when I first saw you
I could tell you was the one
That I've been searchin' for
I needed somethin' that was like the Sun
Now all my flowers grow
Right now my life, it blooms, baby

You're my favorite color, my favorite color
My favorite color's you
It's like the endless summer, endless summer
Whenever I'm with you
Cause you're my yellow, yellow, yellow

The only girl I ever loved
Fucked some nigga that I really hate
And the funny part about it that we didn't even date
But at the end she could still say she got her pussy ate
Yummy her in her tummy, pour out cause
Cummy in her bummy means that a little me being coming
So I let her blow my flute and start humming, bitch's brewin'
But that wasn't bubble gum that she was chewin'
Our relationship was like my music, chopped up, screwed up
Made her sick threw up, I gave her everything that wasn't enough
So I put two up, I'm hot, she cool, I call it a blue crush
We fucked, no kiss, that's it, fuck love
Snort drugs, make songs, go skate, daily life
Sarah or Dorothy, which one to make my wife
Or maybe I'll just marry both of them bitches, maybe twice

I was in love, but fuck it

Dorothy, my everything
She was my everything
Sarah, I love you

O.F.M. bangin' in your muthafuckin' FM, Tyler the Creator

Bitch ass niggas don't know me, new sandwich with bologna
I ain't really y'all niggas friends, none of you motherfuckers is my homie
I bought a brand new treat, y'all niggas don't know me
A B C, 1 2 3, AK-47 hit a nigga in his teeth
He can talk a lot of shit but don't really wanna be handling the motherfucking business that he needs
I'm a hit a motherfucking nigga in the back when I see you
Fuji Water, Fuji Water, I'mma go and piss on my daughter
You don't believe me, I'm a monster

Real nigga on the track bitch
Come through with the sandwich
That's bread, lettuce, cheese, mustard, bread, crumble

Uh, you know the buick got the suicide
Roll up on that buick nigga you're gone die
You will never know who in fucking side
I come through commit a fucking suicide
I got nine knives, nine lives, nine bags of chips
Nine bitches, we about to go on a field trip

Sandwich, bread, lettuce, cheese, tomato, mustard, bread, crumble
Sandwich, bread, lettuce, cheese, tomato, ketchup, mustard
Who you trying to fuck with

Not me nigga, because I got the heat nigga
If you got a fucking problem nigga I will motherfucking lay the shit down like lyrics on a
Beat nigga Get your ass beat nigga, Talk shit to me
I don't like that, I'll put a fucking bundle of bananas in my fucking ass

Real nigga what's up
Lettuce, cheese, tomato, mustard, bread, crumble

My new, my new, my new bitch got a new line up
Rolex with the time up
Don't believe I'm the best nigga, playback rewind up
I give no fucks, Do I give fucks
I give no fucks

These niggas got a problem on their hands
It might be me, It might be me

If you wanna be the one for me
You're gonna have to show me your motherfucking back handling skills
Bro that's on me for realla, real nigga in the spot
I might come through with a Glock, and kill you
We gone sing until the night's over, What you looking at boy

Call me wavy, the way that I'm cappin' ya
All black guns like I'm going to war with Africa
Nigga got a problem, I'll be...
Wolf Gang, Golf Wang, Trash Wang

Sandwich, lettuce, bread, cheese, mustard, crumble, we who you trying to fuck with?

Pussy nigga think he trying to talk shit to me on Facebook and Twitter?
Call me Mark Maguire, I'mma hitter

Bitches know I'm the bomb, I mustard
You can call me dijon

Hey... you...

Looking good in that skirt
Flirting is the effective way that this works
Down to the lake and eat a couple of pringles
Picnic by the way, hey I’m single
Pardon my bad manners, french and lingo
Reflection in the lake being seen by Stevie
You're a golden lady and it seems that me and you
We’re supposed to be the ozone team but who
Would have thought this conversation would have grew
Into me talking about sun rays with you!
I’m turning to a creep, that just won’t sleep
Next sex, that's cause you used to that kind of poo
See I'm the new shit in town
Lets mash together and make new browns
How that sound?

Hey, shit, it sounds cool to me
It sounds cool to me
Oh it sounds cool to me
It sounds cool to me!
Hey girl, that shit sounds cool to me!
Shit sounds good to me!

So many good reviews off of Bastard
I celebrated, getting masturbated by my pastor
Now he's in a plastic, on the kitchen table
Near a bowl of Lucky Charms and the newest Thrasher

When I say Wolf Gang, you say fuck that
Room full of wolves, inhalers and used blunt wraps
Fingers in the middle of bitches bodacious butt cracks
Enough fucking atheist rappers to get a nun slapped
Um, that's not a potato, give me my gun back
Before I blast bigger than pimples on Big Pun's back
Black fat bitches was washin' on my dishes
And using my large stick on her lips like my cum's chapped
I love Jews but I hate faggots
And bitches who be nagging about me taking the trash out
I got a fuckin' can of whoop ass, who wants to pack it
Going ape shit in the newest bape straight jacket
With six dicks of chap stick, sticking in my black lips
Six sippie cups full of sick shit enhancements
Wolf Gang spit right
Ain't been this much fuckin' crack rock music since free way had flip side
So get low, lower than a ditch
I'm with some retarded bitch, hoping she know how to kiss low
They know, I'm the clinic's aid and I'm sick
So they clap for me kinda like a herpe on the lip
With some tutor bitch, tryna tickle wetback hooter this
Bitch acting I still did not know with it
Until I put this cock on, the end of clitoris
Fucking this game I used this shit as spit as lubricant
I got this fuckin' gun, you better say yes you stupid bitch
Before you lose your wrist and rich make you do some dick
I'm fucking crazy, well I guess I am if these shoes will fit
Fuck the Key club, they wanna ban 'em
I got fucking fans from Compton to Montana
To Indiana, where deaf dwarfs still don't understand 'em
Stomp 'em out, with these crab ass Nikes
Make it look like some slob, scribbled all on his white Tee
Invite me, come on, you got a better chance to getting Shake
Animals is farming you, patrick this is barnacles
Said he gave Ace a spongejob at the carnival
And Spongebob got his head knocked from the piss that Ace got
Nigga's soft as baby cock and the cotton swab

This that fuck music, put your shit and fuck to it
Shouldn't give one when your bumping in the trunk to it
Grab a couple gats, stuff 'em in your backpack and then take 'em to school
For show and tell day screamin' "fuck students"
Locate the bitch that didn't wanna give you kiss
Then get her tits, then use your fists to add a couple lumps to it
Shoot the faculty for taking hats, you stupid butts
Skip the music teacher and the janitor you real cool with
Continue this procedure until lunch is through with
Go home out the back like a scared student
Keep a low pro, until you on your block
Then you just make it home in time for new news brief at 2ish
Stuck at all this bible study, shit is not fun
Me and wolf gang go jump nuns for hot fun
Playing with the bell when shots heard, and cops come
But I'm still punchin' this bitch out, I'm not done
Sittin' in my room masturbating
Truthful, these lyrics are relating like my dad did
I make music for teenagers and bad ass kids
Bastard touched more boys than your local church did
Killing these niggas off quick
Don't believe me then watch me empty out a full clip
Trigger being pulled, niggers in a ditch
That wasn't bullets, that was copies of Bastard you bitch

Oh I beg you, can I follow?
Oh I ask you, why not always?
Be the ocean, where I unravel
Be my only, be the water where I'm wadin'

You're my river runnin' high, run deep, run wild
I follow, I follow you, deep sea baby, I follow you
I follow, I follow you, dark doom honey, I follow you

He a message, I'm the runner
He the rebel, I'm the daughter waitin' for you

Wait, you wanna fuckin' drown? Go ahead
Head first in that goddamn river, you're dead
I said that I loved you, heartbeats when you get near
X's and O's, you must be the rose
Cause my exes are hoes, and where you gonna go
When you run through my head all day?
And I got a foot fetish, so I probably have sex with your toes
Um, life is a water park, could be fun
I'd swim in your ocean of love
If I had a life jacket cause I'm not that dumb
So next time I come, I'll bring you one
So you don't drown, when you decide to follow
And I'm gonna go deep cause you're not that shallow, right?

I said Lisa you a stupid bitch
Kissed my dad gave em herpes now
He got crabs from this last girl
This other girl too he kissed my
Last sister sister last sister too
Lisa you dumb bitch you left me
For some other chick nigga
And the baby too the baby dick
You but mines a little small
I dont give a fuck
I look like a fucking frog

Lisa

I gave you what you want, Gave you what you need
Then I gave you a kiss, Now my penis bleeds
Now I'm at the clinic bitch, Now I'm stuck up at the dentist
In this motherfucking relation, I hate it bitch it's finished
You gave me war, I gave you peace
Infection on your yeast then you tried to fuck my niece
She only seven but when she turn eleven
Ya'll can fuck the indians for hotdogs at 7eleven
Huh You tried to give a kiss but the little bitch
Got herpes on her lips and here bitch listen
You was it, I wasn't pimpin'
You half black How the fuck you gonna burn up all the chicken
You can't make Kool-Aid, I'm so serious
No fruit punch so I had to drink your period
Fuckin' buying bape dildos up on my visa
I was in love with you Lisa

Hey, What's this bump on my lip
What the fuck is this yellow shit comin' out of my dick bitch
I should've used a fucking rubber
Lisa, Bitch you told me your name was Rhonda
Show my little brother, How to take an aids test
Come to find out, My ass was positive
Took care of all seven of ya kids
Bitch, Fuck Bobby Brown now it's her prerogative
Sniffin' coke, Smokin' Grass
Should've never fucked you in the ass
Bitch, you are crackhead, Everyone knows
Whats your name and she said Clean
And I'm like Hmm..
What happened?
I said bitch

You stupid ass bitch, I can't believe you did me wrong
I gave you a kiss and I went to go home
I came back to the fucking house, You fucking rat
Now I came back shoulda, I don't give a fuck you stupid fuck
Bitch you smell like ass, I gave you a kiss
I really love you bitch, Why would you do me like this
I gave you everything like my fucking dick
I gave you money, cars, diamonds and shit
Then you suck everbody's motherfucking dick
Suck enough niggas like a std and shit bitch
Ain't taking care you no more
See your kids smoke more so get the fuck out the door
And get on your knees and suck my dick one last time
This one time suck it suck it like It fall off and shit

I gave you everything I had
Bitch I let you fuck my dad

See, it was all good and stuff, and you just come
To my house and chill on my couch, but now, you gave me everything
You had, herpes, gonorrhea, syphilis, I can't even give my mom
She took your baby? Bitch thats based
I'll stab this bitch with a motherfucking pencil
When I go get her, she gone get knocked
We loved you Lisa
You even fucked everyone in the family
Can't even go to the family reunion, bitchhhhhhhh
Mmm Lisa bitch
Hee hee Odd Future, ahh shoot a nigga
Aahh, okay okay
You can stop recording
Waitwaitwait one more thing one more thing one more thing
Uhh, you still recording? Oh
Fuck em all Odd Future, Bitch

Oh that's nice, do you wanna hang out some time
That time on the clock, we could either go to Rosco's or Wingstop
Unless, you wanna see a flick, my homie work at pacific
That means I could get a ticket for a couple six bucks
But that's priceless compared to getting my dick sucked girl
I'm just playing, I'm not really hanging out with you for laying
I'm tryna mold a relationship I'm claying
So I can hear your thoughts and see what your saying
Favorite color, AP Government, this conversation I'm loving it
We can talk about your favorite music, talk about politics
I got an open mind I'm into all type of shit

We could go to the movies, you don't gotta kiss me
I could pull my pants down, you don't gotta lick me
Even if we go to the bathroom, I'll help you, we don't have to getta quickie
We could have study groups, girl just hang with me

Bitch, roll up

A-C-E, O-F, uh

Wild, I'm not tame just because my visions are strange
I am normal not deranged, I am not a fucking lame
Your pee dripping wet, I need all my nutrients
On the phone, if I take you home how much can I get?
Yeah, I like you but, you act like you don't like us
We could start a whole new religion girl, in Odd we trust
You play hard to got, got me hard like cement
Here's my car I love please do not dip, please just

I'm a fucking monster, my Tonka is trucker
In my locker got books, I'm a nasty mothafucker
Truth or dare in the cemetery, right past the elementary
My faith lasts for the whole century
You could bite my neck or I could bite your neck
Or you could bite her and excite her you will not regret
My castle got dungeons, my dungeons got dungeons
Open up them legs, let me see what's for lunch and

And the sky is dark
The bats invade the park
The water swims the shark
But don't just wait, go

Ignorant, Atheist, sound like a fucking monster
Tall, skinny, lanky, buck it, fuck it badass posture
Cops are angering the hell
Where they discounted mounted
With the devil, he was formal and some Polo and some Dockers
Dancing with him playing vengeance Cindi Lauper with some Crips
In all red like they playin' Red Lobster
My bitch is white Italian to be exact
Mobster is her father and he'll kill me
When he finds out I'm reading her Harry Potter
FUCK HIM!, Im a Demon fill your daughter up with semen
With Supreme embroidered logos, making fun of homos cause its funny
Tommy rugby hilfiger screaming nigga with the klux
I'm a fuckin' Nazi with a condom, barely give a fuck
Odd Future Wolf Gang, Fuck Lame, 91'
We hockey fuckin' awesome, hit you with the Wolf Gang puck
Puck, trucks thunder now shes in the trunk wondering why shes about to get raped and chopped up, lumber
He said, write a sixteen, well she was seventeen
And I'm only eighteen and that's statutory rape
And if you fuckin' snitch on me I guess i'll make the great escape
To have a date with your dead body and I cannot be late
Might do a Ted Bundy, I can consider ya'll some haughtys
If they find me at my home, guess I gotta fuckin roam
All alone ,in the streets, gotta hustle drugs for food
Gotta sell beats for clothes if I really wanna eat
Fuck you, O.F.M. Bangin' on your mothafuckin' FM
Fuck Tammy

I get high in Ohio
Fucken' coke and a smile
Devil reading the bible
Reverends triggered the rifle
Animal heads important to the back yard again
Bury the Backyardigans
Blood covers my button up in step fathers cardigan
Erect a pistol, eject a clip full of missiles
A bodybag, to clean the gory issue
Closed casket, faggot, burn the house down with you
End this shit to end this shit
Does heaven have a membership?
Because I pick up angels by a pistol whip
This time she's so beautiful and me
Unusual to see
Shove her in the trunk, you can go with me
You like my FreshJive shirt, well I can give you one for free
Cause' when I wished for it I found me on a killin' spree
...Just leave up to me

My mom caught me jackin' off to Hannah Montana with a banana peel
Sippin' a cherry Fanta to match my dress and my purple heels
Looking like I'm Santa but skinny in a black weave, it's real
In a stolen truck with my license to kill
I tell em' "I'm Frank from Montana, the king of the hill"
Except I'm a nigga from the junk yard gang
Bill Cosby couldn't spot me if I copied a duck in a bill
Simply cause I do not give a fuck like virginity
Illmatic with the tactics
I do not give a fuck how you feel, I got wolf
I flow backwards like heat when it chills on a thermometer
A skatin', rappin', composin' photographer is
Back like a black bitch's hairline, kilometer
Hotter than Madonnadoo-doo mama back-up dancers with the windows rolled up inside the Honda driving through Nevada during summer
Tyler, comma, the Creator is a fucking animal
I'm such spitting like a llama nigga

Listen

Bad ass bitch
Big ass titties man
Got fucking AKs the size of a fucking mini van
Ya'll niggas got problems then ya'll do it
So much fucking money in my pocket
I fucking walk stoooopidd
Hold up
Bad bitch look good in some nice pants
Bet my bitch look good in some nice pants
Niggas see me they be "shit got damn , AK-47 tucked in that nigga nice pants!!"
Hold on
Ya'll got a little nigga started on some G-Shit
"Who that nigga that looked swagged out?"
THATS ME BITCH !
Don't play with a nigga money or it's fucking family
I got goon niggas named Jonathan and one named Tammy
Ya'll niggas got a fucking problem say it to my fucking face
Got lil' niggas that'll sock you in the fucking face
And if you think that they won't sock you in your fucking face
Aye you a BI-ahhhhh !! pop you right in your fucking face

Hey! What's your name? Oh, that's nice
Me? I'm Wolf, you can call me Tyler though
I'm eighteen, you from around here?
Oh, you look like my next victim
I said you look like my ex-girlfriend, sister

While James is jamming on the mixer
We can play Twister naked
Don't be afraid, it's just a kiss
I'm open to everything if you're inviting your sister
That's another topic, we should start a project
You could be the lab rat, I could be the doctor
Let me drug you up and put different things in you
But I'm not gonna do that until you begin to pass out
Now I can draw your face up pretty
Or do it jackass and leave your breath all shitty
Or I can get the hand held and hold held titty
And stick my dick in you but that just might offend you
Teenage parties, I recommend you
Never get drunk with a nigga like us
But I kinda like your company
And you rubbing on my dick, yeah it comforts me
Fuck, condom pocket, luckily, I brought one
Herpes virus, yeah bitch, I fought one
I don't want you to have my permit yet
That I just haven't came up with a name yet
I got some new shit, well technically, I got a new dick
The other one fell off in a pulpit
A gay coaches' white grease and Crisco?
Blew the fuck up in gray clouds of thick smoke
Funny, right? Ha-ha, this shit's jokes
I got the idea from a letter that the shit wrote

Hey, you right there
In that pretty red dress, let's dance
I said hey, you right there
In that pretty red dress, let's fuck

Well, I have a gram cupcake mix
Mix a little syrup, it ain't no way to cure him
But I don't do the syrup, I just do the sniffles
Take a couple bits, bitch kibbles, bitch I gotta riddle
What can you tickle that can make a dinosaur giggle
I'm tryna get your puss, your pimple is a push
Away from the tush, I don't smoke kush
I don't do drugs, I don't even club
I don't drink beer, why the fuck am I here
The girls are really cute but there on X
And that's a better reason to for me to take advantage with sex
And you might be next, you pass out on
Me and your mouth drool, throw you in my van now it's carpool
Let you rest your ass on my dick like a barstool
Going deep like a scuba with the snorkle
You never gonna forgive me, but your so damn pretty
I'mma drop you off home quickly
You passed out, bitch you ain't even listening
And leave your house empty, your neighbors didn't see me
Your never gonna get me, your self respect were skimpy
You was up thirty, now your down fifty
Abracadabra your memory I'm tricky
You are water wild so I guess your pussy empty
Just like your home by taking the store of oreos
Over by the cabin of cheerios and the mint tea

Yep. But.. I had fun, tonight..

I got these bitches brewin'
Fuckin' up my gold pots

You like my songs, I like your tits
But deep down, I don't really like you bitch
You got a nice tongue and you wear a nice thong
But bitch you dumb as fuck to right from wrong
Now Simon says get the fuck out my life
Cause you're not my wife, bitch you're a stand for this night
And you could be a stab for this knife
I'm seventeen, you're twenty-six
You're a divorced slut and you can't suck dick
You dropped outta college, you can't pay shit
But I'm broke as fuck too bitch, we on the same boat
Where's my inhaler? I think I'm gonna puke
Cause I can't believe I lost my virginity to you
Yeah, you was in it and I was in it too
But I guess I'm just gonna make this fish stew because

Bitch shake your ass, shake it until the wet sweat
Crawls right down the crack of your ass
Booty meets snack, back that ass up
Until you come back up and lick my sack up
I'm Tyler the Creator, hang with thrashers and skaters
I do sound like Darth Vader
But that's not stoppin' me from eatin' your muffin
I think you and your friends
Should come with me to get your salad tossed
Cause when I make this stew
In your gold pot addin' extra sauce because

I got these bitches brewin' inside of my gold pots
And there's wet pussy on my face shake that ass
And don't make vibrations stop

Man, I feel like, I'll win a Grammy, y'know?
I had a, a dream, y'knahmean?
Right now I'm livin the first scene, y'know?
This gon' be a long thank you, umm
Thank you to, Left Brain, Hodgy Beats
Casey Veggies, Super 3, Matt Martians
Mom, I love you, I made it!
The whole family, shit umm
Devon, Shaun, R.C., Juan
Chris, Robert, Randy, Aaron
Jasmine, Jackson, Taj, Grand
Christina, Milan, Geo, Yan
Ice, Skyler, Daniel, Mookie
Mars, Urbie, Josh, Jason
Domo, Katano, Brandun Deshay
Uhhh...
Big ups to Sould Banana Crew
My whole Grind Time Family
Kicks Material, Ill Boss, Switch
Erykah Veggies, Casen Kreation
You know all the blogs that held me down
Big ups to all my niggas at the DIRTY~! man
Dirty! Big ups to HypeBeast, all my niggas on Hype Crew
Got mad love for Hype Track
Thomas Warlowe what's good?
Eric Koston, K.B, old T.K. I mean the crazy one
Lizard King, I I remember when I first saw Brandon Biebel
Umm, y'know shoutout to Harold Hunter
That nigga, he he influenced me so much
Darrell Stanton, Yeah Right! Fully Flared, Baker 3
Mystery, take that, Atmosphere, Ride the Sky, Lakai
Umm Supreme - whattup to my Diamond Fam?
FreshJive Rick I see you, BBC, Ice Cream
Ralph Lauren Peg Leg S, everybody at Media Arts
The best magazine in the world other than Odd Future
Mass Appeal, XXL, Thrasher
What's up to WingStop? The 212 bus
"In Search Of...", "Fly or Die", "Chronic 2001"
"The Love Below", "Wanderland", "Voodoo", "Pleasures U Like"
"Blueprint 2", "Lord Willin'", "Marshall Mathers LP"
"Baduizm", "Devil's Night", "Love Deluxe", "Diamond Life"
"Chemical Chords", "Urban Hang Suite", "Chrome Children"
"Customized Greatly", "Welcome", "Love Angel"
"A Funk Oddyssey", "Flood", "You Think You Really Know Me"
"Get Rich or Die Tryin'", "God's Son", "Gorillaz"
"Kid A", "The Hollywood Recordings", "In My Mind", "Justified"
"Juslisen", "Shades of Blue", "Mama's Gun", "Midnight Marauders,"
Uhh "Clones", "Off the Wall", "Rhythm & Gangsta", "Volume 1"
"Pronounced Jah-Nay", "Who's Jill Scott?", "Evolution Of", "Special Herbs"
"Tropea Blue", "Under the Cherry Moon", "We Got it 4 Cheap"
"Back to Black", "Word of Mouf", "The Documentary"
It's just so many to name man, umm
Adult Swim, uhh Fresh Prince, Magic School Bus, Reading Rainbow
90's Nick, Dave Chappelle, Chris Rock, Eddie Murphy, Will Smith
Terry Richardson, Square Pixel, Teena Tyrell
Krink, Hitler, Mussolini, Stalin, M'butu, Nixon, Reagan
Clinton, Obama, Mark Ryden, Rick Rotney, Tetris - what Sonic!
Grand Theft Auto, Mario, Salvador Dali
All the porn in the world
Belly, E.T., Dr. Seuss
And last but not least, you...

Boy you messing up and truthfully I've had enough
Full of crap like I ate that john
Let's buy stuff and get those kids with dads and moms
Those little punks gotta learn, we ain't takin no mess
What's up man? Do your best
Cause I don't have no home meal to come to
I got a bunch of these, a bunch of these
Not Dahm, if I was a Dahm I would be Humpty
Green hat the color of a leprechaun with leprosy
Surprised she hasn't did school stuff in the alley oop
Golf Wang hooligans messing up the school again
Showing you and yours that doing stuff is really cool again
Look at my hat, it's cool
Punches to the stomach where that other stuff's supposed to be
Forget this man, yeah!

My love is gone for you Tommy, you can go figure
So I'mma spit like I ain't never spit before
And I'mma make all that.. dough
So is you messing with me? No
This that Wolf Gang, this that, this that Wolf Gang
Green hats and green gats, knocking everybody on their back
Mess around with me and I'm gon scratch your cat, uh!

They don't know us, they don't know us
They don't know where we from, they don't know nothing
I ain't joking

My life, screw it with a drunk bitch
Like what the fuck are we doin'
We kissin', I'm weezing, it's time to play Tetris
I play piano, jack off I'm anorexic
I'm fucking asthmatic, my records problematic
Talkin' to myself because my therapist done had it
All the racial slurs from the wangsters playin' from Lenny Kravitz
Love Lockdown like I am some sort of faggot
But I'm not in the first place
Waiting on my dad to say hi on my birthday
Cause Jesus wouldn't even be my friend on Church day
I plan on getting back *censored* the worst way
In the jungle, I planned on the keeper
Inside of the cage cause I'm a motherfuckin' Zebra
Obama's in office, niggas get job like teachers
Lookin' out, retarded kids screamin' out fuck slob, Jesus

And I can write a hook fast
I can get straight to the cash
Y'all niggas come last, I'm first though
No rehearsal, I know it all like Urkel
You can call it commercial
So turn it up, turn it up
Odd Future won't stop it

I make music for a reason, didn't vote Obama
So you can charge me with treason
Year round asshole, the fuck you season
The flu, I'm sick that's why everybody sneezin'
I'm always cheesin', smile for a reason
Fuck as I fuck you, I'm always teasin'
My daughter need milk and a quilt
So I'm sellin' the the haze for six bucks cause she always sneezin'
Some people need drugs, some people need dubs
On they car note to go to the club
But really, really, really, all I need deep down is a hug

Look, I'm back like niggas on a bus
With a Rosa Parks state of mind, I don't give a fuck
And I'm strollin' Down South like Good Luck Chuck
In a Malcolm X shirt chillin' with the Ku Klux
Klan, I ain't nothin' to fuck with
O.F. clan they ain't nothin' to fuck with
The O.F. clan they ain't nothin' to fuck with
This Black Snake Moan is somethin' to suck bitch

I'm recordin' that shit on the fuckin' little mic
By the little camera thing on the fuckin' Mac book
So this shit is choppy and bad quality, but fuck it
Wolf Gang, Ace Creator

Somebody tell Justin Beiber that I'm fuckin' coming
Ain't no point in runnin', I'm a nigga, just a little quicker
So I catch him stretchin', have him guessin' where his cracker throat
Chop his balls off and use his skin to make a baby coat
Ain't he dope? No, he the same as shit that Tyler wrote
This is Ace, Wolf is in the back with Travis snortin' coke
Riley's here, Connie's dead, pickin' pussy pisses pike
She won't leave, dick as big as Kelly Price's appetite
Apprehend a couple men, triple six is fuckin' sin
Make Queen Latifah and Sydney go slap a couple dykes
Wrap around 'til they hit the ground and they hear a sound
That doesn't make sense like nigga kids wearing cap and gowns
This my album, and when your parents try to come around
Do the fuckin' exact opposite of turnin' it down
And when they try to get parental and start talkin' loud
Tell them that you're from the Wolf Gang and you're fuckin' proud
Then start barkin' loud 'til the neighbors wanna calm you down
But call the pigs, who'll probably come in bout a half an hour
Tell them that your sorry, you're a cow, took a fuckin' shower
But make it in time for shitty re-runs of Rocket Power
This is the shit that is makin' me cynical
The clinical attempts at schizophrenia's critical
Fuckin' voices follow me, emulatin' like twitter roll
O.F. is a cult, assume that I'm the fucking general
So when I mention suicide, I'm being Mr. Literal
The coke inside nine capsules, fuck it let's split a roll
Life is like a phone booth, these pigeons is the fuckin' toll
1-800-fuck-this-shit
Seven years old in my heart, so I'm stayin' gold
But when I fuckin' go, Lucifer will probably have my soul
It's hot down there, fuck that, bitch I'm hot as coals
Out the microwave, mixed with a bowl of yellow raviol
And a firetruck and Arizona durin' summertime
In a turtle neck, thermal jeans, spit purple wine
Wolf Gang pete and gon' live, running outta time
The fuck I give is the same as the next line

Then it bunny hopped off my shoulder, now my conscience dead
So the only guidance that I had is splattered on cement

Try to do this bitch in one take, or somethin'...

What's the point of bein' rich when you wake up alone?
What's the point of goin' home when it ain't nobody there?
Fuck that, I grab my bike and phone home in the air
And I pedal through the city with the wide frame steer
With that tall pale boy that I met last year
Grape, that's what I call him, love, that's what I fall in
Fell in, I ain't like sports growing up, but now I'm ballin'
I guess I'm a late bloomer
Ayo, look, high tide bottoms 'cause the neck on lunar
Them GOLF le FLEUR unos 'cause, we don't do Puma, nah
20k pairs, gone in 3 seconds
You ain't gotta like him and you ain't gotta respect him
For playin' chess with these niggas
That think that they're bench pressin'
Leg day is getting skipped, guess who really runnin' shit?
Young Teezy, it ain't easy, feelin' wheezy in this bitch
New slaves got y'all niggas feelin' breezy on the ship
Pour a Fanta in your poison so its easier to sip, huh?
My shit leaked two weeks before that release date
First week, did dos, a thousand off, beat Meek
Shout out Meek! Two niggas first week top 3!
And I can't even get a song to play on the radio
But tripled in them ratings, TV channels still pay me tho, haha
P told me not to trip
I am in my Ziploc, nigga
Feel like I got the best album out, uh
I know I got the best album out, preach

Let me, let me hear that

I'm Peter Rosenberg, super-underground
You know me, uh, you see my laptop, yeah, I mean
Apple is pretty mainstream but I have underground stickers
So it levels out..

Y'all niggas got it twisted, we ain't the Misfits
We the sick shit, make the competition slit wrists
Bodybag, beats get rapped like it's Christmas
Popping tags, I stay in Dior cause I'm Christian
Age of the face that R. Kelly pissed in
In the booth, I'm brawling to be like the Pistons
Only smoke flight, you can't hit if you ain't pitched in!
And bitch stop talking, let the marijuana sink in
And when that chauffeur roll up, you better get in
You and your 6 friends, even your big friend
Got a gang of wolves that slay hoes like henchmen
O.F. kill someone, yeah nigga we shipped it
Local ass nigga, we overseas on you dipshits
Walking flex tweet, motherfucker take a Twitpic
Kidnapped the game and it won't quit bitching

Duct tape, bow knife, now I’m breaking in homes
And now I’m in the closet with Kelly, we’re watching The Throne
And 'till I get that mothafucka I'll be watching ya home
And gonna tryna go harder than me hiding a boner
With lights on it, see I was the loner
Now I got a bunch of fucking Lindsay Lohans
That don’t even know me, tryna get me that old hand
Job, fuck that ho blow me
The G.I. Joe of O.F. is slowly
Solely running shit his toes is swollen
Goblin left the bridge, no more patrolling
Stick my finger in any hole I can find, fuck bowling
I’m making that bread, jabronni, and the green shit that’s growing is stuck
My Bank account is molding
Me and Wanda Sykes was holding hands 'till I eat her cooter
Like a fresh bowl of Ravioli, Chef Boyar-T
On tour, had to make a couple pit stops
Ended at this fucking hipster club called the Pin Drop
Where they said they hated on me and Odd Future kids
And how much they really love underground hip-hop
We don’t give a fuck like a virginized dick cock
After being tickled by a couple Eddie Bishops
Young niggas OF, got this
Come to my show and see niggers in the moshpit
Cat on my cotton, zebra print 5 panel from Jebbia
Now I’m flyer than an ostrich
VMA nom, yes! Video my set
Harder than Nakel not nolling a nine set
Thrasher, billboard, cover of them issues
Boy flow colder than O'Shay stuck in an igloo
I'mma fuck the game till my herpes-covered dick's bruised

Tall skinny flaco, that's for my nigga Paco
I enchilada bitches and I'm eating up they taco
"Eat me, beat me like Chris did Rhi-Rhi"
F U, OF to the muthafucking D-E-A-T
HD-Ice cream is tasty
The paley pink pussy on these white bitches is pasty
Herpes, I probably got, sickness it's probably snot
Dripping and you being iller than me, probably not
I'm snorting lines of cokey, I do the hokey pokey
Dumber than corny jokester, horny hoes wanna poke me
I'm dope you wanna smoke me, you don't know the effects
Of an asshole perspective, fuck respect
I think my asthma flaring, but Sarah wasn't caring
She left, so I beat my fucking meat just like abusive parents
Hot like Fahrenheit, I'm tight just like virgin twat
Fucking awesome that I am but a lot of swag that I'm not
Ace the Creator, chronic masturbator

I'm sipping on some, pissing on some, kissing on some bitch
That I just met and I'mma fuck her, cause she wet
I use no rubber and I make it stretch like Flubber, what you thought
"I'm not under-covers" just like the cosby sheet on my cock like police be
Y'all niggas see me, AC, OF,fuck it

Macaroni, I'm horny, these bitches on me like herpes
These bitches coughing I'll eat they coochie, I'm burping like Burpie
These niggas looking at me like I'm Ernie, but I'm more Berthy
Shit that I'm rocking it ticking and tocking
No watch and no chain, I do not make it rain, I bring the drought
Cause it's money I'm without, the shoes is fucking beat up
The dirties fucking heat up, them nolly treasures see us
The "fuck you buster" skate video coming, two-thousand and nine
We fine, we flying high, in the sky
Naw we flying in Ocean, the potion, I got the motion like
Piano keys got these bitches on they knees
Begging please like uno, dos, tres, three
Mexican bitches they love the cock like they love the cheese
From overseas back to Africa-ca, I slappy ya
Like a kung-fu movie actor, get my fist and we attacking y'all
Y'all, naw, nigga no skinny jeans over here
Y'all niggas is queer, jerking with other niggas
Working with them other niggas, broke as fuck
Not counting figures but guess what, I'm happy with life
Me and niggas ballin' we broke though, we got yo ho though
Yellow t-shirts, like egg yolk though
Fucking clean, you know the hat it stay Supreme
The fucking closet full of Freshjive, Bape and Ice Cream
Half of it no charge, half it no barge
Half of it discount, half of it at bargain
Niggas is looking at us wishing they charge, like a charge car
But they can't cause this my credit card
Y'all niggas got blue shit, y'all not using them black cards
All y'all niggas front when in ya heels
While all y'all acting harder than dicks when they see a...bitch
Jasper what up nigga

Yo, I don't know how to rap but, fuck it, it's time to do some new shit in my life
Box, crip

I'm rolling through Ladera in a Bimmer looking cleaner
Drinking on the blueberry Slurpee, eating that fajita
My passenger seat is occupied by Senorita
And mother keeps on bugging me about wanting to meet her
I don't really need her, I'm just tryna treat her real nice
So later on, up in the night, I could go beat her
And make a lie about the gonorrhea
So she don't feel guilty about me wanting to leave her
That "fuck" on my t-shirt print is cheetah
And I got that '87 bunny flow, like an Easter
Basket, you faggots, is plastic, like nerds with old glasses
But I'm still liable to get my ass kicked
Conned-Sort actor, a Baby Milo addict in the attic
Where you losers can't get me
Nikon and the Canon, they were never the same
And please do not take a picture, I can't be seen with you lames

Man, y'all some muthafuckin' lames
Don't lie to yourself, y'all some lames
Man, y'all some lames
The Canon don't flash, y'all some lames
I cannot be seen with you lames
You mothafuckas is some lames

Can't stop for, flashing, like a cop car
Me and.. rock well, I'm a rock star
Fuck y'all the O.F. is banging on 'em
Custom Crew-necks Rollin' while we're Ronald Regan on 'em
Y'all drug dealers, I Carl Sagan on 'em
Chop and screw Nas tracks, I got piano's waiting on 'em
My shirt is yellow, but the grill is gold
I couldn't take the Ritalin cause my therapist the pill is old
I can't skate, but I guess that's lost control
I don't have sense, sorry I sold my soul
For some gold Bapes low-price, stale rate
Authentic, never fake, check the poll, our statistic
Stay with authentics, check my steelo
Cause my mob's goodie like we Ceelo
And he know, I am yes and even she know
Every instrument is a gram, kilo

OFM, Bangin' on your FM

Drip drop, the angels made a pit stop
Pissin' on the demons of the Earth
What’s it really worth? Shit, now it's fuckin' pourin'
Wanted to go skate, can't, now my day is borin', damn
Snorin' in the bed with blankets cause my head spin
Probably cause I popped a couple purple Excedrins
It's a rainy day, so I'll skip the Led Zeppelin
And play some Sade "Love Deluxe" through my headset
On my way home I punched a bitch for an umbrella
Why? Cause I really didn’t wanna get my shit wet
Run through the puddles, playin' in the mud
Fun, sucks that I'm too tall for the tub
Or I would get my toys and make a lotta noise
While my mom is in the kitchen cookin' up a meal
Fire place is startin' up, dick is barely warmin' up
Sippy cup full of whip creamed hot chocolate

I can smell it when I go outside
Then it just pours
It gives us peace then all in the town is quiet
That's what rain's for

All the kids see rain and scream "No, no"
Run off the bus and they will just stay in
Me I love how rain fills the potholes
Me and my sailboat, that's what we played in
Ever wonder exactly where the sun goes
Did it go or did somethin' shade it?
The sun gives light cause it is the window
The rain gives life cause it is amazin'

Lightning is striking, water hittin' on my window like Ike
I am not Tina, buddy, do not give my window pain
Lights bulbs when wearin' that wig, flyin' kites
Here's an idea, why don't I go hiking
On a fuckin' mountain where the water fountains icing
Stand there in a tank top prop that's from Baywatch
And eat about four bowls of some frozen ice cream
Get sick and then I won't have to
Go to school today, tomorrow, the day after
Sit in bed, write a bunch of raps up
And I won't be lyin' when I say I’m a sick rapper
I might fail so I won't bother
The sun is playin' hide and seek like my fuckin' father
The only difference is it comes back, full effect
In the summer heats up, the thermometers erected

The inside of clouds
That's the window into the sky
Proves there's life

And I present to you
To you all
The Odd Future compilation
Fuck, give it up
Starring
Casey V, Hodgy Beats, Left Brain, Super 3, and Tyler, the Creator
Give it up! Give it up for ‘em!
Will y'all shut the fuck up?
Damn, I’m here
Alright, let me configure this
Get this ready
Alright, let’s go

Nigga seventeen his own fucking magazine
And of course his Hunger Force is Aqua Teen by all means
Fuck a deal, signature is legible
I'm the reason why niggas is heatin' up they vegetables
From being bullied in the sixth, to being dissed by any bitch
That can breath, please throw me in a ditch
And I hope I sell a copy of this disk
Fuck Hope, I am one short, a miracle of wish
Whether you nigga or ese, the magazine is great
Because the articles an essay
Half you dumb niggas can't even write an essay
Cause all of ya'll some stupid asses, S.A
You motherfuckers in denial
I'm the square just like the tile, right down the fucking isle
Music was my only friend, ever since I was a child
I make niggas frown, just to give myself a smile
Mother was my father, the nigga didn't bother
To send a kid a dollar, my only role model was
Niggas that record and that could play keyboards
And wild piano chords make me happy
Dr. Suess more important than Jesus
Y'all immigrants to depression, nigga give me a visa
We sick, the same lames that sneeze us
Made us turn to Jazz now, because the black kids would tease us
I need a fucking chain, I need to make it rain
I need some fucking rims, a car that I can rent
A verse about swag, jeans sagging off my ass
No I don't, fuck that, I am not a fucking fag
I rhyme and I'm still scared of guns
In the marching band but I bang my own drums and
Sing my own song, all of my wrongs are right
Never got into a fight, hit me
Bass, drum, snare, let it go
Disappear like good music in the past year
And everybody do the same thing, I hear the same shit
All the time, like the radio is queer
This isn't a mixtape, it's more of ear rape
By kids who think you other niggas suck
It's very offensive, you niggas defensive
If you can't take the heat then get the fuck out the kitchen, listen

Tyler the Creator, Hodgy Beats, Super 3, Casey V, Left Brain
Enjoy the show, good night, thank you, and fuck you

Tell Theresa May to let me in
I've been going in since 2010
It gotta be the color of my skin
Cause there's nigga's there
That doing more damage than my pen, man
Said some old lines was offensive
I was young, I can't apologize for that shit
They took my fiction literature for literal
I ain't no motherfuckin' criminal
The fuck is the problem, my record ain't got no smudges
Shit is clean as a whistle, and they just blow in them grudges
Let the kids see a show, that's what they waiting to see
It ain't no drugs on my bus, boy, my edges are straighter than me
So what the fuck is the problem? That lil Black boy made it
He's got a little bit of power and these white niggas hate it
And now he talking shit again, his stupid ass should have waited, fuck
They said I was a bad influence to who?
The camouflage following niggas like you?
Or all the free thinkers that know what it do?
Cause I'm one of them
See Ace is a king, I don't need your respect
So I made my own shoes, fuck that royalty check
I don't need your opinion, keep a mirror on deck
So don't you talk to me

It might just be my ego
It might just be my ego right now
Clancy you should calm me down
It's my ego
Or maybe it's my ego
It might just be my motherfuckin' ego

Well maybe it's my motherfuckin' ego when I'm ruling the world
And I ain't proving shit to niggas who just want me to fail
Niggas is fronting saying we distant cousins
While y'all pants was always flowing, all my trousers was flooded
Mad niggas be watching my moves, I never copped my props
For everybody and they momma got a problem with shock
Same niggas laugh when you making shit
Then three years later wanna emulate the shit you did
Y'all pay the price
Ask some old friends, that shit is over and finished
Look around in the crowd, them niggas not even attendance
That shit is done, and Lionel  my witness
But I had to move on cause I can't fuck with them niggas
I shut it down
Now wow, now he's saying that one day
He found his wings, now he using 'em on his runway
Pink yellow, blue and orange, shit is dark
Different pattern, you say the same shit from the start
Niggas I am a wave, y'all just fuck with the sharks
And I got flames on my pants cause I walk how I talk
So keep them comments, keep them comments, keep them comments, boy
When it's said and done my pockets gon' be filled with commas, boy
Y'all niggas say that shit is gross, that shit is nasty, eww get away boy, I'm good

And if you see my old friends, tell 'em that I really miss 'em but I'm good
And if you see some bad times, tell 'em I don't really miss 'em, boy I'm good
And if you see my old self, tell him not to worry cause he'll be good
Sorry my feelings is running, GOLF 2016, thank you niggas for coming
I'm out, I'm out

After the joy, half laughter the book
Of the kids favorite motherfucking chapter
So the fat nigga could drink my motherfucking milk
I wan't some gold bapes I want a prom date
Sloppy ass musty bitch, that's overweight
I wan't a new piano,record deal, new pills, therapist
Jingle balls and I'm fucking Mrs. Clause
Have her climbing up the wall, while he givin' ya'll gifts
He ain't never gave me shit
My mom bought the wrapping, and the shit that influenced
Me to start rapping. It's not a joke, chilling with the Polar Bear
That used to work for coke, santa's sniffin' coke
My Santa Letter Wrote
Fuck you, whiney Malcolm X movie, try me
And I'm stealing Harry Potter's Cloak

Middle East was his birthday, 25th I'd rather get gifts
So why the fuck would I go out my way to celebrate birthday
I'm selfish what the fuck I look like buying a gift
Hide em, bed under the couch
Rad kid done smashed they motherfucking ginger house
And Jesus don't know me, he ain't my homie
Our friendship sits on a self
Santa go and molest an elf

Prancer, Jingle, Rudolf
Drunk driving at night, a peppermint Smirnoff
Santa little buzz, and forgot to switch gears off
My childhood is here, never ever ever smirnoff
Snowman robbing little girl, boys, for toys
And G.I. Joes, and here his fat ass go on my roof

Christmas tree's green, and this time of year clean
Nigga's in a tinsel, sleighbell blow whistle
Alana, Raquel, hope ya'll under the missle-toe
The house is decorated, and man I'm frustrated
Cause' I didn't get shit that I really wanted
New Years zoom like a mother fucking Mazda
But at the end I wanna' know what the fuck is Kwanzaa?

Anybody?)

Merry Christmas, Happy Holidays
Fuck It, I'm still a kid
Bout' to go have a snowball fight
In the middle of LA
Steal some Christmas trees, set em' on fire
Eat some gingerbread cookies
Shit, I don't know
It's the time to enjoy life
You Know?
Happy Holidays from us at Odd Future
And, Fuck you. Fuck You. Fuck You

Yo, yo son
Yo, yo
Yo, yo, yo, yo, yo
Yo I'm bad
Pockets fat like a big ass bitch ass, son
I come through looking real nice
Nigga chain looking like delight
Spend like thirty g's on it
You know that this' ice
It ain't gon' melt
Your bitch asking for help
I'm like son, bitch I don't even know you personally
Bitch I've got insurance you ain't hurting me

Yo B, yo b, yo b
Ah, ah, yo
I'm at the store I've got a fucking quarter
Don't give a fuck nigga
How do you do

Yo son, son, daughter, nephew, cousin, brother, son, done

Oh, yea
Ay b
Yo dog, yo dog
You be like "hey bitch"
She ha﻿ beli, habala, hoo damn
HOO WHAT THE FUCK, AAH, I NO SEE, WOOOOOOOOOOOOO!
Wooo. Wooo. Wooo

Yo son
Yo listen son
Tona hundred daino tu tek a mulino
Una fu nino with a kinda bulicho
I shit tosa bolato laino
Ino, ino, ino
Polo mocaino
Dain, dain, dain, dain, dai
Doh, doh, doh, doh, doh
Chain, chai, chai, chai, chai.... Ohh, no

Wack the molono, molico my dick!
Tuca motuco motoco moli!
Awdlwlwlwlwlwlwlwl, taba taba-li!

Alalalala
I'm like alalalabamba
Tira ta la panda
You put it in the pocket and you're like UUUH MANDA!
Pilalala panda
Ta pola, ta pola
Irina, ARINA!!

Do do, daki no dicho
Sinka mico, into oh molchinko
Ita la malicho
Ita ca madicho
Nuah nuah nuah
DA FUCKING BURRITO!

Girl, I know you wanna
Fuuuuuuuuuuuuuuuck me
Stop playing around now

You old as fuck
Now let me eat you
You finished with your bath
It's time to feed you
You're a GILF
A granny I'd like to fuck, ooh
Come use my cane
I got some soup
Now come and drink it up
Doo-doo in that diaper
Girl you stink it up
Hit it from the back
I lift them wrinkles up
Don't make me soft
Our age difference
A big deal, but if
You let me eat your ass
Then you can suck my dick
Stop playing girl
And come here cause
I'm already hard

I'm hungry
Now I'm lonely
I need your pussy
Don't keep me starving
Don't keep me starving, bitch

Fuck yo mama, Fuck yo mama, Fuck yo mama, fuck that bitch
Fuck yo mama, Fuck yo mama, Fuck yo mama, whoop that trick

I dont give a fuck I dont give a shit
I'll get a bitch to suck my elbow
I got a sweater and its blue
I ain't got one I got three
I ain't no gang member I ain't no cuz
But I'm wearing all red cause im a yellow
Person and only im screamin'
I don't bust nuts I fill your girls mouth with white stuff

I got friends that sell drugs
Guess where we at, we at the social hall
With them bitches hitting them swishas
Give me them lips and we giving them hugs
You already know we be all gang banging
Already know that we got drugs going to the store
Probably buying some pancake mix
I dont even go to the store

Yeah, what you know about wearing a sweater
That don't match what my shoes like homie
I don't play that shit I got a gun
Homie don't walk you better skip
Fuck that trick, fuck that ho
I make money, I make cheddar
You know who I am, you know where I be
You know plus 1 plus 2 is 4
All up in the club, now I'm at the door
You don't got enough so I guess you want more
Ho I eat chocolate and marshmallows
So that's a smore

Baby let's go to my tree home
Tree home

Traveling from the arcade
We won't stop
You're my favorite crayon
It look like we stay outside the lines
Come to my tree home yeah
Let's escape then let you go head first
And from what I've heard, its great

Just stay
Good, now stay
Can you pack your pjs, baby
Come into my tree home
No one ever comes in here
Come to my tree home

Yo bitch say my name
I'm flyer than a plane
I'm crazy like Maine

Bitches in my office

I be drinking coffee
..........WOOOOOOOO!

Nigga I'm dumb, dumb
Make a mofucka run
Pack a gun, shoot a nigga, UH
POW POW, nigga I'm done

Murder this shit
I'mma murder my dick
You never heard of this shit
Like you deaf or something

Swag to the fifth
Hotter than a volcano bitch
And I'm cooler than Antarctica

Bitchmotherfucker

Teenage billionaires
He's beating records off the top the holes of money
He roll rover sell base for 12 a pop
Hodgy eating rapers whole, never digest I'm dope
Shit since they coming out of him like crack heads
Like fuck I should be illegal eagles flying over state
And the model bitch
And the head is great
The Pink stripe is for diplomatic immunity
I'm A-C-E-A-K to fuck up the community
Niggas Stez biting like they Mike Tyson
Here these queers taking credit like their
Faggot card is debit fines hit me on my beepa
Could be on the keys then I push it out sneaka bitch
I'm bunny like the Basket-baller
I'm the dope dealer push man in the dream state
Your bitch sticks to me like purple schotch tape
I'm A.C.E. aka Mr. Fuck Up the Community

I don't serve much but let me take your order
Guaranteed to get your chips while I gallop aforda
Flip a check quick like we betting with quarters
And I beat the cut like we talkin' 'bout horfa
Especially if she looks like canorfa
I not saying I would never do more than ork her
I'm just saying I would do never divorce her
But I don't know if I could afford her
But J.K. cause Ima I'm ballin'
If life was a chip then hommie I'm all in
Yesterday's money was talkin'
Yes the shit was callin'
Telling me to take over the world
Like a young Jospeh Stallin
Dirty dog records beating all the pussies
Never shopping unless were talking bout diamonds and stussy
Yo I'm probably with your chick
Playing with her cliteris
Her friend is coming for a lick
Look I'm not your father don't even bother
I pulled out early

DADDY NO!

Nigga know me, I'm a gangsta
Stab babies, I'm a crip
Wearin red,blue flag on my tag
Wearin thongs my jeans sag
Nigga, bring that mothafuckin synth in
My girlfreind like white men
Thats why I keep white friends
I'm in a Buick, my homie in a white Benz

Nigga bring the high hat in
Nigga bring it

We wearin bapes on our mothafuckin toes
I got bapes for yo mothafuckin hoes
Nigga, nigga sayin please
I be eatin macaroni and cheese
I put salt on mine
Y'all niggas wastin time
Look at me got a fresh hairline
Got no hair cut with no headline

Uh, nigga take the high hat out
Put ya dick in take the high hat out
Put your hat hat all up in my damn mouth
Take the high hat out now we headed down south
We headed up north with them horses
Eatin hay cus ain't got porsches
We don't do nothin' but this
All up in your granny tub eatin grits
In the kitchen

Nigga im crippin
Don't ask me what Im doin if im limpin
That mean that cripple is simple
Like this beat is simple
Bitch with the weed, come over here
Bitches with real hair gotta go
If you ain't wearin fake shit from the swap meet
Bitch you ain't gettin on the floor
Bitch with no panties, all up in the mothafuckin club
Now gimmie them diapers,you on yo period
Bitch im serious
I smell panties, my boy Ace

Full lyrics will be available upon release
I really wanna make it right
I want you to be in my life

For the time being, can we just be *in love*
*Be in love*

I keep making less out of us
I'm running out of love for you

Yeah, you don't really know how I walk

For the time being, can we just *be in love*
I know that it's so hard for you to be with me, but

Four bars, four topics
Open bar, liftoff, Power 106
Your first topic, grandmas

Look, fuck it, oh yeah
Grandma over there, surprised she ain't dead
Fucking old bitch, come and give a nigga head
And I open that clit and it got some spider webs
Like, I don't really know, but I'm tryna go
Come over here and give me throat, like
Oh shit your dentures just came out, don't choke
Wait a minute, um

Open bar, four bars, four topics
Liftoff, Power 106
Jay Cruz, Justincredible
Your next topic, Tyler, The Creator
Pregnant girls

Niggas always thought I would rap about something sterical and lyrical and just mystical
But I want the pregnant bitch to have the fuckin' baby and give me that umbilical cord
You little whore, let me lick that shit
Come over here and let me see that baby suck my, wait
You thought I was gonna say 'dick', nigga that shit gay
Cause I ain't tryna go to jail today
Niggas really think that they dadadada

Liftoff, Jay Cruz, Justincredible
Bacon is your next topic

WOLF came out last year, I know you heard it
Tryna' get that motherfuckin' pig, fuck Kermit
Let me see the bacon, let me see the bacon
All the fuckin' cash that I'm rakin'
Probably gotta go to Rouse
And I don't really know cause I got a little nervous
This is a really weird topic

One more topic for Tyler, The Creator
Liftoff, Power 106, Open Barm groupies
Groupies, that, that's the best y'all can come up with? Was groupies

I'm on the fucking bus and I just ate lunch
And I'm looking for a slut and I'm really tryna' bust a fat nut
On her motherfucking forehead, but damn, my iPhone dead, shit
I need a charger, fuck it I'll just go outside and charge a bitch
And tell the bitch to come on the bus and suck my shit
And maybe if I'm a little more horny, get little drunk, I can open up her and shit probably lick her clit
But shit, that probably won't happen, fuck
Fuckin' all this pussy off rappin', fuck
Man, they think I'm cool, they start to clappin', fuck it
Give me a hand job, yeah, I'm the man
I'm the motherfuckin' nigga that was just on stage
Bitch, open up your fucking book and let me lick that page
But wait a minute, that shit clean? Let me get spray out of the bathroom
Where I took a shit, took off my Fruit Of The Looms and took a doo-doo-doo
Poo-poo-poo, lick on your ass and poo-poo, doo-doo
You got a problem with T? Well fuckin' know a couple dudes that'll get the burner and shoot-shoot
And shoot-shoot if you got a problem, yeah bitch, get that
Get rat, nigga get that, nigga getgat, with the liklak and a Tic-Tac
Jasper rollin' up a zig-zag, after you suck my dick, here, take a Tic-Tac
And a fuckin' double mint, bitch I'm the devil men
Bitch know what the fuck I meant, heard Bastard
The first album, bitch, you know what the Devil meant
Jk, I'm Heaven sent, know God and a couple of angels
I'm, alright I'm off of here

I'm in your room now your screaming for help
Anxiety attack so you piss on yourself
And you pray to god that one of your neighbors can help you
But that won't happen I'm helter skelter
In my lobby, they can't find me
I'm not a maniac, i'm a zombie
I'mma rap about some neo nazi
Bitch you better call on God or Gandhi
Better hope Jesus come baptize you
Because I'm about to come rape or sodomize you
Keep doing that until I realize you
Dead from the sound boom when I pound you
I'm a night stalker, catching bitches walking after dark in parks
Hit that corner, then they're gone
They can't call for help because I took their phone
Using up minutes, use them to call my homies just to tell them that I'm in it
Bitch I dare you to scream
Haven't you heard of Sarah? That's me
I made that bitch my milk tits
I was dressed up like Lisa Simpson
Put her to sleep, quick in my hilton
Now I'm bout to change your name to Ruth Wilson
Voices in my head like kill them
Amityville insanity pill
I can't swallow my cavities
They're strictly from these casualties, that's really good with ham and cheese
Load them up on Craigslist
How-you-doing-my-name-is-Tyler, and you're a dead bitch

Run bitch, run!

You better run, bitch

Yeah, OF on the lettermen we all better then
Any haters wanna beef we gonn' sever them

Litter fuckin' life, and I hit bitches and they fuckin' wife
Chris brown a real nigga, sock that bitch up in her mouth
Do I give a fuck? No, but if I gave a fuck
Do you think I'd tell you? Fuck no! Kinda like my dad
When he came home and told me he wanted to get my ass wet
Goddamn that's gay but I'm not so fuck it I won't stop
I keep sayin' this gay shit
But if you got a problem nigga, you don't gotta play it
I need my damn inhaler cause I'm barely fuckin' breathing
Jackin' off semen everywhere up on the chair
I put my jeans but fuck it I'll just go to Diamond and get another pair
And if they got a problem, fuck it, go to 'preme and get a box logo fuckin' tee
And motherfuckin' panties just to match, so when I can pee
I can pull them fuckin' down and sit down and look at E
Fuckin' rectangles on my fuckin' G-string
That's fuckin' gay I know, goddamn that shit is tight but yo
Shout out to all my﻿ niggas doing hardcore drugs
And sockin' bitches out and shootin' up the Key clubs
Goddamn I fucked up, I've gone blah blah, a blacker nigga tad of sagga a dagga lagga

I feel like I'm brown
But I'mma go up, watch the flow come down
Errybody wanna be like us
But I don't give a fuck, ridin' on my trucks
Skateboard that is, I hate whores that is
And fat kids that eat donuts and act like sluts, fuck y'all little bitch ass niggas

I don't know I'm bored, so I'mma rap about shit
That don't need to be rapped about shit
I get bitches and I'm I wrap 'em in shit like plastic wrap and shit
And then there at the bottom of my freezer with the carrots and
Broccoli, ain't no fuckin' stopping me
I'm hotter then the dandazies
On my fuckin' penis when Raquel was on her fuckin' knees
But she don't like to talk to me
She fuckin' up cause in about a week we gon' have like 30 G's
Coulda bought her, a fuckin', Gucci purse
I don't care I got bitch lickin' my balls
And I'mma take all my homies and roll through the mall
Buy every fuckin' thing and listen to Tina
While we buy everything and listen to Tina
While we listen to Tina, I'mma buy everything
And give way to fuckin' bums..

My lungs ain't got no fuckin' air
So if I fuckin' stop here, there
I don't care if you do but if you do I don't care
That's not makin' sense, I'm a fuckin' ithiet
And I'm so fuckin' intimate
With a fuckin' pastor tryna fuck me in his class
While there's cum up on my ass
So when I slide I can just motherfuckin', um, move faster
Goddamn that's nasty
Oh shit, jackin' off then I watch Degrassi
And watch a bunch of pedophiles come on and pass me
My fuckin' beard is growin' in so they are losing interest
So let me shave it, so they can try and get into this
Damn that's gay as fuck

The infamous nigga is wilding, whole fuckin' crew is dieting
So we go to Trae and goons and get some rice pudding
For all these bitches that don't want the beef
Be cool so we keep pushing and uh, niggas know we flowing
If we ain't, then we ain't flowing

.66 dicks mastering in fuck you
Minoring in fucking awesome settlements
We better win,and Bastards in them Wolf Gang lettermans
Ski Mask to cover the face features
We rapin' the cheerleaders they needin' they knee pads
Sucking up all the white like their tummy's made for the bleaches
The teachers are getting antsy and acting like fucking pansies
Assault rifles for teachers wanna' romance me
Mr. Lee had his hands where his youngest teen daughter hands be
Now she wanna' sit down because she can't stand me
So I made her an amputee wooden planks where her legs be
Eat ass like candy, giving niggas more head than BrandUn
Her blow jobs feel fanwork, she's just a normal L.A bitch
With her hand work, she fuckin' stuck up

Dem Hoes, I tell you bout them hoes

Today I'm going to give you guys a free write

Bass hit snaps yo back cracks front no football punt apple jacks no sin
Always out the motherfucking box, no in
Don’t have a religion, ignorant no sin
Begin my book first page no end
Talk to that piano no friends
We don’t try nigga, just natural
The mothafucking cloud feels good pterodactyl
Fuck tourrettes like pronouncing Tara backwards
Never been cool I just act natural
It’s a shame, mellow hype tame
And at heart we are all lames
At that brain we’re left and at this we’re best
I’m the teacher, so the students go ahead and test
Kinda like ninth grade when ugly bitches grew breasts
Kinda…..
I'm Waldo Find them soul, California rush I got a heart made of gold
At the end your bitch rainbow
Leprechaun I told that pussy did clove
I got a heart made of gold
Umm… I got a heart made of gold
Hey, yo, Domo, hit ‘em

I’m so 24 karat, heart made of gold
With subway lines dropping weight like Jared
No stress bowflex get buff choke 'em till they go deaf
No rest switch teams and I’m still hot
Cuz everything I touch is golden
Jill Scott, pill pop
Swallow my stylow
Mr. Low Blow so ho lady me low
Explode all on your eardrums
Sex in that headphone about to make your ear cum
Here comes the Odd Future Rookie
Breaking niggas off like niggas share a cookie
Go book me I need to perform more
Cuz I’m raging like teenage hormones
And maybe a jail is what I board on
Cuz it’s death to any beat I record on
He got a heart made of gold

Hey yo-shit-I’m half asleep and shit-fuck it yall

Um… I’m ill, I’m sick, no lie I’m sick
I need my fucking meds
A cute Bitch that gives head
That only loves me for money
Didn't hear a fucking word I said
Gold digging
Freestyles written, urine, shittin
Fuck it, pissing
Left Brain on the loop turn shit
That's cool
I’m living, smile every day
You wanna go away, I wanna go up
But how do I do that when I do not give a fuck
Let me rethink while I reheat up my lunch
In-fin
Stop, begin

One of a kind
A mile high stood out
Be raped, I went in and didn’t pull out
Mixtape is deaf, when it’s put out
I’m real, my down fall is what you should doubt
The Genesis, is winning shit
Need censorship, cuz I’m ignorant
Fuck a bee like I was intimate
My style is the new bitch
Get into it

Alright guys, time is up
Pass your papers and your pencils to the front
And uh… well, I guess free time
Hey Left Brain, put that piano away during class
Shit…. Fuck I need to quit

Life after death, death after life
Made mistakes before, I swear I wasn't gonna do it twice
You love me and it wouldn't change
So I'm by myself which will remain the same
And it was just one girl who left me sprung
And it was just one girl who had me going dumb
And it was just one girl who was where I was from
Gave me her feelings and I left that bitch with none

I was in love, but I jumped out quick
Gave her my heart, she broke it, put it in the bucket
On another level I'm bitter, I wanted to keep her
But now this shit is coming out your speaker
Wish that you could meet her
But she's chopped up in my freezer
By the mixed vegetables, I'll eat her
Looking in the iris, I knew she was lying
Cuz she wasn't crying, laughing
So I starting grabbing
And she started gasping for air
She told me the truth, I didn't care
The dead made me win
And her death made me grin
Like a mouth with a side of nipples and limbs
This the end, yeah
Potatoes and grits on the plate of her
I should have stayed away from her
But she cheated
And now she's in my freezer bleeding
Her parents looking for her, good luck
You dirty bitch

Met the bitch, tied the bitch up
And then I ate her up because she want to go and fuck my cousin up
Nigga's balls in the room and now this bitch is mad at me cause I made a song with autotune with my nigga G
She looking at me all mad and all sad
But now I'm glad that she's wrapped up in that Glad bag
And that shit's all black and I'm wearing all black
And now she mad cause I found out she was fucking, sucking other niggas
Busting, cumming, running, here I'm coming with a motherfucking knife and now I'm gunning
And now this bitch is screaming for help, yelp, dealt, the motherfucking card that she dealt
But that's her fucking fault, I don't give a fuck
I fucking more, she fucking one and now these cases that I caught
Shit, but I ain't even fucking tripping
I need a new chick, I'm sick of dealing with these bitches

In the club, niggas in the club

I tell these bitches to eat my dick
They say no cause that will hurt your dick
I say ok, well I accept this
Get out this shit this ain't no reelection

This nigga ain't funny at all
This nigga dont be at the mall

They say I smell like ham
I say I smell like chicken

I Gotta Bitch Who Be Suckin My Dick Up
And You Already Know I Make That Bitch Mad
Lick Her Pussy With A Mothafuckin Tongue
Nigga Like Wassup Bitches Like HUHHH
The Motherfuckin Ice Around My Neck
Make The Ice Upon My Dick Look Like Its Disrespect-FUL
Bitches On Me Nigga Got Ice Like AY NIGGA

Looking through my window
Houston, we have a fucking problem nigga 10-4
Testing, testing, playing with my testes
Waiting for the day that Sarah Palin can molest me
She from Alaska, I roll down south
Pull my penguin out and put that global warming in her mouth
You should see her lips, Seen them, Saw them
Don’t call me a motherfucker, Id rather fuck her daughter
Nigga in the 70’s like he’s President Carter
His skin is fucking drying up, nigga give him some water
Old Fragile Nigga with a glass nose, tickets and a Mexican back
He gon' be mad when he sees that his grass grows
In his home, By the gnome, in his home, next to the water hoes
Around the corner from the enchiladas and the tacos
And Im not saying a niggas a racist, but he sucking hitler dick, nazi cum, facism
Run Shit
Face it
Nigga you can taste it
Nauze it, Faz it, Ash it
Face it, Face it

Obama this, here comes the rude ramping
The need to put his motherFucking face on a food stamp
Makin sims, now the government is wearing tim’s
Bidens in a fucking continental on rims and
This theory squad, they need to make it bigger cause
Cause everyone in the world is voting for the nigga
And im not crazy
Obama and I is for the ladies
Pro abortion death to all babies
Biden is the father
Obama did it big, cause if MCcain wins Im not claiming none of them fucking kids
Just saying
Abuse what I am saying
And im the only that noticed MCcain has aids
Draw em to the hospital, Gas for a gallon
Im mad, he’s fucking sarah pailin more than I do

The propped 8 couldn’t even miss
Shut the fuck up and just let them faggots kiss
White man, black man now its just a waste war
Cause when Obama dies Im heading straight to the bape store

They talk about him, ya’ll get an erection
He’s black so I gotta show him some type of affection?
White, hate and rap, you better use protection
And I quote this “MotherFuck this election”

And I don’t wanna seem wrong
But if he lose
They gonna break the window that Im looking through at the beginning of the song

Are there any, ugly girls in the audience tonight?
I hope you... yeah, you... you, ugly bitch
Cause this is for all the ugly girls in the audience tonight
And this is for the ugly girls, ugly!

In the back of a truck with a gay slut
Tryna bust a nut in her butt with no makeup
Passed out, this dead bitch don't wanna wake up
Fuck Rachael Ray, cause she tryna get a cake-up
Whoa, I'm just tryna finger it in your hot car
Fuck a nigga, just fuck here in top block
Made me doper than my shrooms in my system
My trophy sister, she'll get mugged
Right in the back of a club with a
45 shotty, bet you 30 dollars you won't
Find her body, now she's fucked
Get these bitches love drunk

What up what up, what's goin' on?
This OF, up on the song
Why you staring over here like something's wrong?
We the West over here, nigga sing along

Uh, in the back of a blue truck, fucked up
Rollin' dice, snake eyes, niggas ain't got luck
I just lay back, still ain't blew up
Honey got me some of that rum like I threw up
You should really fear me
Made this bitch squint and couldn't see me clearly
Bitch I'm a gift like you lookin' at Christmas
You should look up to him, now you on my shit list
Bitch I ain't fucked with you before
You ain't gotta hound me when I step through the door
I'm the best doin' it
He's spittin' that super shit
Why the nigga so lame
I don't even say his name
But he white like cocaine
This is fire, propane

Wait a minute, what's your name?
Let's play a game of balls in your throat
Smell like fish, cheesy like a goat, bitch
The only that she good for is sucking dick

And I came quick
I fucked a bitch in a plaid skirt
I mean raped, don't ask her
Then I put the quick punch on her lip
Bade her in the basement

I was wearing a really nice dress
With sweet puffs, green and white
This is nice, I look nice
Fix my dick...
Check it twice

Herpes on my lip, I got herpes on my..
Herpes on my lip, grandma got herpes on her..

You got full blown AIDS, I got full blown crabs
You got full blown AIDS, I caught it from your dad
He gave me kiss so I call the cops
Not to tell nobody, they gave me money and a lollipop
My name is Bob, your real name is Charm
I hate Myspace, nigga fuck a Tom
You gotta fidget, get up in it in my video
There's gon' be transsexual Cambodian midgets

You like my clothes, you like my shirt
You like my purse, my girlfriend got a flat chest
Mustache, flat ass, no hair
Chicken head weave wearing dirty underwear
Nice bikes, skateboard no
Nice dikes
I got a cat,, you got a frog..
You got a girlfriend, my girlfriend is a frog

He dont like the Herpes on my lip, thats why he sent me that message

This is dedicated to all the beautiful people in the world
And all the fat girls

Odd Future

I got that Alexander the Great type imperial flow
Butterfinger I’m droppin’ bars like my signal was low
My car full of Os, looking like the cereal bo
You hear me everywhere
But I ain't stereo doh
I hear they waiting for my downfall
Talking again
Shit, I tell em' fall back like it's autumn again
I know you waiting for my reply but that's all that you'll get
I got my mind on bigger shit
Tell them adios then
Doing this for the niggers before me
Life's a bitch but god forbid that bitch divorce me
Fucking with these and one hoes they quick to cross me
They found out the hard way I guess they lost me
I'm feeling quite bossly now
I don't need love
Walking on air with my feet up a thousand feet up
I've been telling those to speak up because the money talking
It's hard to hear with all these honeys talking
Everyday I be shining ask the weather man
Now it's girls on my jock like a Letterman
I'm just doing it the best
If that means I'm do it better than you
Fuck it whatever then all day
BranDun Deshay

I'm chillin' with the homies
Real talks, real conversations
Most of y'all speaking on what girl that nigga dating
I only speak to her and she say she facing
I hope she ain't got braces
Make her keep going til' I tell her she amazing
Casey keep spittin got these haters walking mazes
I used to play games now I'm playing for the payment
Born in '93 with my girl from the '80s
I just say it again to them
Lotta niggas try to stop me but I ran through them
Lotta niggas didn't believe I wave my hands to them
Now everybody know exactly what the man doing
Ro-man music pump it loud, go ahead and make it grand to it
I just grab my pen and pad and let my hands do it
It's Odd Future til' I stop you heard my first music
Now when you come and see me rock bring a hurse to it
You niggas

Copped some angle wings in hell
When he finds out im reading her Harry Potter
Fuck him!, Im a Demon fill your daughter up with semen
With Supreme emboirderd logos, making fun of homos cause its funny
Tommy rugby hilfiger screaming nigga with a cluck
I'm a fuckin' Nazi with a condom, barley give a fuck
We hockey fuckin' Marksmen, hit you with the Wolf Gang
And if you fuckin' snitch on me I guess I'll make the great escape

Got a problem with the Golf? Fuck it, then pick a spot
Like you're eating lunch and it's brunch, we could bring the beef
And the pots and the pans, fuck it we could bring a lot
I just want to know if you can come and suck a dick or not?
Hit her up, pick her up in the front seat of my two seater vehicle
Hit the crib, grab the cuffs, take pictures of her butt
Where's your mouth open up?
I just want to know if you can come and suck a dick or what
The fuck am I yapping about? It don't matter
I'm the one, hun, T is the sun and you're Saturn
Better stop with all of the chit chatter, bitch I'm the tongue
I go dumblike the mental handicaps in the house
Y'all kiss butt like a nap on the couch
T the shit, I'm the weird little BLAH in your mouth
You better brush like Hova shoulder
Told you boys it never stop
I just want to know if you gon' come and suck a dick or not?
Pink and yellow in the fit, yeah
Ballin' now shit I wonder how I got here
Thanks to everyone whoever gave a fuck, yeah
A lot of niggas don’t know because I am, yeah
They told me to sit down, shit, I hate chairs
Fuck that instead I stood on their table
Flog Gnaw carnival, fuck ya' state fair
If you fuck with the Golf Boys nigga say yeah

Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
If you fuck with the Golf Boys nigga say yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah

Y'all niggas ain't fuckin' with T, man
Golf boys y'all ain't fuckin with me, man
Golf boys sorta like Stevie Wonder, niggas can’t see me
I’m the man nigga don’t trip unless you got your bags
Gotta say shit nigga fuck you and that's it nigga

A millionaire, I'm a real young billionaire
Boys Club, Polos and Underwear
My instrumentals can't compare to weak samples, niggas flare
Piano notes the hand sheet cuz i'm a fucking band geek
Real square to be exact
Nigga, asthma attack
I overdose on Prozac cuz i'm a fucking maniac
For a million females, bitches pussy kiss kiss
Talking that she gay knowing damn, well she like dick
In and out her like Itchy And Scrath
Drop the snare cuz the bass is coming back...
Like you motherfuckers nino
Cuz i have an Odd Future like i been fuckin' Miss Cleo
The Ralph Lauren is 2 hundred dollars
All you motherfucking hypebeast is zeros
And if it's left, if it's right, if it's wrong
You don't make sense like a fat bitch wearing a thong

Motherfucker, i'm i'll

A milli and 2 milli and 3 milli
I pop whelies on BMX
Eat McFlurry, skate niggas, dirty dirty
Thrash hard, throwing bows
Getting bitches, getting hoes
Eating pussy, manajatwa to licking and sucking toes
I got the fucking flow like rivers
Make you and your bitch quiver, on a blanket
Fat bitches eating banquets
Like it's all that you can eat
My dick is all that i can skeet
And your grandmother's hair
And that bitch truth or dare, me
Like the motherfucking game, i make it rain
With no money, yeah it's funny
Cuz i'm broke and this ain't a fucking joke
Like a hoax, i got the hose
I got my show and i'm the host
Motherfuckers stay here, i'm out like a ghost
And...

I'm playing with these damn diseases
And sicker than disease
The way that i stroke in piano keys
Just like...

Uh, going H.A.M
I can't afford it, so I'm eating Spam
Watching Rob Van Dam
What the fuck? Sam I Am
With the green eggs and ham, nigga I'm crazy
Come through, listening to some old-school Jay-Z
In a bucket
Come through with a bucket on like, "fuck it"
Looking like Fredrick Douglass
With the lil' cut in my hair, you don't even know
I come through, pigeon-toed
Come through with a different ho
I don't even know, don't ask questions
Come through, I don't ask no one for suggestions
Cause I'm depressed
I come through...

They know I'm the best here
Shit get more wavy than my fucking chest hair
What y'all mean?
Y'all niggas fishy like sardines
Oily as fuck, you see the ice on
My neck, it's shiny as fuck, like the sun
Just got buttfucked by a truck with a bunch
Of lights in it, I fucked your white women
Y'all niggas don't want to do this
To me tonight cause I got a knife
I stab any nigga in his esophagus
You don't want no problem, bitch
Oh, you gon' call the police? Well, give me your phone
I'mma use your anytime minutes, dial my home number
310, 310, 310
Mom, open the door
I'mma come in, make a bowl of ravioli
Walk out, get in a car, drive somewhere else
You don't believe me, nigga?
Come see me, nigga, come D me, nigga

Wait, I was about to say the alphabet!
You wouldn't let me finish!

NIGGAS!

The wolves are coming with their guns
You better run Samuel, run
And we can hear them motherfuckas come
You better run
The wolves are coming with them Ak-40s

Samuel is dead

Album cover

Alternative cover

The early chapters of my book included bus passes
Now its tire traction off like fuck crashes, ask him how?
Insurance higher than the lease bill, run flats when the feet peel
Fish tail, the boy eats meals, tummy ache from my cheap thrills
Granny hug the way the seat feel, on the left turn, leave the neck burned
From the frost bit links, size of an earth worm, wasted on last check earned
I’m, expecting this so it ain't odd, two 5’s on the paint job, lactose, wide body, fat ghost
Grannys watch over me when I act slow, rev till I plateau
Keys sorted on the hip, jeff gordon is his mind, life’s forza on the strip
Switch gears like I take breaths, wish I had 8
Left 6 got skipped, went to 7th from the 5th
More advance than your average
I like coupes, two shit
When my friends pull up, stops turn into a pageant
But until I get that enzo, its chapter uno
But I know what that bus pass turned into, its magic

I can't wait to take you home
I've been waiting all day to heat you up
Cover you in butter
Then I'ma drown you in syrup

I'm gonna eat you alive
Woah, you and I
Now you're gone
Eat you alive
Gone, gone, gone
You're already gone, gone, gone, gone
Gone
And I'm gone

Aunt Wang will be my favorite forever
I eat it, I drink it, I breathe it
I’m down for whatever
You fuck with that bullshit
But I know that Aunt Wang’s is better

Album Cover

Back cover

Um......'Sup, cock fucking face niggas?
It's your boy Ace, man. Um.....
I'm in fucking Sacramento right now and shit, mom just moved
I've got nothing better to do out here, so I'm just gonna freestyle for you dick sucking motherfuckers, alright?
Ready? Who you with? Nah, I'm playing.......um.....
Alright, let's see.......
This some exclusive shit, nigga. Um.....
I'm really gonna freestyle, none of this shit written like these other
Motherfuckers do. Alright?

Free styling, and that nigga Wild N' Out, like Nick Cannon. Fuck on rock or bammin' Obama
I'mma fuckin' bomb ya. Have to be something with your mamma and Osama
Bin Laden, that nigga been hidin'. Probably been ridin' in the dirty
Eating on my dad's white stuff, like Mcflurry
Nigga's can't burn me. I am not a book, you can't learn me
But don't fuck me, you cannot yearn me. I am not a fucking check, you cannot earn me
What the fuck else rhymes with earn? Bernie
Bernie and irk, irk and Kirk, and Kirk is fucking Berk and Berk is fucking Bobby
Bobby's fucking auntie, Johnny. Johnny fucking nanny, auntie. Johnny's fucking Chuck, and Chuck is fucking Bobby
So, it's like a threesome, with eighteen more fucking people
I'm a fucking zero, your a fucking two plus eight, six. I can't count, that's why I won't amount to shit
But I got a big dick, and it's growing. And my fucking lyrics keep flowing
And my mother fucking spit keep getting on my fucking clothes and the camera
Lens. I am in the mother fucking camera bends
I don't make sense, but I could give a damn if your bitch is a man. If your mother fucking head hurt from working all day
If your momma's dead, she be sucking dick and fucking pussy blunt ashtrays with your uncle
Fuck 'em, fuck you. If you looking at this, fuck you
Here, you is a mother fucking queer
Shout out to Odd Future, Peas 'n Carrots. We gon sit down and say cheers. I just though of that right now
Actually, I thought about that two minutes ago. We can go find a ho, or a slut, or a bitch, open up her legs and probably bust a nut in her hair
Spit up on the lens, lens up on the spit. This camera's shit
Hopefully, some nigga's will get me a cannon
Back to my first line, bammin Obama. Fuck you and your fucking momma
I'm lying, and your bitch is lying. Because the bitch got shot, and her fucking mom's dying
No, she's not dying, I'm lying. Her fucking uncle bobby just got shot with a BB......Gun, nigga's better run
My dick's a gun, and it's about to cum. Blow you in your mouth, yeah, I blow it in your mouth
Get it? No, you don't. Yes, you will, no, I won't
Fuck, I'm running out of breath. Need a fucking, inhaler before I fucking, inhale ya
This shit is recording, now I gotta save you like I'm jesus Christ, but I'm not
And hopefully the nigga behind me don't have a knife. I'm home alone, and I got my own bone, this is my own song
Actually, I'm going home tonight. Actually, I'm lying, I ain't right. Yep, yeah, eah
No, I'm going theres, to the house

I'm from Hawthorne, the dirty dirty. Where niggas get stabbed up, where niggas get rabbed up in rasbeads
And when I say rasbead, nigga's get raped. No homo, we're not fruity, we're not rasbead
We're the other b2k members. We're not fucking white winter, like December. We're low so, like fall in like September, or October, or November
I thought I told you, fuck. I'm sick of fucking rapping, I'm sick of fucking clapping, for you mother fuckers that's rapping
Saying that I freestyle, bring the pain. Nigga, this is not a freestyle. I'm not stupid, your not Lil Wayne
But I'm not Mike Jones, and I'm not Mike Jones, Mike Jones. Who? Shut the fuck up
Here's a dick, dad, you can suck up. But actually, I don't give a fuck up
I'mma a be a man about it and hopefully, suck it up. I'm talking about your dick, fuck it. You love it, no, you fucking hate it
And you fucking rate it, and degrade it, and discard it. Fuck it, I'll catch you niggas tomorrow
Cheers, busting in your ears

What else, did not fucking shout out? That's probably the only nigga's on MySpace I like
Oh, fuck it. The beat's coming bac- Nah, I'm playing, I'm so sick of this shit
I'll see ya'll nigga's later

Bad ass bitch, big ass titties man
Got a fucking AK size of a fucking mini-van
Y'all niggas got problems, then y'all do it
I got so much fucking money in my pockets I fucking walk stupid
But my bitch look good in some nice pants
Niggas see me they be like shit god damn AK-47 tucked in that nigga nice pants, hold up
Ya'll got a little nigga started on some G shit
THAT'S ME BITCH
I got little niggas one named Johnathan and one named Tammy
Y'all niggas got a fucking problem say it to my fucking face
Got little niggas that will sock you in the fucking face
And if you think they won't sock you in the fucking face
Pop you right in your fucking face

Chilling at the house on a couch with the box crayons and a line of cocaine
My nose is on fire like a button with propane, it's dripping all red of old gangs
And now you've seen your stars and your face numb like a funny bone cupping at ice
And your nose white like your head's covered in lice
But we both dazed, and I think I found my wife

Dazed and Amazed and I'm dazed and I'm blown
Dazed and Amazed and I'm dazed and I'm gone
Dazed and Amazed and I'm dazed and I'm home

Chilling at the house on the couch, nose white
Mind is travelling, thoughts is mental
I'm trying to get into your pus just like a pimple
And I wait for the Cat in the Hat to pop through the window
The opium is in slow
Thin Though
Put My Brim Low
Let the lights dim low

She right left me
The plane flew away, now my soul is unhealthy
On flight American 47
My summer love left me, and faded into heavens
She came to LA on vacation, about the third day we was having relation
For two weeks she was my angel
The kisses were incredible, the dates uncomparable
With her,she took my key
The key to remain,relation sanity
Now it was crazy
Fending for her love,and texted her daily
Abstinence is what she went by
No sex,I pretended like I had respect
I thought that I was set
But I was in love,when I heard she was

My summer love,My summer love

28 karats of gold
That's almost 24 karats of glow
But bugs bunny said 24 carrots of old
That they been spoiled green bean
That's three layers of mold
I've got three layers of coolness
And one of them is lukewarm water
She's somebody daughter
Her brain is smaller than the other girls
I've got Sarah Belle umm
Man I love summer heat
Never told her
Can't tell her,about cars dealing
She gambles with my dentist
That's why I have feelings
She stole my heart but they didn't really need it
So I guess shes off,not guilty
Love jewellery,so filthy
Now were chilling at the beach
Corn on the chips,corn on her feet
Feet in the sand,Hands on her weave
She's the fish to my water
Summer love
She's the summer to my heat

So I slide in
Cool like the breeze,feather
Its the summer weather
I know this her blinging
Like rose gold,rose gold
I went to the dealer
He sold gold,I chose gold
With a little bit of red bone
5'5" still pigion
Twitter cats on
Rasacha chey fitted caps
Where my flow excels
I don't show intel
And it's the summer baby,ring my bell
Her names rochelle,i want road kill
See her after the money,literally broke as hell
This summer,this summer
I got jokes for sale,wanna buy one?
Girl,where the F you get this guy from?
This summer,This summer,This summer,Yeah This summer

White bitches, white girls, white drugs
Black girls don't do it but my type does
Fuck it in my white van, beat her with a nice white nightstand
Until I give her gashes where it's nothin' but the white meat
E-T-I-H, W's, double D's on her knees
White gargle yellow fuckin' bumblebees
Use whitey's as my dinner course for intercourse
So much fuckin' white make Darth Vader have a dimmer force
But of course, I'm the white boy that shows no remorse
Pull up on a stark with enough white to kill a horse
Nigga Friday, fuck a Blacc Friday, umm
Wolf Gang make a white pregnant bitch wan' abort
Bring the remainin' red and white pieces to the fort
Odd Future, there wolves bang where a couple bears hang
With a white box logo with a couple stains
From the black and white green pie make it light grey

Oh wow, Obilivion stump
I do not know how that dead body got inside of my trunk
What the fuck, Gee Willikers and no I'm not drunk
I could have sworn that Budweiser can read fruit punch
Let you sip casually when you tryna lose calories
I'm not a murderer, this occurance that is happenin'
Cause sporadically damagin' my reputation
See I'm a good guy but when I see dead casualties
My penis gets erected and my nipples are such aroused
And the blouses of these bitches always end up in my house
And three hours in the showers with the corpse
I've ejaculated enough semen to sink a boat what, umm
Riley's body is entirely covered and tied up
From my desire now look at the fuckin' irony
I killed my manager with an iron
All because the bitch finally decided to fire me
Back at Travvy's house even though that faggot admires me
All because I heard that he was talkin' to Danielle
So now that I finally made that fags hand handheld
He can finnally help me masturbate and read fanmail
First letter says motherfucker you're dead
The king of comedy heard everythin' that you said
And Just in Time your head is mine
You crossed the fuckin' line like a dirty Mexicans
Second letter read hey son it's me
Fuck you, I'm a subject without my permission
Third letter quote hey Ace I'm addicted to coke
Wanna ask how I been so?
I make songs about shit for attention
Put them out randomly hopin' that I get some
I got problems in my head that I want, no
But I don't trust anybody, yeah no one
Savin' up 24 bullets with gun
Cause I got demons that I cannot let out, umm
Hopefully the next album can help me out
Cause I'm now, livin' this life with foolproof doubts
So, I just need someone to talk to, kinda rushed
But nobody gives a fuck, fuck it, signed anonymous

Tyler is shown in black and white sitting on a stool in an all white room. The camera shakes slightly, bringing Tyler in and out of focus.

The cockroach climbs to the edge of his hand and it crawls onto his other hand, and Tyler stares at the camera.

Tyler brings the hand with the cockroach down, out of the view of the camera. He brings it back up in between his fingers and puts it in his mouth.

He chews, and the camera begins panning out, bringing Tyler in and out of focus. He makes a face of disgust, and stands up from the stool, heaving.

Something something
Mother fucking god again
I was licking niggas balls until my fucking dick was wet
But now these niggas think that I'm weak
I smoke mother fucking kush you don't even got to speak
My niggas smoking on it
My niggas toking on it
I'm swallowing the fucking kush
Y'all niggas choking on it
AK-47 niggas know I got that money
Nigga I just fucked your bitch and after that I hit my Dougie
Hit my fucking Dougie like it ain't tomorrow
Ask a bitch does she got some pussy I could borrow
Hit that hit that money I get that
Nigga got a problem get is wig I'mma split that
Okay okay nigga cause I'm like DJ Quik
Just the way I quick that
Hit it with finesse
Niggas know that I'm the best
Nigga do I got grey hair mother fucker do it look like this nigga stressed?
Hell nah
These niggas already know
That I got bitches and I got hoes
And these niggas already
What the fuck you doing
What the fuck I'm doing counting money though
Nigga uh
Any nigga got a problem
Nigga better go and solve them
I'm with your baby mama
She Mexican and you already know that she made a nigga enchiladas
I'm, with these niggas
Making that money, counting these figures

Throw down that shit nigga

Bitch I'm a mothafuckin' G
Bitch you ain't fucking with me
I be stabbing bitches
Fucking hoes with no condom on

Happy holiday ho
Happy holiday

Bitch I be kicking babies
Hoes in the club
Ho, don't eat my grits bitch
Dont touch my trix
Barking at the hoes
Niggas better recognize that I be stabin' niggas
Stabing niggas with pencils niggas
Fucking bitches with no comdom

Bitch better have my chicken
I want my Popeye's, niggas

Daisy, Daisy, give me your answer do
I'm half crazy all for the loving of you
It won't be a stylish marriage
And I cannot afford a carriage
But you'll look sweet on the seat
Of a bicycle built for two
We will go tandem as man and wife
Peddling the way down the road of life
When the roads dark we can all despise
There are bright lights in the dazzling eyes

Daisy, Daisy Bell

White b*tches, white girls, white drugs
F*ck it in my white van, beat her with a nice white nightstand
White gargle yellow f*ckin' bumblebees
So much f*ckin' white make Darth Vader have a dimmer force
Black Friday, f*ck a n*gga Friday, umm
Wolf Gang make a white pregnant b*tch wan' abort
From the black and white cream pie make it light grey

Oh wow, Oblivion stump
What the f*ck, Gee Willikers and no I'm not drunk
I'm not a murderer, this occurrence that is happenin'
And the blouses of these b*tches always end up in my house
From my desire now look at the f*ckin' irony
All because the b*tch finally decided to fire me
Back at Travy's house even though that faggot admires me
He can finally help me masturbate and read fanmail
First letter says motherf*cker you're dead
You crossed the f*ckin' line like a dirty Mexicans
F*ck you, I'm a subject without my permission
I make songs about sh*t for attention
I got problems in my head that I want gone
But nobody gives a f*ck, f*ck it, signed anonymous

Cops tripping on a nigga cause they know I'm a black man
The flow dirty like a real stinky trash can
Niggas don't really want no problems, I got guns, I solve em
These bitch niggas know I sell crack like concrete
And if you don't believe me, you can find me in the streets
My niggas be listening to fucking N Sync
Mike, Doms The real shit, nigga in pink
Y'all niggas don't got problems ok niggas don't talk none of that stuff
Get muffed, give a fuck
And if you wanna laugh, I'll stick a fucking bundle of bananas in my ass
Pussy motherfuckers you need to shut the fuck up
You niggas need to learn me and Lionel in a fucking G rolling on sherm
Smoking PCP bath salt nigga
Y'all niggas just all talk nigga
Wolf gang don't bark nigga we bitch niggas
When we see the spark nigga, I call on the cops
Snitch on a nigga, I give no fucks
If you got a problem with my bitch y'all a pot
I got fake Gucci, I got fake Louis, I got a fucking dookie
I got a hoopty, bills ain't paid
Got a fucked up line up, with no fade
Nigga, Look at all of these asses over here
Y'all niggas wanna talk shit about my ears
Get your face took
Imma cyber bully and snitch on Facebook
Y'all niggas tell me that I'm ugly nigga
That shit ain't even funny nigga
My momma love me nigga, so i don't care about your opinion

Jesus, somebody call my shrink cause i think i'm about to have a fucking seizure
I forgot half this fucking verse, i'm guessing my brain have amnesia
Cause all my brain cells are living single like a deja
Rapping - stop it
Open - lock it
You niggas come short like fucking hobbits
I kidnapped a manager and robed it
I choked the motherfucker like batman and Robin
Then eat batskin and Robin
My girlfriend Islamic
Make it eat my pork fork spoon
In a room with pianos and balloons, i'l walk away with mushrooms
My girlfriend's a hippy
I bet i feed that motherfucker line like i'm Britney
You faggots are sissies
I'm shitty - y'all pissy
I run this shit, how the fuck you niggas skip me?
Even emo bitches want to slit me
I'm a bass drum - kick me

Been that man since Batman had a sidekick
Robin, and I'm giving to the poor Mike Tyson
Don't drink extavia bitch I put rice in
Here bitch, ziploc bag filled with my dick
Give it to your parents and tell them that it's a nice gift
Of my semen, futures as I'm a psychic
Do you wanna ride? Because I don't know where my bike is
I've lost my mind
Can somebody page Amanda Bynes and maybe she can help me find it?
Pink and blue all on my neck, fuck I'm blinded
I'm a nigga bitch, bring that pink pale pussy here and take some nigga dick
Spitting, get it cracking like some nigga lips
Bad to the bone, I don't know where my appendix is
I'm kidding it's right here
In the pocket of them pants covered in white smears
Engine to my left, Clipse plays in my right ear
When I steer that third gear, people fear when I drive here
I'm fast motherfucker in a whole other lightyear, what's up?

Yo, that flow is sick
I'm going to figure out how to do some shit

Check, I spit the flows and I got a bunch of ho's
You be sucking dick, I have several bitches without a nose
They be sniffing coke
All this that I spit and I wrote last night when I fucked a black dyke
I ride skateboards and ride pink bikes
Actually I'm lying I'm still on strike
That equals three but I have four wheel
Actually I have asthma so I popped four pills
Im rolling down four hills
My girlfriend name is Smith and she has a dick
And I give it kiss she has herpes on her lip
Her herpes on her herpes on her herpes on her lip
90 percent of you niggas want this beat
90 percent of niggas want this beat
But I won't give a meat, cause I want peat
Cause it looks like my mothers feet
And thats a bunch of corns I'm a horn dog
You should meet my dad he always feed me a corn dog
No homo though I got a Louis Vuitton dildo
With Bathing Ape camo
And ice cream, get it ice cream
Naw I'm just playing I got a lot of nice things
Its, can you get the Ape
Ice cream boutique yeah your bitches love the tape
You can't fuck with it 300 for some cake
Im a rich prostitute 300 for some clothes
Got a lot of hoes, flows oohs
Spaghetti and oo's
All you niggas hating
Shout out to Casey Veggies Customized Greatly
Customized daily
Actually I just had a threesome with Alicia Keys, Common, Kanye West, and Carson Daly
And I be in Carsons Daily
You like this
Trying to ask a nigga when I could join Christ list
Nah im lying I got Odd Future
So actually I'm used to
A lot of things that I have like a dingleing
Fuck rapping, fuck beats nigga I can sing
A motherfucking song
Kind of like seeing a one year old kid in a thong thats like wrong
Rongy dongy dingy dongy
Having sex with a fat bitch that doesn't like dingy dongies
But she like my dingy dongy stinky
Here show you my motherfucking dick yellow like Twinkies
But she could eat it with white stuff in the middle
Hmm, put it in my dads ass and it tickles
So he giggles and I'm kind of like the wiggles when I wiggle

I'm swaggin bitch, I'm iced out
Oh u mad bitch cause I'm laying on the couch
Smoke a blunt, fuck a bitch in the butt I'm bossin
Don't give a fuck, I'm never on slauson
I'm fly bitch,I should poke u in yo eye bitch
Got the burner bitch, bow,bow
You dead bitch,I'm hot as fuck, I ain't never cold, but I;m
Icy bitch!
My Bitch Suck Dick Like She Suck Dick
Got the bops in the house
Socking bitches in they mouth
See my neck, iced the fuck out
Im getting money nigga
Pull up on a muthafucking unicorn
Im getting ponies nigga
Wolf gang nigga scream that till them
Muthafuckas show me death
Golf wang nigga, free earl betta show some
Muthafucking
Respect
All this is ice around my neck
All this ice around my dick
Gun to her head make yo bitch massage my
Shoulders bitch
Shut up bitch
Suck my dick
U fucking bop
U better swallow it
I got a chain with a fucking platinum plaque on it
Is that a 100 dollar bill I'll shit on it
I bought a fucking whale
Cause I'm ballin
Yo bitch works for me
She's my dishwasher
Swag on my dick
30 thousand million
Nigga, nigga, nigga
U boppin bitch, u like this dick?
We all know why, cause u's a boppin bitch
I gots da burner, I'll pop u in yo lip
Zoom zoom yah, I'm going fast bitch
Punch a bitch in her mouth just for talking shit
You lurking bitch, well I see that shit, once again I got to
Punch a bitch in her shit
I'm icy bitch, look at my wrist, because if you do, I might
Blind you bitch
Mount everest ain't fucking with my fucking wrist
Fuck global warming, this a ice age bitch

Your bitch pretty, she pretty
And now she's screaming, now i fill her up with semen
All she see is sea man
Now you hear her voice, no pro-choice
No odd pro-abortion on this boat
Bitch calm down, down
Krusty The Clown will make you laugh
Laugh, finger in your ass
Now you like "woah, hold up
Mister, I don't know your name"
Bitch, shut the fuck up, you're on a train
Just to death chop your body up and put it in the freezer
Bleed her
Before i kill her, fuck her just to please her
No condom, I just might disease her
And if that fucking happen, fuck it
She'll be dead, chopped up in my motherfucking freezer
You can fuckin' get the vanilla, Manelly Lisa
Alisa, here you wanna sample, nigga, try it
Kinda like a printer, nigga fire, I'm the dentist
Niggas looking at me
Hair nappy, here's a brush
But she don't wanna rush
Cuz if I fucking bust, quick
She's gonna be pissed
But then I pull out, fuck, I can't have blue balls
So bitch start sucking my dick
And then she fucking lick
I bust up on her face, now she looking like Michael, Jackson
Jackson, now I sound like Toni Braxton
Deep voice, motherfucker
Fuck, I had her sucking on my wrapped lollipop
Like it's a sucker, motherfucker

Back for round two, i found you
You tryna run, but i found blue
Yellows over there
And the motherfucking field where
The niggas wear colored pants, jerking, pop pills
I'm on the other side
Where all the niggas ride, the niggas skate
But we take indy bitches with high GPAs up on a date
Where niggas smoke blunts and sniff coke
Where the motherfucking freestyles are never wrote
Or written, i'm livin'
Nigga shittin' while i'm pissin'
On they face, mace
Here you call the cops
Here's my phone, i'll catch your case
But i got a good lawyer so my fucking record erase
Just like a fucking pencil, I mental
Left Brain laced this instrumental, with some shit that’s so illegal, that
He gon have to go and fly over seas like an eagle
In the Winta, Decemba, Imba, Limpa
Kick him in the leg now he limpa, IMPA
Niggas rollin round, Nipsey Hussle in the Impala
Lookin at me while I style on ya
Oh, you mad cause I’m styling on you?
Plus the call is on me?
4-5in on em
Gnolly tricks on ya bitch, girl-boy lookin clean cause
You already know my hat green, and that shit staying Supreme
You can’t fuck with it, you little H-B
You hate me, A-C, L-B, H-B
C-V, Super 3 and Bran’doom DeShay
With my Nigga Domo the Gene’says, you
Hate on the O-F, that’s the best letter in the world
And I’m better better, than your better girl
She the best I’ve ever had. I--*cough cough*
Asthma- *cough* Fuck it, I’m coughin
This the re’free- *cough cough* oh shit
*cough cough* I’m bout to hit it back. *cough.*
I said, This the re-freestyle
No written
I spit all my shit from the dome
Home like a motherfucker nigga leavin his college, for good
In the Hood
I’m from Ladera, not from Anglewood
Hawthorne couple times, go the city where I be
Even up in Hollywood, you could find me
I’m not a fucking cliche
E-Shay, E, A, ohhh fuck it i’m over it
I got work tomorrow
Left Brain let me get a beat to borrow
Just so I could spit the shit quick
Bitches with some big lips, yeah she got some big lips
A nice long tongue, for this over-sized big dick
Size 12 in the Shoe, 32 in the jeans
Skinny as fuck motherfucking t-shirt a 2X, yes
And you could ask anybody here that’s daily
Bitches feel me, fucking iPods wanna play me
Ask me why I cuss so much
Fuck, shit, cunt and dick
Now shut the fuck up bitch
Eat a fucking dick in a blanket
I be on that stank shit
Fuck everybody here
What the fuck I look like thankin'?

Ohh shit, the beat ended, fuck

Skate park 'til the days dark
Then it's Roscoes with the whole fucking G Olf Wang
Wolf Gang same thing just the G's off
Sick fuck I got mini germs I feel like Adolf
Aye, Y'all motherfuckers thought I was gone fall off
Sorry, future brighter than what Stevie Wonder ain't saw
Ain't yaw jaw hurting from the hate, naw?
Ah fuck it mate... and my balls still ain't drop pause

Sick... Spittin' like the motherfucking droolin'
Ear to a sea shell listening to Frankie's new shit

Who's this motherfucking crew bringing cool back
To the rap bake sale makin' all the cake back
Made about one zero zero zero zero eight stacks
In a whole different fucking country where they hate rap
And they say 'Hey black, can I get my kids back?
You brain washed them with all that triple sixty six crap'

4334
Tall, skinny, lanky, bucket, fuck it badass posture

VERY MUCH A WORK IN PROGRESS!!!

I had a show New Year's 2015, and I haven't came out with music in a while

Damn, finally, you gonna drop a new album

That show fuckin' sucked dick! That show was trash. What none of these kids knew was that I was halfway done with a brand new album

*Tyler recording verse from Death Camp*

DEATH CAMP

I'm recording songs, directing these videos, doing these photoshoots, the release date is comin'

We look like Puffy and Mase on our jiggy shit, you feel me?

And right before it releases, this bullshit happens

*_____ adding his vocals to Death Camp*

*Tyler recording clapping*

*_____ playing a guitar riff*

*Tyler playing and recording the tambourine*

*Tyler recording his verse on Death Camp*

*Live performance of Death Camp at Camp Flog Gnaw*

BUFFALO

I usually just make shit 'cause it look cool, but people's brains misinterpret it whatever way they want it to, man...

*Offstage filming of _____*

I should be that white face character I was in Tamale, because it's like no deeper underlying shit

*At a live performance*

I performed this shit in my bedroom, so this shit's personal when I'm just in my room dancin' alone. Play that shit, Travis?

I'm just really hungry, this shit is garbage

*Live performance of _____*

You got cum in your ear. *Laughs*

Alright, back to my house, 'cause that's my, that's my comfort zone

PILOT

*Tyler records his verse on Pilot in his room*

*Kali Uchis recording her verse on ____*

TYLER AND ROCKY TOUR TEXAS

What? You gonna come clean, what, 'cause I whooped your ass?

Coming on this tour, I didn't know what to expect

It's crazy, it kinda, I think it kinda makes me not judge as much

*Mocking Rocky* Yo, what up, I'm ASAP Rocky, you gettin' jiggy here with my mans, uh, I love bad bitches, that's my fuckin' problem

Plus, that's in my top three songs to perform

*Live performance of RUN in Paris, France *

******** LYRICS TO RUN AGAIN********* ADD THEM HERE

CALABASAS, CALIFORNIA 8PM MONDAY NIGHT

Got big arms

What's up with you? *Laughs* You good? Aight?

Yo, chill bro!

**MORE LIVE STUFF*

Yo, yo yo yo yo! Back to RUN!

I set up, like, all my recording stuff and my instruments in my living room downstairs

That ain't even your regular voice?

Runnin', I'm runnin', I'm runnin-

Runnin', I'm runnin', I'm runnin', I'm runnin', I'm runnin', I'm runnin', I'm runnin'

Follow the keyboard

Runni- might have to overdub it

What you mean?

It's such a weird jump. It's like, jumpin' octaves, it's kinda weird

*re-records his line on RUN*

Uh, that last note right here, try to hold that

Hold it. Okay

Man, black people are gonna hate this song

He clipped that shit!

Trash! Ay, go up, go up! Trunk now! Go up, trunk!

What, he's not gonna do it, did I not do it? Did I do it? I Already did it. I have nothing else to prove

The trunk! It's taller! Do the trunk, it's taller! Do the trunk, it's taller! See, look at him. There's always an excuse

HOLLYWOOD HILLS 5PM 2015

*_____ begins playing the sax*

That sounds amazing. Just do like, another pass where you just fuckin' let it all out, just do what this tells you

Doubling things, and tripling-

These pads, they-
Well, if we're doubling lots of-

But I'mma just pan this one-

Coming in with a swell is nice-

It might be easier to have-

Yeah, or, no, it should be, it should be on three. Dun dun dun dun dun-

But dog, when you get that finished product? It's all worth it

*____ begin playing strings*

I'm like, what is that? I think I could go higher!

Oh, shit! Why'd you do that?!

SAME NIGHT 30 MINS LATER WANDERING THE STUDIO

Hey! How are you!

I'm fine man, how are you?

Like, you can't make the same sound

No, exactly, and that's what I love, is it's totally unpredictable

Is this the one where you just plug in shit?

Oh my god

But more importantly, I got the nod of approval. So sick!

High five! High five! Then you ain't shit, hoe

Okay, okay, I'm fully not feeling this

Black diamonds, yellow canary diamonds, white diamonds...

BROWN STAINS

*Tyler records his verse on Brown Stains*

I think ScHoolboy Q is a actual shermhead, and no-one can tell me any different. He's my fucking favorite ever, I love him so much. He's a shermhead

TYLER AND SCHOOLBOY Q RECORDING SESSION HOLLYWOOD CA 2015

*ScHoolboy Q records his verse on Brown Stains*

What are you doin'?

Just goin' in, man, you know, gon' body some shit cuz

What kinda draws are you wearing?

Um...

Dude, that's weird

Some Calvin Kleins-

No! No!

*Live performance of Brown Stains*

It was dope as fuck. Shout out to Tyler, we got the same car, it's tight

When I'm not making a song I can drive fast to or wild out on stage, I'm tryna figure out the right chords and melodies

SINGERS

Keeping ALL the fuckups too

KALI & TYLER RECORDING SESSION HOLLYWOOD TUESDAY 11 PM

OKAGA, CA is my favorite song on that album, and probably, to me personally, in my top five songs in my discography

*CLEM RECORDS HER LINE*

*CLEM RECORDS*

*ALICE SINGS*

*SYD SINGS*

But working with Charlie Wilson, that was a whole 'nother story

FUCKING YOUNG

*CHARLIE RECORDS*

What the fuck, I hate this. *Laughs* I fully, I fully can't take this

He's a legend, and him taking cues from we was so weird

***UM I NEED TO FIGURE OUT HOW TO DO THE SUBTITLING FOR THIS PART***

FUCKING YOUNG VIDEO SHOOT

I'm so sorry! I'm so sorry

This is happening! Oh, my god

It was a two week span where everything I had planned for this album just started to come together. It was beautiful

SMUCKERS

*KANYE RECORDING VERSE*

KANYE WEST RECORDING SESSION HIDDEN HILLS 9PM

I gotta figure that shit out!

I see you tryna figure it out!

Fuckin' fire!

And I knew specifically, I wanted Wayne's tone of voice on there

Real nigga I gotch yall
Hit a nigga eat a puff, hotdog
Ak47 shoot a nigga, fuck you and ya crew nigga
Yall niggas weak as fuck
Big rims, big body, yall niggas
12 gauge shotty, pow pow to a nigga dome
Run up through a niggas home
Nigga now his bitch a bitch
Arf arf, bark bark
Can't see a nigga in the dark dark
Hit a nigga quick, nigga got a problem
Make his bitch lick a dick
I'm a motherfucking gooooon
Ass nigga you don't really wanna fuck with

I got guns in the fucking pan
Hit the band, nigga
AK47 in the land hit the dance, nigga
I don't got plans, I just go, go
Like the Roadrunner, where's the coyote
It's Rocky and T, y'all ain't fucking with me
Please, had niggas singing "Stop" like it's Glee
Nigga chill
I'm real, I'm ill
I'm sickle cell

Wait hold on, hold on, let me hit 'em with some soft shit

Hey beautiful girl
You already know we keep it trilla on the side
Got my nigga T on the side
Got the Caddy, that's the ride

Fuck that nigga, you gon' die
I don't play...

Ha ha ha ha!
Welcome, every-fucking-body
Starring, Tyler the Creator, Hodgy Beats
Left Brain, Earl Sweatshirt, Domo Genesis
Mike G, and lastly, Jasper the Fucking Dolphin
We want to welcome all the dudearamas and all the bastards
And everyone else for coming out tonight
This is going to be a great experience
And we want y'all motherfuckers to buy popcorn
Please take them motherfuckers home Cause it is a lot of cursing and don't give-a-fuckness goin on
Now - for all my Odd Future crew out there that's uh backstage
I just uh, I just wanna know who's gonna start this show

The big eared bandit is tossin' all his manners
In a bag and wrappin' them in Saran wrap bandages
Tossin' 'em in baskets with the rest of those sandwiches
So when he says "Catch up, nigga" it looks like an accident
Um, flowin' like my pad is the maxiest
My bitch white and black like she's been mimickin' a panda
It's the dark skinned nigga, kissin' bitches in Canada
Then kicking all out like Mr. Lawrence did Pamela
Put her in the chamber all against her Wilt Chamberlain
I never had a Reason, nigga I was just Ableton
Not a fuckin' Logic contradictin' dick head
Flyer than an ostrich moshin' in a tar pit
Semen scented cheetah printed tee
In that 'Preme five panel, I'll repeat it for the season
Previous items in the present
With the normal ass past like I cheated on my team
To have some type of knowledge that is one perception
But knowin' you own your opponent is a defeatin' bonus
I'm Zeus to a Kronos, cartilage cartridge is boneless
Smiles of cowards in lead showers, dead spouses in red blouses
Children who fled houses on Mustang horses and went joustin'
I'm on my Robin Hood shit, robbing in the hood
Whips, drugs, jewels, and your pet, I'm stealin' your rims
Coke diamonds and your Vette, soldiers lace the fuckin' boot
And salute like the troop when they shoot you gon' brrrooop
It's KillHodgy, nigga, stay the fuck off my stoop
And out my Kool aid, Juice
Hodgy got the juice, I got the gin
Jasper got the Henny, my nigga we get it in
Wolf Gang party at the hotel
I call a ho, you call a ho, and all the hoes tell
You know Left Brain need a freak
I need a bitch to go down like a Nitty beat
Yup, uh, and her ass fat
Don't be surprised if I ask where the hash at
Nigga I'm tryna smoke, bitch get higher
Domo where that Flocka Flame? Talking 'bout a lighter
Still bang salute me or just shoot me
Cause if you don't salute me then my team will do the shooting
Yeah my nigga Ace will pull the black jack
The king Mike G is in the cut with the black mac
We like the mafia, bitch, don't get to slacking up
And if these haters acting up, throw 'em in the aqueduct
Free my nigga Earl, yo, I don't really ask for much
But two bad bitches in front of me cunnilingus
What the fuck is caution?
Often I leave 'em flossing in KAWS, exes next to coffins
Lost in translation, the dreams you chase
Got you diving for the plates like you stealing home base
That's great, I'm home alone dreaming of two on ones
With Rihanna and Christina Milian, bring it on
And Travis is in the closet organizing and hanging the tramp
Three lettermans that Ace has been making him
No strays while we catching matinees, huh?
I'm getting blazed thinking 'bout those days
I had the top off the GT3 like toupees
One finger in the air, all's fair when crime pays
My grand scheme of things is to be attached
To the game like bitches to their wedding rings
And you don't even need to look cause we gleam obscene
In the light, ride slow to my yellow diamond shining
Like the Batman logo over Gotham, rock LA to Harlem
If you say "Get 'em Mike G" then I got 'em
One man squadron, nigga I'm a problem
From Briggs I got bars and plans to
Pimp these Polish bitches into pop stars
Humanity kills, we all suffer from insanity still
And if I said it then it is or it's gonna be real
OF 'til I OD and I probably will, uh
It's still Mr. Smoke-a-Lotta-Pot, get your baby mommy popped
With my other snobby bop, do I love her? Prolly not
Know your shit is not as hot as anything I fuckin' drop
Bitch I'm in the zone, stand alone, like Macaulay Cock
I've been runnin' blocks since a snotty tot
Big wheel was a big deal with the water Glocks
Now I'm all grown, same song, just a different waltz
Fire what I talk, but still cooler than an Otter Pop
Op, Dom next shit in your wish list
Mad sick shit, mad dick for your bitches
On some slick shit, your mistress on my hit list
And I'm lifted 'til I'm stiff outta this bitch
Odd in your mothafuckin' area
Blood clots give me five feet 'fore I bury ya
Suicide flow, let the big wave carry ya
Tyler got the mask like he held Jim Carrey up
And fuck your team, ho nigga wassup
Wolf Gang so you know we not giving no fucks
You know me dog, I'm a chill in the cut so I can
Cut it short, break it down, couple pounds, roll it up
Get me a Persian rug where the center looks like Galaga
Rent a super car for a day
Drive around with your friends, smoke a gram of that haze
Bro, easy on the ounce, that's a lot for a day
But just enough for a week, my nigga what can I say
I'm hi and I'm bi, wait I mean I'm straight
I'mma give you this wine, the runner just brought the grapes
My brother give it some time, Morris, and Day
Course you know the vibe's as fly as the rhymes
On the song, cut and you could sample the feel
Headphone bleed, make this shit sound real
Used to work the grill, Fatburger and fries
Then I made a mil and them psychics was liars
Now, how many fucking crystal balls can I buy and own
Humble old me had to flex for the folks
Down in Muscle Beach pumping iron and bone
Bumping oldies off my cellular phone
Yeah, bumping oldies off my cellular phone
Goddammit, this rapping is stupid and it's hard
Gotta do it over and over and over again but here it go
Hey it's Jasper, not even a rapper
Only on this beat to make my racks grow faster
Got a TV show, so I guess I'm an actor
Pot head, half baked, lookin' like Chappelle
Rollin' up a blunt with that fire from hell
Still ignorant, still hit a bitch
Wolf Gang, nigga, so I still don't give a shit
Catch me in the back with Miley on my lap
Bong rips as I feel on that little bitch cat
Hah, nigga came through with a 9 bar real quick
Just for the bitches, little bit of money in my pocket
Look, for contrast, here's a pair of lips
Swallowin' sarapin and settin' fire to sheriff's whips
Crushin' rapper larynx to feed 'em a fuckin' carrot stick
And me? I just spent a year Ferrisin'
And lost a little sanity to show you what hysterics is
Spit til' the lips meet the bottom of a barrel, so that sterile piss
Flow remind these niggas where embarrassed is
Narrow, tight line, might impair him since
I made it back to Fahrenheit, grimey get dinero type
Feral, fuckin'-ill-apparel-wearin' pack of parasites
Threw his own youth off the roof after paradise
La di da di, back in here to fuck the party up
Raidin' fridges, tippin' over vases with a tommy gun
Never dollars, poppa make it rain hockey pucks
And 60 day chips from fuckin' awesome anonymous
Call him bloated 'til he show 'em that the flow deluxe
Off the wall loafers, Four Loko and a cobra clutch
Vocals bold and rough, evoke a ho to pose as drum
And let me hit and beat it with a stick until the hole is numb
The culprit of the potent punch
Scoldin' hot as dunkin' scrotum in a Folgers cup
Or Nevada, drivin' drunk inside a stolen truck
Shittin' like his colon bust
Belly full of chicken and a fifth of old petroleum
Supernova, I'm rollin' over the novices
And roamin' through the forest and spittin' cold as his porridge is
Stay gold 'til the case closed and the story end
Post mortem porkin' this rap shit and record it
To escort it to the morgue again, lord of lips
Bored of this, forklift the tippy top, best under 40 list
Stormin' the gate, ensurin' the bass
Scorchin', leave these motherfuckers sore in torso and face
Get at me, we savages, half a pack of Apache
Indian pack of niggas who don't give a fuck if we nasty as flatulence
As a matter of fact, your swagger is tacky
So see me you can't like Crunchy Black catchin' a taxi
Uh, back like lateral passin'
With that mothafuckin' gladiator manner of rappin'
As an addict I let Percocet and Xannies relax me
Fall back if your paddies is Maxi, please
OF, shit that's all I got
From my bigger brother Frankie to my little brother Tac
From that father figure Clancy to that skatey nigga Nak
Shreddin' down 'Fax, Wolf Gang run the fuckin' block
Storefront, knee tat
Book cover is the same lettering on lettermans and cotton socks
And grip tape... and my shoes
Um, I was 15 when I first drew that donut
5 years later, for our label yea we own it
I started an empire, I ain't even old enough
To drink a fucking beer, I'm tipsy off this soda pop
This is for the nigga in the suburbs
And the white kids with nigga friends who say the n-word
And the ones that got called weird, fag, bitch, nerd
Cause you was into jazz, kitty cats, and Steven Spielberg
They say we ain't actin' right
Always try to turn our fuckin' color into black and white
But they'll never change 'em, never understand 'em
Radical's my anthem, turn my fucking amps up
So instead of critiquing and bitchin', bein' mad as fuck
Just admit, not only are we talented, we're rad as fuck, bitches

Uh, they, fuck
Uh, yeah
They ask me if I'm Tyler, the nasty
Nigga that used to be in seventh grade watching Degrassi
But yall niggas and your whips with your rims and your hat with the brims rolling right past me
But I could give a fuck less about what you doing
Who you screwing, who you booing
I got these bitches brewing in my gold pots
You could see the Rolex, the gold watch
I'm in that bape shit, or that bathing ape shit
That shit that make you my Superman hoodie is cape shit
You on that fake shit, that true religion, abercrombie, 'postale, nigga my t-shirt is pastel
My nigga I pass well
Well passed, and I pass that fucking class well
Like I'm so swole, this bape shit is so old, older than the ice cream shoes I have that's growing mold
And they say "Ace, you're genius" I say "I play piano, make songs, a big penis"
Cause when I have 2, listen to Neptune shit, I'm never Mars or Venus, you seen this
My 3D glasses still the cleanest, enis, anus, nigga you could paint this is a mutha fucking bush
All you niggas running but I'm still not in a rush and I'm winning
No races, but I'm grinning
Don't believe in God, but I'm sinning
He-man and she-man and he-man confused than
Yall want the rims, but I'm still chilling in the mutha fucking mini-van like
What it do, what it do, fuck you, and your crew, OF to the death, nah
Yall know I do bail, yall rep yall set until the death nigga this OF until, until
And nigga I'm reed, eating mutha fucking ice cream reese's pieces
I'm eating like a feces

What the fuck is my problem!
I'm a let this one ride out tho
I'm a let the keys fuck with the drums
A.C.E, OFM, Bangin' on your FM, yes
It was all a dream, now I got my own magazine, word up
I'm out, peace

Sometimes, I sit in my room and think about us
You got them long lashes, couldn't get the dirt in em'
Curls on your head look like waves I'ma surf in em'
Wave at the camera, the paps ask your roll line
I evade in the answer, but if you ain't a dummy
Shit is laid in these stanzas, kidnap my feelings
I ain't paying any ransom, I, keep em' like secrets
Might, drive a nigga crazy but I'm, beepin' like, beepin' like, beepin' like pages on a hip waist strainer, Yeugh!

You pray the God that one of your neighbors can help you
But that won't happen, I'm Helter Skelter
I'm not a maniac, I'm a zombie
Better hope Jesus come on time
Because I'm about to rape and somedize you
Keep doing that till I realize you
There for the sound wolves that I pound you
I'm like stalker
Catching bitches walking after dark and park
Hit that corner, hit that dome
They can't call cause I took that far
Using up minutes
Use it on my homies just to tell 'em I’m in it
Haven't you heard of Sarah that's me
I make that bitch my mental
Wolves in my head like kill them
Amityville, Insanity-ville, I can't swallow my cavaties
That's strictly from my casualties
That's really good with ham and cheese
How you doing my name is Tyler and you're a dead bitch
First
I'm coming
You better run bitch!

And now these niggas think that im weak
I smoke motherfucking kush you dont even gotta speak
My nigga smoking on it my niggas tokin on it
Im swallowing the fucking kush yall niggas choking on it
AK47 niggas know i got that money
Nigga i just fucked your bitch and after that i hit my dougie
Hit my fuckin dougie like it ain't tommorrow
Ask a bitch does she got some pussy i could borrow
Hit that hit that money i get that
Nigga got a problem get his wig and i split that
Ok ok nigga cuz im like dj quick just the way i quit that
Hit it with finnese niggas know that im the best
Nigga do i got grey hair motherfucker do it look like this nigga stressed
Hell naw these niggas already know that i got bitches and i got hoes
These niggas already- what the fuck you doing what the fuck im doing
Countin money doe, nigga
Any nigga gotta problem
Nigga we go and solve em
Im witcha baby moma she mexican and you already know she made a nigga enchildas
Im with these niggas makin that money counting these figures

By the way we do punch bitches

Oh you mad bitch cause Im laying on the couch
Smoke A Blunt Fuck A bitch in the butt Im Bossin
Dont Give a fuck, I never role Slauson
Im fly Bitch, I should poke you in your eye bitch
Got the burning bitch, Bow! Bow!
You dead bitch, Im hot as fuck, I ain't ever cold. But Im Icy Bitch!
My Bitch Suck Dick, Like She Suck Dick
My Bitch Suck Dick, Like She Suck Dick Nigga

Got the bops in the house socking bitches in they mouth
See my neck iced the fuck out, Im getting money nigga
At the fucking mall 40 bitches on my nut sack
Pull up on a motherfucking unicorn, I get ponys nigga
Wolf Gang Nigga Scream that to the motherfucking show me dept
Golf Wang Nigga, Free earl better show some motherfucking respect
All this ice around my neck, All this ice around my dick
Gun to her head, Make your bitch massage my shoulders

I got a chain with a fucking platnium plaque on it
Is that a 100 dollar bill, I'll shit on it, I bought a fucking well. Causes Im ballin
Your bitch work for me, Shes my dishwasher
Swag on my dick 30,000 million, Nigga Nigga

GOT . . . DAMN
We all know why, Cause yous a boppin bitch
I got the burner, I'll pop you in your lip
Zoom Zoom Yeah, Im going fast bitch
Im loud as fuck, Im ignorant
Punch your bitch in the mouth, Just for talking shit
You lurking bitch, Well I see that shit
One second I got punch a bitch in her shit
Im icy bitch, Don't look at my wrists, because if you do
I might blind you bitch, Mount Everest ain't fucking with my fuckin wrists
Fuck Global Warming, This the ice age bitch
My Bitch Suck Dick, Swag swag punch a bitch
Swag swag punch a bitch, swag swag punch a bitch
Swag swag, punch a bitch, swag swag punch a bitch
Yo yo, Jasper, Taco ya'll my niggas man

Sahaaa
Ahaaa
I got memes
Im dat boy
Aye aye
Young Lazy Eye
Damn this is a long ass intro
Belak

My memes are a different breed

Smoking green
But im not tryna be a hermit or a green frog
Its me Belak
With a decree
Let them be free
Just let me be
With all my memes
Ledeledeleeee
Yea im smoking tree
With Patrick and Spongebob we rapping
Them boys isnt slacking
Macking on some Mac and Cheese jeez
Now i got some weak knees
Keep me smiling please
While i keep wylin with Deez Nutz

Who is dat boy
Some would say its Belak
And others would say its Belak

Repost like and follow
Everything about this industry is hollow
Swallow my pride
Then i wallow inside of my pain
I got a talent that cannot be chained
I put text over pictures
Caption captain
Success Kid stacking
A fanbase asking for new tune
Fixture i got a mixture coming through soon

Who dat who dat boy

Too spaced out
Fucking your bitch she need toothpaste now
Very bass wow
Doggo and Catto just rattled your brain
I spilt my bong now my floor has a stain
Call me John Cena cause i got mad gains
When i drop a new track people can't abstain
From pressing play
I got memes all day
So get out of my way

Йоу, на хуй 2DopeBoyz, и на хуй Nah Right
И любые другие fuck-nigga-ass блоги, которые не могут поставить 18-летнего ниггера
Делающего свои собственные биты, каверы, видео и все это дерьмо
Идите на хуй post-Drake-ass cliche-jerking, LA-slauson rapping
Fuck-nigga-ass Hyperbeast niggas, теперь вернемся к альбому

И так, Тайлер, здравствуй, я Dr. TC и, хм, догадываюсь
Что твой учитель послал тебя сюда, чтобы поговорить, потому что ты плохо себя вел
Ну, что ж, просто расскажи что-нибудь о себе

Это то, во что играет Дьявол перед тем, как пойти спать
Немного пищи для размышлений, это трапеза смерти, продолжай и  ешь
Мой отец мертв, я не знал его, мы никогда не встретимся
Я порезал свои запястья и играл на пианино, потому что был так подавлен
Кто-нибудь, позовите пастыря, этот ублюдок одержим
Наша встреча только началась, ниггер, я сын Сатаны

Моя мать воспитывала меня одна, так что очевидно
Что я отдаю всю свою любовь ей, а не вам, уебкам
Намного важнее, что я становлюсь злее, когда записываюсь
Я чувствую себя как буйвол, со мной банда волков
Odd Future – это дети, что насрали в их головы
Это просто, а может и нет, на хуй их

Я высокий, темнокожий, худой, мои уши огромные, что пиздец
Набухать белых девок – мой единственный путь дать на клыка
Отстранен от занятий. Крутейший ниггер без напряга
Меня легко заметить, как черных блядей в леопардовых лосинах
Впитай меня в тампон, но оставь свет включенным
Потому что в этом альбоме достаточно зла
Бери с собой в школу все, что не поместится в JanSport

Я перешел от AP до JC всего за ебаную неделю
Просыпаюсь с рандомными девками, типа «Йоу, сука, как мы встретились»
Я живу со своей бабушкой, она постоянно пиздит насчет своего ковра
Каждый раз, когда я прихожу домой, она начинает мне причитать
Кто были еще медленнее мелассы, возьми это дерьмо в школу

Then it's Roscoe's with the whole fuckin' G-olf Wang
Wolf Gang, same thing, just the G's off
Sick fuck, I got many germs, I feel like Adolf
Hey, y'all motherfuckers thought I was gonna fall off
Ain't y'all jaw hurtin' from the hate, naw?
Aw, fuck it mate, and my balls still ain't drop, pause
Sick, spittin' like the motherfucking drool, and
Ear to a seashell listening to Frankie's new shit
Who's this mother fucking crew bringin' cool back
To the rap bake sale, making all the cake back
Made about 1-0-0-0-0-0 eight stacks
In a whole fuckin' different country where they hate rap
And they say, "Hey black?" can I get my kids back?
You brainwashed them with all that triple-sixty-six crap

TTDD y'all
Hot fire

Ooh woo woo woo woo woo wow wow

I saw you at the mall just the other day
I was walkin' you was walkin' the other way
I said girl
Come over here what's yo name, what's yo number
You hesitated to give me those seven digits
I said give me your number biznitch
Or we gon' have so muthafuckin' issues
I might have to hit you

Ooh ooh oh

I saw you later
At the movies lookin' good
After the movies we saw
Each other in the mall
I said hey chick
What's yo address
You gave me a stinky face
I said what's the deal bitch?
I got this pistol
Pow Pow
Leave you in the dust hoe
Yeh yeah yeh yeah yeah

I saw her
Girl
TTDD
One more time for me

Tyler, Taco, The bomb, Domo
Love in da mall
Uh yeah this to all dem bitches out there
With the EBT cards
Swag that shit out brotha

Bring your pops to school today for twelve years I cheated
Made a U-turn on the weather like "the fuck am I thinking"
And a new fitted instead I got some CD's
I hated some Ritalin, some white socks

I ain't look to Obama and Nixon, I look up to the Hugo's and Dixon's
Like that's going to make up the years and the tears
Cause in 16 years, you let your kid down the existence, none

And I hang with white neos who's nero stays frio
D-low where's the trigger, I'll let this bullet play hero

THE STATE OF TEXAS VS. TYLER GREGORY OKONMA

OFFENSE NO. 14-0721336

THE STATE OF TEXAS
TO ANY PEACE OFFICER OF THE STATE OF TEXAS, GREETINGS
You are hereby Commanded to Arrest

TYLER GREGORY OKONMA B/M 3/6/91

RIOT - CLASS A MISDEMEANOR

Of which offense he is accused by the written complaint, under oath, of Detective W. LYONS 5936 filed before me

Bond $3500

AFFIDAVIT FOR WARRANT OF ARREST AND DETENTION

You see how it is when you pick a new pet

How can you make up your mind what to get

But what if we took one of each kind of pet then our home would be full of the pets we would get

Tyler
Hey man how you doing ?
It's good to have you here

Hey Jimmy
You look nice

Oh thanks
I was thinking that, uh, maybe if you just did it a little more, I don't know, like rhythmically, you know what I'm saying

Ohhhhh, okay, okay
Like a...?

Like a rap, like kinda

Cool, cool

Yeah, cool...

NO !
Dad, would be mad, if we don't choose
We will end up with none
Jimmy...?

Uh, Tyler

Thank you
I guess what I, you know I just was hoping it would have more

What is the word I'm looking for, uh

I don't know what the word I'm looking for is

SWAGG ?

No, not swagg...FLOW

Matthew McConaughey, no?

No, not Matthew McConaughey

But, a little more flow, so like it would rhyme

Like pet, should I get

Ohhh, okay

I think I got it

Okay, Um

I'll do it right now, I'll do what I said

I'll make up my mind, that's up in my head

The dog or a rabbit, the fish and the cat

I'll pick it up fast and that was this and that was that

Jimmy Kimmel this segment was whack

No, that was good, that was actually really good
You did a lot better at the end
I think we really have something here
Dr. Seuss would be really proud
WAIT, aren't you supposed to drop the mic...I guess I'll just drop it, alright

I lock this house this is my electronic via from my phone i know nigga from my house its very moan this is bad but im good bye bye

Investigative Proof for Inteligen

Why People Need Mind Dietary supplements

All things considered, the name of that "marvel pill" is – Nootromins! It is a mix of Nootromins Reviews

Cerebrum Booster by - August 2, 20160

Instructions to Avoid Symptoms of Liver Problems Liver Active
Liver Detox

In the event that you need to keep away from any indications of liver issues, keep the liver issues from emerging in any case

Inside going on

I can't picture
I wish I came with you

Hello love life

